
TWO NEW SCIENCES BY GALILEO 



THE MACMILLAN COMPANY 

KEW YORK BOSTON CHICAGO DALLAS 
ATLANTA SAN FRANCISCO 

MACMILLAN & CO., LIMITED 

LONDON BOMBAY CALCUTTA 
MELBOURNE 

THE MACMILLAN CO. OF CANADA, LTD. 

TORONTO 




GALILEO GALILEI. 

Subterman's portrait, painted about 1640; now in the Galleria di Pitti at Florence. 




DIALOGUES 



CONCERNINC 



TWO NEW SCIENCES 



BY 

GALILEO GALILEI 






Translated from the Italian and Latin into English by 
HENRY CREW AND ALFONSO DE SALVIO 

of Northwestern University 

WITH AN INTRODUCTION BY 

ANTONIO FAVARO 
of the University of Padua. 



" I think with vour friend that it has been 
of late too much the mode to slight the 
learning of the ancients." 

Benjamin Franklin, Phil. Trans. 
6* 445- (I774-) 



Nrro f nrb 

THE MACMILLAN COMPANY 
1914 

All rights reserved 





02> 




COPYRIGHT, 1014 

BY THE MACMILLAN COMPANY 
Set up and electrotyped. Published May, 1 





"La Dynamique est la science des forces accelera- 
trices or retardatrices, et des mouyemens varies 
qu'elles doivent produire. Cette science est due 
entierement aux modernes, et Galilee est celui qui 
en a jete les premiers fondemens." Lagrange Mec. 
Anal. I. 221. 

TRANSLATORS' PREFACE 

OR more than a century English speaking 
students have been placed in the anomalous 
position of hearing Galileo constantly re- 
ferred to as the founder of modern physical 
science, without having any chance to read, 
in their own language, what Galileo himself 
has to say. Archimedes has been made 

; available by Heath ;Huygens' Lighthas been 

turned into English by Thompson, while Motte has put the 
Principia of Newton back into the language in which it was 
conceived. To render the Physics of Galileo also accessible to 
English and American students is the purpose of the following 
translation. 

The last of the great creators of the Renaissance was not a 
prophet without honor in his own time; for it was only one 
group of his country-men that failed to appreciate him. Even 
during his life time, his Mechanics had been rendered into French 
by one of the leading physicists of the world, Mersenne. 

Within twenty-five years after the death of Galileo, his Dia- 
logues on Astronomy, and those on Two New Sciences, had been 
done into English by Thomas Salusbury and were worthily 
printed in two handsome quarto volumes. The Two New 
Sciences, which contains practically all that Galileo has to say on 
the subject of physics, issued from the English press in 1665. 



vi TRANSLATORS' PREFACE 

It is supposed that most of the copies were destroyed in the great 
London fire which occurred in the year following. We are not 
aware of any copy in America : even that belonging to the British 
Museum is an imperfect one. 

Again in 1730 the Two New Sciences was done into English 
by Thomas Weston; but this book, now nearly two centuries 
old, is scarce and expensive. Moreover, the literalness with 
which this translation was made renders many passages either 
ambiguous or unintelligible to the modern reader. Other than 
these two, no English version has been made. 

Quite recently an eminent Italian scholar, after spending 
thirty of the best years of his life upon the subject, has brought 
to completion the great National Edition of the Works of 
Galileo. We refer to the twenty superb volumes in which Pro- 
fessor Antonio Favaro of Padua has given a definitive presenta- 
tion of the labors of the man who created the modern science of 
physics. 

The following rendition includes neither Le Mechaniche of 
Galileo nor his paper De Motu Accelerate, since the former of 
these contains little but the Statics which was current before 
the time of Galileo, and the latter is essentially included in the 
Dialogue of the Third Day. Dynamics was the one subject to 
which under various forms, such as Ballistics, Acoustics, As- 
tronomy, he consistently and persistently devoted his whole 
life. Into the one volume here translated he seems to have 
gathered, during his last years, practically all that is of value 
either to the engineer or the physicist. The historian, the 
philosopher, and the astronomer will find the other volumes 
replete with interesting material. 

It is hardly necessary to add that we have strictly followed the 
text of the National Edition essentially the Elzevir edition of 
1638. All comments and annotations have been omitted save 
here and there a foot-note intended to economize the reader's 
time. To each of these footnotes has been attached the signa- 
ture [Trans.] in order to preserve the original as nearly intact as 
possible. 

Much of the value of any historical document lies in the lan- 
guage employed, and this is doubly true when one attempts to 



TRANSLATORS' PREFACE vii 

trace the rise and growth of any set of concepts such as those 
employed in modern physics. We have therefore made this 
translation as literal as is consistent with clearness and modern- 
ity. In cases where there is any important deviation from this 
rule, and in the case of many technical terms where there is no 
deviation from it, we have given the original Italian or Latin 
phrase in italics enclosed in square brackets. The intention 
here is to illustrate the great variety of terms employed by the 
early physicists to describe a single definite idea, and conversely, 
to illustrate the numerous senses in which, then as now, a single 
word is used. For the few explanatory English words which are 
placed in square brackets without italics, the translators alone 
are responsible. The paging of the National Edition is indicated 
in square brackets inserted along the median line of the page. 

The imperfections of the following pages would have been 
many more but for the aid of three of our colleagues. Professor 
D. R. Curtiss was kind enough to assist in the translation of 
those pages which discuss the nature of Infinity: Professor O. H. 
Basquin gave valuable help in the rendition of the chapter on 
Strength of Materials; and Professor O. F. Long cleared up the 
meaning of a number of Latin phrases. 

To Professor A. Favaro of the University of Padua the trans- 
lators share, with every reader, a feeling of sincere obligation 
for his Introduction. 

H. C. 

A. DE S. 

EVANSTON, ILLINOIS, 
15 February, 1914. 




INTRODUCTION 




RITING to his faithful friend Elia Diodati, 
Galileo speaks of the "New Sciences " which 
he had in mind to print as being "superior 
to everything else of mine hitherto pub- 
lished"; elsewhere he says "they contain 
results which I consider the most important 
of all my studies"; and this opinion which 
he expressed concerning his own work has 
been confirmed by posterity: the "New Sciences" are, indeed, 
the masterpiece of Galileo who at the time when he made the 
above remarks had spent upon them more than thirty laborious 
years. 

One who wishes to trace the history of this remarkable work 
will find that the great philosopher laid its foundations during 
the eighteen best years of his life those which he spent at 
Padua. As we learn from his last scholar, Vincenzio Vivian i, 
the numerous results at which Galileo had arrived while in this 
city, awakened intense admiration in the friends who had wit- 
nessed various experiments by means of which he was accus- 
tomed to investigate interesting questions in physics. Fra Paolo 
Sarpi exclaimed: To give us the Science of Motion, God and 
Nature have joined hands and created the intellect of Galileo. 
And when the "New Sciences" came from the press one of his 
foremost pupils, Paolo Aproino, wrote that the volume contained 
much which he had "already heard from his own lips" during 
student days at Padua. 

Limiting ourselves to only the more important documents 
which might be cited in support of our statement, it will suffice 
to mention the letter, written to Guidobaldo del Monte on the 
29th of November, 1602, concerning the descent of heavy bodies 



x INTRODUCTION 

along the arcs of circles and the chords subtended by them; that 
to Sarpi, dated i6th of October, 1604, dealing with the free fall 
of heavy bodies; the letter to Antonio de' Medici on the nth 
of February, 1609, in which he states that he has "completed all 
the theorems and demonstrations pertaining to forces and re- 
sistances of beams of various lengths, thicknesses and shapes, 
proving that they are weaker at the middle than near the ends, 
that they can carry a greater load when that load is distributed 
throughout the length of the beam than when concentrated at 
one point, demonstrating also what shape should be given to a 
beam in order that it may have the same bending strength at 
every point," and that he was now engaged "upon some ques- 
tions dealing with the motion of projectiles"; and finally in the 
letter to Belisario Vinta, dated 7th of May, 1610, concerning 
his return from Padua to Florence, he enumerates various pieces 
of work which were still to be completed, mentioning explicitly 
three books on an entirely new science dealing with the theory 
of motion. Although at various times after the return to his 
native state he devoted considerable thought to the work which, 
even at that date, he had in mind as is shown by certain frag- 
ments which clearly belong to different periods of his life and 
which have, for the first time, been published in the National 
Edition; and although these studies were always uppermost in 
his thought it does not appear that he gave himself seriously to 
them until after the publication of the Dialogue and the com- 
pletion of that trial which was rightly described as the disgrace 
of the century. In fact as late as October, 1630, he barely men- 
tions to Aggiunti his discoveries in the theory of motion, and 
only two years later, in a letter to Marsili concerning the motion 
of projectiles, he hints at a book nearly ready for publication in 
which he will treat also of this subject; and only a year after 
this he writes to Arrighetti that he has in hand a treatise on the 
resistance of solids. 

But the work was given definite form by Galileo during his 
enforced residence at Siena: in these five months spent quietly 
with the Archbishop he himself writes that he has completed 
"a treatise on a new branch of mechanics full of interesting and 
useful ideas"; so that a few months later he was able to send 



INTRODUCTION xi 

word to Micanzio that the "work was ready"; as soon as his 
friends learned of this, they urged its publication. It was, how- 
ever, no easy matter to print the work of a man already con- 
demned by the Holy Office: and since Galileo could not hope to 
print it either in Florence or in Rome, he turned to the faithful 
Micanzio asking him to find out whether this would be possible 
in Venice, from whence he had received offers to print the Dia- 
logue on the Principal Systems, as soon as the news had reached 
there that he was encountering difficulties. At first everything 
went smoothly; so that Galileo commenced sending to Micanzio 
some of the manuscript which was received by the latter with 
an enthusiasm in which he was second to none of the warmest 
admirers of the great philosopher. But when Micanzio con- 
sulted the Inquisitor, he received the answer that there was 
an express order prohibiting the printing or reprinting of any 
work of Galileo, either in Venice or in any other place, nullo 
excepto. 

As soon as Galileo received this discouraging news he began 
to look with more favor upon offers which had come to him from 
Germany where his friend, and perhaps also his scholar, Gio- 
vanni Battista Pieroni, was in the service of the Emperor, as 
military engineer; consequently Galileo gave to Prince Mattia 
de' Medici who was just leaving for Germany the first two Dia- 
logues to be handed to Pieroni who was undecided whether to 
publish them at Vienna or Prague or at some place in Moravia; 
in the meantime, however, he had obtained permission to print 
both at Vienna and at Olmiitz. But Galileo recognized danger 
at every point within reach of the long arm of the Court of 
Rome; hence, availing himself of the opportunity offered by the 
arrival of Louis Elzevir in Italy in 1636, also of the friendship 
between the latter and Micanzio, not to mention a visit at 
Arcetri, he decided to abandon all other plans and entrust to 
the Dutch publisher the printing of his new work the manu- 
script of which, although not complete, Elzevir took with him 
on his return home. 

In the course of the year 1637, the printing was finished, and 
at the beginning of the following year there was lacking only 
the index, the title-page and the dedication. This last had, 



xii INTRODUCTION 

through the good offices of Diodati, been offered to the Count of 
Noailles, a former scholar of Galileo at Padua, and since 1634 
ambassador of France at Rome, a man who did much to alleviate 
the distressing consequences of the celebrated trial; and the 
offer was gratefully accepted. The phrasing of the dedication 
deserves brief comment. Since Galileo was aware, on the one 
hand, of the prohibition against the printing of his works and 
since, on the other hand, he did not wish to irritate the Court 
of Rome from whose hands he was always hoping for complete 
freedom, he pretends in the dedicatory letter (where, probably 
through excess of caution, he gives only main outlines) that he 
had nothing to do with the printing of his book, asserting that 
he will never again publish any of his researches, and will at 
most distribute here and there a manuscript copy. He even 
expresses great surprise that his new Dialogues have fallen into 
the hands of the Elzevirs and were soon to be published; so 
that, having been asked to write a dedication, he could think of 
no man more worthy who could also on this occasion defend 
him against his enemies. 

As to the title which reads: Discourses and Mathematical 
Demonstrations concerning Two New Sciences pertaining to Me- 
chanics and Local Motions, this only is known, namely, that the 
title is not the one which Galileo had devised and suggested; in 
fact he protested against the publishers taking the liberty of 
changing it and substituting "a low and common title for the 
noble and dignified one carried upon the title-page." 

In reprinting this work in the National Edition, I have fol- 
lowed the Leyden text of 1638 faithfully but not slavishly, be- 
cause I wished to utilize the large amount of manuscript ma- 
terial which has come down to us, for the purpose of correcting 
a considerable number of errors in this first edition, and also 
for the sake of inserting certain additions desired by the author 
himself. In the Leyden Edition, the four Dialogues are followed 
by an "Appendix containing some theorems and their proofs, deal- 
ing with centers of gravity of solid bodies, written by the same 
Author at an earlier date" which has no immediate connection 
with the subjects treated in the Dialogues; these theorems were 
found by Galileo, as he tells us, "at the age of twenty-two and 



INTRODUCTION xiii 

after two years study of geometry" and were here inserted only 
to save them from oblivion. 

But it was not the intention of Galileo that the Dialogues 
on the New Sciences should contain only the four Days and the 
above-mentioned appendix which constitute the Leyden Edi- 
tion; while, on the one hand, the Elzevirs were hastening the 
printing and striving to complete it at the earliest possible date, 
Galileo, on the other hand, kept on speaking of another Day, 
besides the four, thus embarrassing and perplexing the printers. 
From the correspondence which went on between author and 
publisher, it appears that this Fifth Day was to have treated 
"of the force of percussion and the use of the catenary"; but 
as the typographical work approached completion, the printer 
became anxious for the book to issue from the press without 
further delay; and thus it came to pass that the Discorsi e 
Dimostrazioni appeared containing only the four Days and the 
Appendix, in spite of the fact that in April, 1638, Galileo had 
plunged more deeply than ever "into the profound question of 
percussion" and "had almost reached a complete solution." 

The "New Sciences" now appear in an edition following the 
text which I, after the most careful and devoted study, deter- 
mined upon for the National Edition. It appears also in that 
language in which, above all others, I have desired to see it. In 
this translation, the last and ripest work of the great philosopher 
makes its first appearance in the New World: if toward this 
important result I may hope to have contributed in some meas- 
ure I shall feel amply rewarded for having given to this field of 
research the best years of my life. 

ANTONIO FAVARO. 

UNIVERSITY OF PADUA, 
2yth of October, 1913. 



D I SC O R S I 

DIMOSTRAZIONI 

MATEMATICHE, 

in tor no a due nttoue {cien^c 

Atcenenci alia 
MECANICX & i MOVIMENTI LOCALI, 

dclSignor 

GALILEO GALILEI LINCEO, 

Filofofo e Matematico primario del Sercniflimo 
Grand Duca di Tofcana. 




IN L E I D A, 
Apprcflb gli Elfcvirii. M. D. c. xxxvm. 



[43] 

TO THE MOST ILLUSTRIOUS LORD 
COUNT OF NOAILLES 

Counsellor of his Most Christian Majesty, Knight of the Order 

of the Holy Ghost, Field Marshal and Commander, 

Seneschal and Governor of Rouergue, and His 

Majesty's Lieutenant in Auvergne, my 

Lord and Worshipful Patron 

OST ILLUSTRIOUS LORD:- 

In the pleasure which you derive from 
the possession of this work of mine I rec- 
ognize your Lordship's magnanimity. The 
disappointment and discouragement I have 
felt over the ill-fortune which has followed 
my other books are already known to you. 
Indeed, I had decided not to publish any 
more of my work. And yet in order to save it from com- 
plete oblivion, it seemed to me wise to leave a manuscript 
copy in some place where it would be available at least to those 
who follow intelligently the subjects which I have treated. 
Accordingly I chose first to place my work in your Lordship's 
hands, asking no more worthy depository, and believing that, 
on account of your affection for me, you would have at heart the 
preservation of my studies and labors. Therefore, when you 
were returning home from your mission to Rome, I came to pay 
my respects in person as I had already done many times before 
by letter. At this meeting I presented to your Lordship a copy 
of these two works which at that time I happened to have ready. 
In the gracious reception which you gave these I found assurance 

of 




xviii TO THE COUNT OF NOAILLES 

of their preservation. The fact of your carrying them to France 
and showing them to friends of yours who are skilled in these 
sciences gave evidence that my silence was not to be interpreted 
as complete idleness. A little later, just as I was on the point of 

[44] 

sending other copies to Germany, Flanders, England, Spain and 
possibly to some places in Italy, I was notified by the Elzevirs 
that they had these works of mine in press and that I ought to 
decide upon a dedication and send them a reply at once. This 
sudden and unexpected news led me to think that the eagerness 
of your Lordship to revive and spread my name by passing 
these works on to various friends was the real cause of their 
falling into the hands of printers who, because they had already 
published other works of mine, now wished to honor me with a 
beautiful and ornate edition of this work. But these writings of 
mine must have received additional value from the criticism of 
so excellent a judge as your Lordship, who by the union of 
many virtues has won the admiration of all. Your desire to 
enlarge the renown of my work shows your unparalleled generos- 
ity and your zeal for the public welfare which you thought 
would thus be promoted. Under these circumstances it is 
eminently fitting that I should, in unmistakable terms, grate- 
fully acknowledge this generosity on the part of your Lordship, 
who has given to my fame wings that have carried it into regions 
more distant than I had dared to hope. It is, therefore, proper 
that I dedicate to your Lordship this child of my brain. To 
this course I am constrained not only by the weight of obliga- 
tion under which you have placed me, but also, if I may so 
speak, by the interest which I have in securing your Lordship 
as the defender of my reputation against adversaries who may 
attack it while I remain under your protection. 

And now, advancing under your banner, I pay my respects 
to you by wishing that you may be rewarded for these kindnesses 
by the achievement of the highest happiness and greatness. 

I am your Lordship's 

Most devoted Servant, 

GALILEO GALILEI. 
Arcetri, 6 March, 1638. 




THE PUBLISHER TO THE READER 

INCE society is held together by the mutual 
services which men render one to another, 
and since to this end the arts and sciences 
have largely contributed, investigations in 
these fields have always been held in great 
esteem and have been highly regarded by our 
wise forefathers. The larger the utility and 
excellence of the inventions, the greater has 
been the honor and praise bestowed upon the inventors. Indeed, 
men have even deified them and have united in the attempt to 
perpetuate the memory of their benefactors by the bestowal of 
this supreme honor. 

Praise and admiration are likewise due to those clever in- 
tellects who, confining their attention to the known, have 
discovered and corrected fallacies and errors in many and 
many a proposition enunciated by men of distinction and 
accepted for ages as fact. Although these men have only pointed 
out falsehood and have not replaced it by truth, they are never- 
theless worthy of commendation when we consider the well- 
known difficulty of discovering fact, a difficulty which led the 
prince of orators to exclaim: Utinam tarn facile possem vera 
reperire, quam falsa convincere* And indeed, these latest 
centuries merit this praise because it is during them that the 
arts and sciences, discovered by the ancients, have been reduced 
to so great and constantly increasing perfection through the 
investigations and experiments of clear-seeing minds. This 
development is particularly evident in the case of the mathe- 
matical sciences. Here, without mentioning various men who 
have achieved success, we must without hesitation and with the 

* Cicero, de Natura Deorum, I, 91. [Trans.] 



xx THE PUBLISHER TO THE READER 

unanimous approval of scholars assign the first place to Galileo 
Galilei, Member of the Academy of the Lincei. This he deserves 
not only because he has effectively demonstrated fallacies in 
many of our current conclusions, as is amply shown by his 
published works, but also because by means of the telescope 
(invented in this country but greatly perfected by him) he has 
discovered the four satellites of Jupiter, has shown us the true 
character of the Milky Way, and has made us acquainted with 
spots on the Sun, with the rough and cloudy portions of the 
lunar surface, with the threefold nature of Saturn, with the 
phases of Venus and with the physical character of comets. 
These matters were entirely unknown to the ancient astronomers 
and philosophers; so that we may truly say that he has restored 
to fhe world the science of astronomy and has presented it in a 
new light. 

Remembering that the wisdom and power and goodness of the 
Creator are nowhere exhibited so well as in the heavens and 
celestial bodies, we can easily recognize the great merit of him 
who has brought these bodies to our knowledge and has, in 
spite of their almost infinite distance, rendered them easily 
visible. For, according to the common saying, sight can teach 
more and with greater certainty in a single day than can precept 
even though repeated a thousand times; or, as another says, 
intuitive knowledge keeps pace with accurate definition. 

But the divine and natural gifts of this man are shown to 
best advantage in the present work where he is seen to have 
discovered, though not without many labors and long vigils, 
two entirely new sciences and to have demonstrated them in a 
rigid, that is, geometric, manner: and what is even more .re- 
markable in this work is the fact that one of the two sciences 
deals with a subject of never-ending interest, perhaps the most 
important in nature, one which has engaged the minds of all the 
great philosophers and one concerning which an extraordinary 
number of books have been written. I refer to motion [moto 
locale], a phenomenon exhibiting very many wonderful proper- 
ties, none of which has hitherto been discovered or demonstrated 
by any one. The other science which he has also developed from 

its 



THE PUBLISHER TO THE READER xxi 

its very foundations deals with the resistance which solid bodies 
offer to fracfture by external forces [per violenza], a subject of 
great utility, especially in the sciences and mechanical arts, 
and one also abounding in properties and theorems not hitherto 
observed. 

In this volume one finds the first treatment of these two 
sciences, full of propositions to which, as time goes on, able 
thinkers will add many more; also by means of a large number 
of clear demonstrations the author points the way to many 
other theorems as will be readily seen and understood by all in- 
telligent readers. 




TABLE OF CONTENTS 

1 Page 

First new science, treating of the resistance which solid bodies 
offer to fracture. First Day I 

II 

Concerning the cause of cohesion. Second Day 109 

III 

Second new science, treating of motion [movimenti locali[. 

Third Day 153 

Uniform motion 154 

Naturally accelerated motion 160 

IV 

Violent motions. Projectiles. Fourth Day 244 

V 

Appendix; theorems and demonstrations concerning the centers 
of gravity of solids 295 



TWO NEW SCIENCES BY GALILEO 




FIRST DAY 

INTERLOCUTORS: SALVIATI, SA- 
GREDO AND SIMPLICIO 




ALV. The constant activity which you Vene- 
tians display in your famous arsenal suggests 
to the studious mind a large field for investi- 
gation, especially that part of the work 
which involves mechanics; for in this depart- 
ment all types of instruments and machines 
are constantly being cons tru (fled by many 
artisans, among whom there must be some 
who, partly by inherited experience and partly by their own ob- 
servations, have become highly expert and clever in explanation. 
SAGR. You are quite right. Indeed, I myself, being curious 
by nature, frequently visit this place for the mere pleasure of 
observing the work of those who, on account of their superiority 
over other artisans, we call "first rank men." Conference with 
them has often helped me in the investigation of certain effects 
including not only those which are striking, but also those which 
are recondite and almost incredible. At times also I have been 
put to confusion and driven to despair of ever explaining some- 
thing for which I could not account, but which my senses told 
me to be true. And notwithstanding the fact that what the old 
man told us a little while ago is proverbial and commonly 
accepted, yet it seemed to me altogether false, like many another 
saying which is current among the ignorant; for I think they 
introduce these expressions in order to give the appearance of 
knowing something about matters which they do not understand. 

Salv. 



2 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

[So] 

SALV. You refer, perhaps, to that last remark of his when we 
asked the reason why they employed stocks, scaffolding and 
bracing of larger dimensions for launching a big vessel than they 
do for a small one; and he answered that they did this in order to 
avoid the danger of the ship parting under its own heavy weight 
[vasta mole], a danger to which small boats are not subject? 

SAGR. Yes, that is what I mean; and I refer especially to his 
last assertion which I have always regarded as a false, though 
current, opinion; namely, that in speaking of these and other 
similar machines one cannot argue from the small to the large, 
because many devices which succeed on a small scale do not 
work on a large scale. 'Now, since mechanics has its foundation 
in geometry, where mere size cuts no figure, I do not see that the 
properties of circles, triangles, cylinders, cones and other solid 
figures will change with their size. If, therefore, a large machine 
be constructed in such a way that its parts bear to one another 
the same ratio as in a smaller one, and if the smaller is sufficiently 
strong for the purpose for which it was designed, I do not see 
why the larger also should not be able to withstand any severe 
and destructive tests to which it may be subjected. 

SALV. The common opinion is here absolutely wrong. Indeed, 
it is so far wrong that precisely the opposite is true, namely, 
that many machines can be constructed even more perfectly on a 
large scale than on a small; thus, for instance, a clock which indi- 
cates and strikes the hour can be made more accurate on a large 
scale than on a small. There are some intelligent people who 
maintain this same opinion, but on more reasonable grounds, 
when they cut loose from geometry and argue that the better 
performance of the large machine is owing to the imperfections 
and variations of the material. Here I trust you will not charge 



me with arrogance if I say that imperfections in the material, 
even those which are great enough to invalidate the clearest 
mathematical proof, are not sufficient to explain the deviations 
observed between machines in the concrete and in the abstract. 
Yet I shall say it and will affirm that, even if the imperfections 

did 



FIRST DAY 3 

did not exist and matter were absolutely perfect, unalterable and 
free from all accidental variations, still the mere fact that it is 
matter makes the larger machine, built of the same material 
and in the same proportion as the smaller, correspond with 
exactness to the smaller in every respect except that it will not 
be so strong or so resistant against violent treatment; the 
larger the machine, the greater its weakness. Since I assume * 
matter to be unchangeable and always the same, it is clear that 
we are no less able to treat this constant and invariable property 
in a rigid manner than if it belonged to simple and pure mathe- 
matics. Therefore, Sagredo, you would do well to change the 
opinion which you, and perhaps also many other students of 
mechanics, have entertained concerning the ability of machines 
and structures to resist external disturbances, thinking that 
when they are built of the same material and maintain the same 
ratio between parts, they are able equally, or rather propor- 
tionally, to resist or yield to such external disturbances and 
blows. For we can demonstrate by geometry that the large 
machine is not proportionately stronger than the small. Finally, 
we may say that, for every machine and structure, whether 
artificial or natural, there is set a necessary limit beyond which 
neither art nor nature can pass; it is here understood, of course, 
that the material is the same and the proportion preserved. . 

SAGR. My brain already reels. My mind, like a cloud momen- 
tarily illuminated by a lightning-flash, is for an instant filled 
with an unusual light, which now beckons to me and which.now 
suddenly mingles and obscures strange, crude ideas. From 
what you have said it appears to me impossible to build two 
similar structures of the same material, but of different sizes and 
have them proportionately strong; and if this were so, it would 

.[52] 

not be possible to find two single poles made of the same wood 
which shall be alike in strength and resistance but unlike in 
size. 

SALV. So it is, Sagredo. And to make sure that we understand 
each other, I say that if we take a wooden rod of a certain 
length and size, fitted, say, into a wall at right angles, i. e., 

parallel 



4 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

parallel to the horizon, it may be reduced to such a length that 
it will just support itself; so that if a hair's breadth be added to 
its length it will break under its own weight and will be the only 
rod of the kind in the world.* Thus if, for instance, its length be 
a hundred times its breadth, you will not be able to find another 
rod whose length is also a hundred times its breadth and which, 
like the former, is just able to sustain its own weight and no 
more: all the larger ones will break while all the shorter ones will 
be strong enough to support something more than their own 
weight. And this which I have said about the ability to support 
itself must be understood to apply also to other tests; so that if a 
piece of scantling [corrente] will carry the weight of ten similar to 
itself, a beam [trove] having the same proportions will not be 
able to support ten similar beams. 

Please observe, gentlemen, how facts which at first seem 
improbable will, even on scant explanation, drop the cloak 
which has hidden them and stand forth in naked and simple 
beauty. Who does not know that a horse falling from a height 
of three or four cubits will break his bones, while a dog falling 
from the same height or a cat from a height of eight or ten cubits 
will suffer no injury? Equally harmless would be the fall of a 
grasshopper from a tower or the fall of an ant from the distance 
of the moon. Do not children fall with impunity from heights 
which would cost their elders a broken leg or perhaps a fractured 
skull? And just as smaller animals are proportionately stronger 
and more robust than the larger, so also smaller plants are able 
to stand up better than larger. I am certain you both know that 
an oak two hundred cubits [braccia] high would not be able to 
sustain its own branches if they were distributed as in a tree of 
ordinary size; and that nature cannot produce a horse as large as 
twenty ordinary horses or a giant ten times taller than an 

.[53] 

ordinary man unless by miracle or by greatly altering the 
proportions of his limbs and especially of his bones, which would 
have to be considerably enlarged over the ordinary. Likewise 
the current belief that, in the case of artificial machines the very 

* The author here apparently means that the solution is unique. 

[Trans.] 



FIRST DAY 5 

large and the small are equally feasible and lasting is a manifest 
error. Thus, for example, a small obelisk or column or other 
solid figure can certainly be laid down or set up without danger 
of breaking, while the very large ones will go to pieces under die 
slightest provocation, and that purely on account of their own 
weight. And here I must relate a circumstance which is worthy"^ 
of your attention as indeed are all events which happen contrary 
to expectation, especially when a precautionary measure turns 
out to be a cause of disaster. A large marble column was laid 
out so that its two ends rested each upon a piece of beam; a 
little later it occurred to a mechanic that, in order to be doubly 
sure of its not breaking in the middle by its own weight, it would 
be wise to lay a third support midway; this seemed to all an 
excellent idea; but the sequel showed that it was quite the oppo- 
site, for not many months passed before the column was found 
cracked and broken exactly above the new middle support. 

SIMP. A very remarkable and thoroughly unexpected acci- 
dent, especially if caused by placing that new support in the 
middle. 

SALV. Surely this is the explanation, and the moment the 
cause is known our surprise vanishes; for when the two pieces 
of the column were placed on level ground it was observed that 
one of the end beams had, after a long while, become decayed 
and sunken, but that the middle one remained hard and strong, 
thus causing one half of the column to project in the air without 
any support. Under these circumstances the body therefore 
behaved differently from what it would have done if supported 
only upon the first beams; because no matter how much they 
might have sunken the column would have gone with them. 
This is an accident which could not possibly have happened to a ~ 
small column, even though made of the same stone and having a 
length corresponding to its thickness, i. e., preserving the ratio 
between thickness and length found in the large pillar. 

[54] 

SAGR. I am quite convinced of the facts of the case, but I do 
not understand why the strength and resistance are not multi- 
plied in the same proportion as the material; and I am the more 

puzzled 



6 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

puzzled because, on the contrary, I have noticed in other cases 
that the strength and resistance against breaking increase in a 
larger ratio than the amount of material. Thus, for instance, if 
two nails be driven into a wall, the one which is twice as big 
as the other will support not only twice as much weight as the 
other, but three or four times as much. 

SALV. Indeed you will not be far wrong if you say eight times 
as much; nor does this phenomenon contradict the other even 
though in appearance they seem so different. 

SAGR. Will you not then, Salviati, remove these difficulties 
and clear away these obscurities if possible: for I imagine that 
this problem of resistance opens up a field of beautiful and useful 
ideas; and if you are pleased to make this the subject of to-day's 
discourse you will place Simplicio and me under many obliga- 
tions. 

SALV. I am at your service if only I can call to mind what I 
learned from our Academician * who had thought much upon 
this subject and according to his custom had demonstrated 
everything by geometrical methods so that one might fairly 
call this a new science. For, although some of his conclusions 
had been reached by others, first of all by Aristotle, these are 
not the most beautiful and, what is more important, they had 
not been proven in a rigid manner from fundamental principles. 
Now, since I wish to convince you by demonstrative reasoning 
rather than to persuade you by mere probabilities, I shall sup- 
pose that you are familiar with present-day mechanics so far as 
it is needed in our discussion. First of all it is necessary to 
consider what happens when a piece of wood or any other solid 
which coheres firmly is broken; for this is the fundamental 
fact, involving the first and simple principle which we must take 
for granted as well known. 

To grasp this more clearly, imagine a cylinder or prism, AB, 
made of wood or other solid coherent material. Fasten the 
upper end, A, so that the cylinder hangs vertically. To the 
lower end, B, attach the weight C. It is clear that however 
great they may be, the tenacity and coherence [tenacita e 

* I. e. Galileo: The author frequently refers to himself under this 
name. [Trans.] 



FIRST DAY 7 

coerenza] between the parts of this solid, so long as they are not 
infinite, can be overcome by the pull of the weight C, a weight 
which can be increased indefinitely until finally the solid breaks 
like a rope. And as in the case of the rope whose strength we 
know to be derived from a multitude of hemp threads which 
compose it, so in the case of the wood, we observe its fibres and 
filaments run lengthwise and render it much stronger than a 
hemp rope of the same thickness. But in the 
case of a stone or metallic cylinder where thej 
coherence seems to be still greater the cement 
which holds the parts together must be some- 
thing other than filaments and fibres; and, yet 
even this can be broken by a strong pull. 

SIMP. If this matter be as you say I can well 
understand that the fibres of the wood, being as 
long as the piece of wood itself, render it strong 
and resistant against large forces tending to 
break it. But how can one make a rope one 
hundred cubits long out of hempen fibres which 
are not more than two or three cubits long, and 
still give it so much strength ? Besides, I should 
be glad to hear your opinion as to the manner in 
which the parts of metal, stone, and other ma- 
terials not showing a filamentous structure are Fig. i 
put together; for, if I mistake not, they exhibit even greater 
tenacity. 

SALV. To solve the problems which you raise it will be neces- 
sary to make a digression into subjects which have little bearing 
upon our present purpose. 

SAGR. But if, by digressions, we can reach new truth, what 
harm is there in making one now, so that we may not lose 
this knowledge, remembering that such an opportunity, once 
omitted, may not return; remembering also that we are not tied 
down to a fixed and brief method but that we meet solely for our 
own entertainment? Indeed, who knows but that we may thus 

[56] 

frequently 




8 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

frequently discover something more interesting and beautiful 
than the solution originally sought? I beg of you, therefore, to 
grant the request of Simplicio, which is also mine; for I am no 
less curious and desirous than he to learn what is the binding 
material which holds together the parts of solids so that they 
can scarcely be separated. This information is also needed to 
understand the coherence of the parts of fibres themselves of 
which some solids are built up. 

SALV. I am at your service, since you desire it. The first 
question is, How are fibres, each not more than two or three 
cubits in length, so tightly bound together in the case of a rope 
one hundred cubits long that great force [violenza] is required to 
break it? 

Now tell me, Simplicio, can you not hold a hempen fibre so 
tightly between your fingers that I, pulling by the other end, 
would break it before drawing it away from you? Certainly 
you can. And now when the fibres of hemp are held not only at 
the ends, but are grasped by the surrounding medium through- 
out their entire length is it not manifestly more difficult to tear 
them loose from what holds them than to break them? But in 
the case of the rope the very act of twisting causes the threads 
to bind one another in such a way that when the rope is stretched 
with a great force the fibres break rather than separate from 
each other. 

At the point where a rope parts the fibres are, as everyone 
knows, very short, nothing like a cubit long, as they would be if 
the parting of the rope occurred, not by the breaking of the 
filaments, but by their slipping one over the other. 

SAGR. In confirmation of this it may be remarked that ropes 
sometimes break not by a lengthwise pull but by excessive 
twisting. This, it seems to me, is a conclusive argument because 
the threads bind one another so tightly that the compressing 
fibres do not permit those which are compressed to lengthen the 
spirals even that little bit by which it is necessary for them to 
lengthen in order to surround the rope which, on twisting, grows 
shorter and thicker. 

SALV. You are quite right. Now see how one fact suggests 

another 



FIRST DAY 9 

another. The thread held between the fingers does not yield 

[S7l 

to one who wishes to draw it away even when pulled with con- 
siderable force, but resists because it is held back by a double 
compression, seeing that the upper finger presses against the 
lower as hard as the lower against the upper. Now, if we could 
retain only one of these pressures there is no doubt that only 
half the original resistance would remain; but since we are 
not able, by lifting, say, the upper finger, to remove one of 
these pressures without also removing the other, it becomes 
necessary to preserve one of them by means of a new device 
which causes the thread to press itself against the finger or 
against some other solid body upon which it rests; and thus it is 
brought about that the very force which pulls 
it in order to snatch it away compresses it 
more and more as the pull increases. This 
is accomplished by wrapping the thread 
around the solid in the manner of a spiral; 
and will be better understood by means of a 
figure. Let AB and CD be two cylinders be- 
tween which is stretched the thread EF: and 
for the sake of greater clearness we will im- 
agine it to be a small cord. If these two 
cylinders be pressed strongly together, the 
cord EF, when drawn by the end F, will un- 
doubtedly stand a considerable pull before it 
slips between the two compressing solids. 
But if we remove one of these cylinders the 
cord, though remaining in contact with the 
other, will not thereby be prevented from 
slipping freely. On the other hand, if one 
holds the cord loosely against the top of the 
cylinder A, winds it in the spiral form AFLOTR, and then 
pulls it by the end R, it is evident that the cord will begin to 
bind the cylinder; the greater the number of spirals the more 
tightly will the cord be pressed against the cylinder by any 
given pull. Thus as the number of turns increases, the line of 

contact 




Fig. 2 



io THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

contact becomes longer and in consequence more resistant; so 
that the cord slips and yields to the tractive force with increas- 
ing difficulty. 

[58] 

Is it not clear that this is precisely the kind of resistance which 
one meets in the case of a thick hemp rope where the fibres form 
thousands and thousands of similar spirals? And, indeed, the 
binding effect of these turns is so great that a few short rushes 
woven together into a few interlacing spirals form one of the 
strongest of ropes which I believe they call pack rope [jtuftz]. 
SAGR. What you say has cleared up two points which I did 
not previously understand. One fact is how two, or at most 
three, turns of a rope around the axle of a windlass cannot only 
hold it fast, but can also prevent it from slipping when pulled 
by the immense force of the weight [forza del peso] which it 
sustains; and moreover how, by turning the windlass, this same 
axle, by mere friction of the rope around it, can wind up and 
lift huge stones while a mere boy is able to handle 
the slack of the rope. The other fact has to do with 
a simple but clever device, invented by a young kins- 
man of mine, for the purpose of descending from a 
window by means of a rope without lacerating the 
palms of his hands, as had happened to him shortly 
before and greatly to his discomfort. A small sketch 
will make this clear. He took a wooden cylinder, 
AB, about as thick as a walking stick and about one 
span long: on this he cut a spiral channel of about 
one turn and a half, and large enough to just receive 
the rope which he wished to use. Having introduced 
the rope at the end A and led it out again at the end 
B, he enclosed both the cylinder and the rope in a 
case of wood or tin, hinged along the side so that it 
Fig- 3 could be easily opened and closed. After he had 
fastened the rope to a firm support above, he could, on grasp- 
ing and squeezing the case with both hands, hang by his arms. 
The pressure on the rope, lying between the case and the cyl- 
inder, was such that he could, at will, either grasp the case 

more 




FIRST DAY ii 

more tightly and hold himself from slipping, or slacken his 
hold and descend as slowly as he wished. 

[5?] 

SALV. A truly ingenious device! I feel, however, that for 
a complete explanation other considerations might well enter; 
yet I must not now digress upon this particular topic since you 
are waiting to hear what I think about the breaking strength of 
other materials which, unlike ropes and most woods, do not 
show a filamentous structure. The coherence of these bodies 
is, in my estimation, produced by other causes which may be 
grouped under two heads. One is that much-talked-of repug- 
nance which nature exhibits towards a vacuum; but this horror 
of a vacuum not being sufficient, it is necessary to introduce 
another cause in the form of a gluey or viscous substance which j 
binds firmly together the component parts of the body. 

First I shall speak of the vacuum, demonstrating by definite 
experiment the quality and quantity of its force [wrfft]. If you 
take two highly polished and smooth plates of marble, metal, or 
glass and place them face to face, one will slide over the other 
with the greatest ease, showing conclusively that there is noth- 
ing of a viscous nature between them. But when you attempt 
to separate them and keep them at a constant distance apart, 
you find the plates exhibit such a repugnance to separation that 
the upper one will carry the lower one with it and keep it lifted 
indefinitely, even when the latter is big and heavy. 

This experiment shows the aversion of nature for empty 
space, even during the brief moment required for the outside air 
to rush in and fill up the region between the two plates. It is 
also observed that if two plates are not thoroughly polished, 
their contact is imperfect so that when you attempt to separate 
them slowly the only resistance offered is that of weight; if, 
however, the pull be sudden, then the lower plate rises, but 
quickly falls back, having followed the upper plate only for that 
very short interval of time required for the expansion of the 
small amount of air remaining between the plates, in conse- 
quence of their not fitting, and for the entrance of the surround- 
ing air. This resistance which is exhibited between the two 

plates 



12 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

plates is doubtless likewise present between the parts of a solid, 
and enters, at least in part, as a concomitant cause of their 
coherence. 



SAGR. Allow me to interrupt you for a moment, please; for 
I want to speak of something which just occurs to me, namely, 
when I see how the lower plate follows the upper one and how 
rapidly it is lifted, I feel sure that, contrary to the opinion of 
many philosophers, including perhaps even Aristotle himself, 
motion in a vacuum is not instantaneous. If this were so the 
two plates mentioned above would separate without any re- 
sistance whatever, seeing that the same instant of time would 
suffice for their separation and for the surrounding medium to 
rush in and fill the vacuum between them. The fact that the 
lower plate follows the upper one allows us to infer, not only 
that motion in a vacuum is not instantaneous, but also that, 
between the two plates, a vacuum really exists, at least for a 
very short time, sufficient to allow the surrounding medium to 
rush in and fill the vacuum; for if there were no vacuum there 
would be no need of any motion in the medium. One must admit 
then that a vacuum is sometimes produced by violent motion 
[violenza] or contrary to the laws of nature, (although in my 
opinion nothing occurs contrary to nature except the impossible, 
. and that never occurs). 

But here another difficulty arises. While experiment con- 
vinces me of the correctness of this conclusion, my mind is not 
entirely satisfied as to the cause to which this effect is to be 
attributed. For the separation of the plates precedes the 
formation of the vacuum which is produced as a consequence 
of this separation; and since it appears to me that, in the order of 
nature, the cause must precede the effect, even though it ap- 
pears to follow in point of time, and since every positive effect 
must have a positive cause, I do not see how the adhesion of 
two plates and their resistance to separation adlual facts can 
be referred to a vacuum as cause when this vacuum is yet to 
follow. According to the infallible maxim of the Philosopher, 
the non-existent can produce no effect. 

Simp. 



FIRST DAY 13 

SIMP. Seeing that you accept this axiom of Aristotle, I hardly 
think you will reject another excellent and reliable maxim of his, 
namely, Nature undertakes only that which happens without 
resistance; and in this saying, it appears to me, you will find the 
solution of your difficulty. Since nature abhors a vacuum, she 
prevents that from which a vacuum would follow as a necessary 
consequence. Thus it happens that nature prevents the separa- 
tion of the two plates. 

[61] 

SAGR. Now admitting that what Simplicio says is an adequate 
solution of my difficulty, it seems to me, if I may be allowed to 
resume my former argument, that this very resistance to a 
vacuum ought to be sufficient to hold together the parts either 
of stone or of metal or the parts of any other solid which is knit 
together more strongly and which is more resistant to separation. 
If for one effect there be only one cause, or if, more being as- 
signed, they can be reduced to one, then why is not this vacuum 
which really exists a sufficient cause for all kinds of resistance? 

SALV. I do not wish just now to enter this discussion as to 
whether the vacuum alone is sufficient to hold together the 
separate parts of a solid body; but I assure you that the vacuum 
which acts as a sufficient cause in the case of the two plates is not 
alone sufficient to bind together the parts of a solid cylinder of 
marble or metal which, when pulled violently, separates and 
divides. And now if I find a method of distinguishing this well 
known resistance, depending upon the vacuum, from every 
other kind which might increase the coherence, and if I show 
you that the aforesaid resistance alone is not nearly sufficient 
for such an effect, will you not grant that we are bound to 
introduce another cause? Help him, Simplicio, since he does 
not know what reply to make. 

SIMP. Surely, Sagredo's hesitation must be owing to another 
reason, for there can be no doubt concerning a conclusion which 
is at once so clear and logical. 

SAGR. You have guessed rightly, Simplicio. I was wondering 
whether, if a million of gold each year from Spain were not 
sufficient to pay the army, it might not be necessary to 

make 



i 4 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

make provision other than small coin for the pay of the 
soldiers.* 

But go ahead, Salviati; assume that I admit your conclusion 
and show us your method of separating the action of the vacuum 
from other causes; and by measuring it show us how it is not 
sufficient to produce the effect in question. 

SALV. Your good angel assist you. I will tell you how to 
separate the force of the vacuum from the others, and after- 
wards how to measure it. For this purpose let us consider a 
continuous substance whose parts lack all resistance to separa- 
tion except that derived from a vacuum, such as is the case with 
water, a fact fully demonstrated by our Academician in one of his 
treatises. Whenever a cylinder of water is subjected to a pull and 

[62] 

offers a resistance to the separation of its parts this can be attrib- 

A R uted to no other cause than the resistance of the 

* vacuum. In order to try such an experiment 
I have invented a device which I can better 
explain by means of a sketch than by mere 
words. Let CABD represent the cross section 
of a cylinder either of metal or, preferably, 
of glass, hollow inside and accurately turned. 
Into this is introduced a perfectly fitting 
D cylinder of wood, represented in cross section 
by EGHF, and capable of up-and-down mo- 
tion. Through the middle of this cylinder is 
bored a hole to receive an iron wire, carrying 
a hook at the end K, while the upper end 
of the wire, I, is provided with a conical 
head. The wooden cylinder is countersunk 
Fig. 4 at the top so as to receive, with a perfect 

fit, the conical head I of the wire, IK, when pulled down by 
the end K. 

Now insert the wooden cylinder EH in the hollow cylinder AD, 
so as not to touch the upper end of the latter but to leave free a 
space of two or three finger-breadths; this space is to be filled 

* The bearing of this remark becomes clear on reading what Salviati 
says on p. 1 8 below. [Trans.] 



7^-^, 
i 


< 


t 


G 


H 


J 


K 
5V 




FIRST DAY 15 

with water by holding the vessel with the mouth CD upwards, 
pushing down on the stopper EH, and at the same time keeping 
the conical head of the wire, I, away from the hollow portion of 
the wooden cylinder. The air is thus allowed to escape alongside 
the iron wire (which does not make a close fit) as soon as one 
presses down on the wooden stopper. The air having been 
allowed to escape and the iron wire having been drawn back so 
that it fits snugly against the conical depression in the wood, 
invert the vessel, bringing it mouth downwards, and hang on the 
hook K a vessel which can be filled with sand or any heavy 
material in quantity sufficient to finally separate the upper 
surface of the stopper, EF, from the lower surface of the water 
to which it was attached only by the resistance of the vacuum. 
Next weigh the stopper and wire together with the attached 
vessel and its contents; we shall then have the force of the 
vacuum [forza del vacuo]. If one attaches to a cylinder of marble 

[63] 

or glass a weight which, together with the weight of the marble 
or glass itself, is just equal to the sum of the weights before 
mentioned, and if breaking occurs we shall then be justified in 
saying that the vacuum alone holds the parts of the marble and 
glass together; but if this weight does not suffice and if breaking 
occurs only after adding, say, four times this weight, we shall 
then be compelled to say that the vacuum furnishes only one 
fifth of the total resistance [resistenza]. 

SIMP. No one can doubt the cleverness of the device; yet it 
presents many difficulties which make me doubt its reliability. 
For who will assure us that the air does not creep in between the 
glass and stopper even if it is well packed with tow or other 
yielding material ? I question also whether oiling with wax or 
turpentine will suffice to make the cone, I, fit snugly on its seat. 
Besides, may not the parts of the water expand and dilate? 
Why may not the air or exhalations or some other more subtile 
substances penetrate the pores of the wood, or even of the glass 
itself? 

SALV. With great skill indeed has Simplicio laid before us the 
difficulties; and he has even partly suggested how to prevent the 

air 



16 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

air from penetrating the wood or passing between the wood and 
the glass. But now let me point out that, as our experience in- 
creases, we shall learn whether or not these alleged difficulties 
really exist. For if, as is the case with air, water is by nature 
expansible, although only under severe treatment, we shall see 
the stopper descend; and if we put a small excavation in the 
upper part of the glass vessel, such as indicated by V, then the 
air or any other tenuous and gaseous substance, which might 
penetrate the pores of glass or wood, would pass through the 
water and collect in this receptacle V. But if these things do not 
happen we may rest assured that our experiment has been per- 
formed with proper caution; and we shall discover that water 
does not dilate and that glass does not allow any material, 
however tenuous, to penetrate it. 

SAGR. Thanks to this discussion, I have learned the cause of a 
certain effect which I have long wondered at and despaired of 
understanding. I once saw a cistern which had been provided 
with a pump under the mistaken impression that the water 
might thus be drawn with less effort or in greater quantity than 
by means of the ordinary bucket. The stock of the pump car- 

[64] 

ried its sucker and valve in the upper part so that the water was 
lifted by attraction and not by a push as is the case with pumps 
in which the sucker is placed lower down. This pump worked 
perfectly so long as the water in the cistern stood above a certain 
level; but below this level the pump failed to work. When I 
first noticed this phenomenon I thought the machine was out of 
order; but the workman whom I called in to repair it told me 
the defect was not in the pump but in the water which had 
fallen too low to be raised through such a height; and he added 
that it was not possible, either by a pump or by any other 
machine working on the principle of attraction, to lift water a 
hair's breadth above eighteen cubits; whether the pump be 
large or small this is the extreme limit of the lift. Up to this 
time I had been so thoughtless that, although I knew a rope, or 
rod of wood, or of iron, if sufficiently long, would break by its 
own weight when held by the upper end, it never occurred to me 

that 



FIRST DAY 17 

that the same thing would happen, only much more easily, to a 
column of water. And really is not that thing which is at- 
tracted in the pump a column of water attached at the upper 
end and stretched more and more until finally a point is reached 
where it breaks, like a rope, on account of its excessive weight ? 
SALV. That is precisely the way it works; this fixed elevation 
of eighteen cubits is true for any quantity of water whatever, be 
the pump large or small or even as fine as a straw. We may 
therefore say that, on weighing the water contained in a tube 
eighteen cubits long, no matter what the diameter, we shall 
obtain the value of the resistance of the vacuum in a cylinder of 
any solid material having a bore of this same diameter. And 
having gone so far, let us see how easy it is to find to what 
length cylinders of metal, stone, wood, glass, etc., of any diam- 
eter can be elongated without breaking by their own weight. 

[65] 

Take for instance a copper wire of any length and thickness; 
fix the upper end and to the other end attach a greater and 
greater load until finally the wire breaks; let the maximum load 
be, say, fifty pounds. Then it is clear that if fifty pounds of 
copper, in addition to the weight of the wire itself which may 
be, say, Vs ounce, is drawn out into wire of this same size we 
shall have the greatest length of this kind of wire which can sus- 
tain its own weight. Suppose the wire which breaks to be one 
cubit in length and Vs ounce in weight; then since it supports 
50 Ibs. in addition to its own weight, i. e., 4800 eighths-of-an- 
ounce, it follows that all copper wires, independent of size, can 
sustain themselves up to a length of 4801 cubits and no more. 
Since then a copper rod can sustain its own weight up to a 
length of 4801 cubits it follows that that part of the breaking 
strength [resistenza] which depends upon the vacuum, comparing 
it with the remaining facflors of resistance, is equal to the weight 
of a rod of water, eighteen cubits long and as thick as the copper 
rod. If, for example, copper is nine times as heavy as water, the 
breaking strength [resistenza allo strapparsi] of any copper rod, 
in so far as it depends upon the vacuum, is equal to the weight 
of two cubits of this same rod. By a similar method one can 

find 



i8 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

find the maximum length of wire or rod of any material which 
will just sustain its own weight, and can at the same time dis- 
cover the part which the vacuum plays in its breaking strength. 

SAGR. It still remains for you to tell us upon what depends 
the resistance to breaking, other than that of the vacuum; what 
is the gluey or viscous substance which cements together the 
parts of the solid? For I cannot imagine a glue that will not 
burn up in a highly heated furnace in two or three months, or 
certainly within ten or a hundred. For if gold, silver and glass 
are kept for a long while in the molten state and are removed 
from the furnace, their parts, on cooling, immediately reunite 
and bind themselves together as before. Not only so, but 
whatever difficulty arises with respect to the cementation of the 
parts of the glass arises also with regard to the parts of the glue; 
in other words, what is that which holds these parts together so 
firmly? 

[66] 

SALV. A little while ago, I expressed the hope that your good 
angel might assist you. I now find myself in the same straits. 
Experiment leaves no doubt that the reason why two plates 
cannot be separated, except with violent effort, is that they are 
held together by the resistance of the vacuum; and the same 
can be said of two large pieces of a marble or bronze column. 
This being so, I do not see why this same cause may not explain 
the coherence of smaller parts and indeed of the very smallest 
particles of these materials. Now, since each effect must have 
one true and sufficient cause and since I find no other cement, am 
I not justified in trying to discover whether the vacuum is not a 
sufficient cause? 

SIMP. But seeing that you have already proved that the re- 
sistance which the large vacuum offers to the separation of 
two large parts of a solid is really very small in comparison with 
that cohesive force which binds together the most minute parts, 
why do you hesitate to regard this latter as something very 
different from the former? 

SALV. Sagredo has already [p. 13 above] answered this ques- 
tion when he remarked that each individual soldier was being 

paid 



FIRST DAY 19 

paid from coin collected by a general tax of pennies and farth- 
ings, while even a million of gold would not suffice to pay the 
entire army. And who knows but that there may be other 
extremely minute vacua which affect the smallest particles so 
that that which binds together the contiguous parts is through- 
out of the same mintage? Let me tell you something which has 
just occurred to me and which I do not offer as an absolute fact, 
but rather as a passing thought, still immature and calling for 
more careful consideration. You may take of it what you like; 
and judge the rest as you see fit. Sometimes when I have ob- 
served how fire winds its way in between the most minute 
particles of this or that metal and, even though these are solidly 
cemented together, tears them apart and separates them, and 
when I have observed that, on removing the fire, these particles 
reunite with the same tenacity as at first, without any loss of 
quantity in the case of gold and with little loss in the case of 
other metals, even though these parts have been separated for a 
long while, I have thought that the explanation might lie in the 
fact that the extremely fine particles of fire, penetrating the 
slender pores of the metal (too small to admit even the finest 
particles of air or of many other fluids), would fill the small 
intervening vacua and would set free these small particles from 
the attraction which these same vacua exert upon them and 
which prevents their separation. Thus the particles are able to 

[67] 

move freely so that the mass [massa] becomes fluid and remains 
so as long as the particles of fire remain inside; but if they depart 
and leave the former vacua then the original attraction [attraz- 
zione] returns and the parts are again cemented together. 

In reply to the question raised by Simplicio, one may say that 
although each particular vacuum is exceedingly minute and 
therefore easily overcome, yet their number is so extraordinarily 
great that their combined resistance is, so to speak, multipled 
almost without limit. The nature and the amount of force 
\Jorza] which results [risulta] from adding together an immense 
number of small forces [debolissimi momenti] is clearly illus- 
trated by the fact that a weight of millions of pounds, suspended 

by 



20 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

by great cables, is overcome and lifted, when the south wind 
carries innumerable atoms of water, suspended in thin mist, 
which moving through the air penetrate between the fibres of the 
tense ropes in spite of the tremendous force of the hanging 
weight. When these particles enter the narrow pores they 
swell the ropes, thereby shorten them, and perforce lift the 
heavy mass [mole]. 

SAGR. There can be no doubt that any resistance, so long as 
it is not infinite, may be overcome by a multitude of minute 
forces. Thus a vast number of ants might carry ashore a ship 
laden with grain. And since experience shows us daily that 
one ant can easily carry one grain, it is clear that the number of 
grains in the ship is not infinite, but falls below a certain limit. 
If you take another number four or six times as great, and if 
you set to work a corresponding number of ants they will carry 
the grain ashore and the boat also. It is true that this will call 
for a prodigious number of ants, but in my opinion this is pre- 
cisely the case with the vacua which bind together the least 
particles of a metal. 

SALV. But even if this demanded an infinite number would 
you still think it impossible? 

SAGR. Not if the mass [mole] of metal were infinite; other- 
wise. . . . 

[68] 

SALV. Otherwise what? Now since we have arrived at 
paradoxes let us see if we cannot prove that within a finite ex- 
tent it is possible to discover an infinite number of vacua. At the 
same time we shall at least reach a solution of the most remark- 
able of all that list of problems which Aristotle himself calls 
wonderful; I refer to his Questions in Mechanics. This solution 
may be no less clear and conclusive than that which he himself 
gives and quite different also from that so cleverly expounded by 
the most learned Monsignor di Guevara.* 

First it is necessary to consider a proposition, not treated by 

others, but upon which depends the solution of the problem and 

from which, if I mistake not, we shall derive other new and 

remarkable facts. For the sake of clearness let us draw an 

* Bishop of Teano; b. 1561, d. 1641. [Trans.] 



FIRST DAY 21 

accurate figure. About G as a center describe an equiangular 
and equilateral polygon of any number of sides, say the hexagon 
ABCDEF. Similar to this and concentric with it, describe 
another smaller one which we shall call HIKLMN. Prolong the 




Y Z 




F 



Fig. 5 

side AB, of the larger hexagon, indefinitely toward S; in like 
manner prolong the corresponding side HI of the smaller hex- 
agon, in the same direction, so that the line HT is parallel to 
AS; and through the center draw the line GV parallel to the 
other two. This done, imagine the larger polygon to roll upon 

[69] 

the line AS, carrying with it the smaller polygon. It is evident 
that, if the point B, the end of the side AB, remains fixed at the 
beginning of the rotation, the point A will rise and the point C 
will fall describing the arc CQ until the side BC coincides with 
the line BQ, equal to BC. But during this rotation the point I, 
on the smaller polygon, will rise above the line IT because IB is 
oblique to AS ; and it will not again return to the line IT until the 
point C shall have reached the position Q. The point I, having 
described the arc IO above the line HT, will reach the position 

Oat 



22 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

O at the same time the side IK assumes the position OP; but in 
the meantime the center G has traversed a path above GV and 
does not return to it until it has completed the arc GC. This 
step having been taken, the larger polygon has been brought to 
rest with its side BC coinciding with the line BQ while the side 
IK of the smaller polygon has been made to coincide with the 
line OP, having passed over the portion IO without touching it; 
also the center G will have reached the position C after having 
traversed all its course above the parallel line GV. And finally 
the entire figure will assume a position similar to the first, so 
that if we continue the rotation and come to the next step, the 
side DC of the larger polygon will coincide with the portion QX 
and the side KL of the smaller polygon, having first skipped the 
arc PY, will fall on YZ, while the center still keeping above the 
line GV will return to it at R after having jumped the interval 
CR. At the end of one complete rotation the larger polygon will 
have traced upon the line AS, without break, six lines together 
equal to its perimeter; the lesser polygon will likewise have 
imprinted six lines equal to its perimeter, but separated by the 
interposition of five arcs, whose chords represent the parts 
of HT not touched by the polygon : the center G never reaches 
the line GV except at six points. From this it is clear that the 
space traversed by the smaller polygon is almost equal to that 
traversed by the larger, that is, the line HT approximates the 
line AS, differing from it only by the length of one chord of one 
of these arcs, provided we understand the line HT to include the 
five skipped arcs. 

Now this exposition which I have given in the case of these 
hexagons must be understood to be applicable to all other 
polygons, whatever the number of sides, provided only they are 

[70] 

similar, concentric, and rigidly connected, so that when the 
greater one rotates the lesser will also turn however small it may 
be. You must also understand that the lines described by these 
two are nearly equal provided we include in the space traversed 
by the smaller one the intervals which are not touched by any 
part of the perimeter of this smaller polygon. 

Let 



FIRST DAY 23 

Let a large polygon of, say, one thousand sides make one 
complete rotation and thus lay off a line equal to its perimeter; 
at the same time the small one will pass over an approximately 
equal distance, made up of a thousand small portions each 
equal to one of its sides, but interrupted by a thousand spaces 
which, in contrast with the portions that coincide with the sides 
of the polygon, we may call empty. So far the matter is free 
from difficulty or doubt. 

But now suppose that about any center, say A, we describe 
two concentric and rigidly connected circles; and suppose that 
from the points C and B, on their radii, there are drawn the 
tangents CE and BF and that through the center A the line AD 
is drawn parallel to them, then if the large circle makes one 
complete rotation along the line BF, equal not only to its cir- 
cumference but also to the other two lines CE and AD, tell me 
what the smaller circle will do and also what the center will do. 
As to the center it will certainly traverse and touch the entire 
line AD while the circumference of the smaller circle will have 
measured off by its points of contact the entire line CE, just as 
was done by the above mentioned polygons. The only difference 
is that the line HT was not at every point in contact with the 
perimeter of the smaller polygon, but there were left untouched 
as many vacant spaces as there were spaces coinciding with the 
sides. But here in the case of the circles the circumference of the 
smaller one never leaves the line CE, so that no part of the latter 
is left untouched, nor is there ever a time when some point on the 
circle is not in contact with the straight line. How now can the 
smaller circle traverse a length greater than its circumference 
unless it go by jumps ? 

SAGR. It seems to me that one may say that just as the center 
of the circle, by itself, carried along the line AD is constantly in 
contact with it, although it is only a single point, so the points on 
the circumference of the smaller circle, carried along by the 
motion of the larger circle, would slide over some small parts of 
the line CE. 



SALV. There are two reasons why this cannot happen. First 

because 



24 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

because there is no ground for thinking that one point of con- 
tact, such as that at C, rather than another, should slip over 
certain portions of the line CE. But if such slidings along CE 
did occur they would be infinite in number since the points of 
contact (being mere points) are infinite in number: an infinite 
number of finite slips will however make an infinitely long line, 
while as a matter of fact the line CE is finite. The other reason 
is that as the greater circle, in its rotation, changes its point of 
contact continuously the lesser circle must do the same because 
B is the only point from which a straight line can be drawn to A 
and pass through C. Accordingly the small circle must change 
its point of contact whenever the large one changes : no point of 
the small circle touches the straight line CE in more than one 
point. Not only so, but even in the rotation of the polygons 
there was no point on the perimeter of the smaller which coin- 
cided with more than one point on the line traversed by that 
perimeter; this is at once clear when you remember that the 
line IK is parallel to BC and that therefore IK will remain above 
IP until BC coincides with BQ, and that IK will not lie upon IP 
except at the very instant when BC occupies the position BQ; at 
this instant the entire line IK coincides with OP and immediately 
afterwards rises above it. 

SAGR. This is a very intricate matter. I see no solution. Pray 
explain it to us. 

SALV. Let us return to the consideration of the above men- 
tioned polygons whose behavior we already understand. Now 
in the case of polygons with 100000 sides, the line traversed by 
the perimeter of the greater, i. e., the line laid down by its 
100000 sides one after another, is equal to the line traced out by 
the 100000 sides of the smaller, provided we include the 100000 
vacant spaces interspersed. So in the case of the circles, poly- 
gons having an infinitude of sides, the line traversed by the 
continuously distributed [continuamente disposti] infinitude of 
sides is in the greater circle equal to the line laid down by the 
infinitude of sides in the smaller circle but with the exception 
that these latter alternate with empty spaces; and since the 
sides are not finite in number, but infinite, so also are the inter- 
vening 



FIRST DAY 25 

vening empty spaces not finite but infinite. The line traversed 
by the larger circle consists then of an infinite number of points 
which completely fill it; while that which is traced by the smaller 
circle consists of an infinite number of points which leave empty 
spaces and only partly fill the line. And here I wish you to 
observe that after dividing and resolving a line into a finite 
number of parts, that is, into a number which can be counted, it 

[72] . 

is not possible to arrange them again into a greater length than 
that which they occupied when they formed a continuum [con- 
tinuate] and were connected without the interposition of as 
many empty spaces. But if we consider the line resolved into 
an infinite number of infinitely small and indivisible parts, we 
shall be able to conceive the line extended indefinitely by the 
interposition, not of a finite, but of an infinite number of in- 
finitely small indivisible empty spaces. 

Now this which has been said concerning simple lines must be 
understood to hold also in the case of surfaces and solid bodies, 
it being assumed that they are made up of an infinite, not a 
finite, number of atoms. Such a body once divided into a 
finite number of parts it is impossible to reassemble them so as to 
occupy more space than before unless we interpose a finite 
number of empty spaces, that is to say, spaces free from the 
substance of which the solid is made. But if we imagine the 
body, by some extreme and final analysis, resolved into its 
primary elements, infinite in number, then we shall be able to 
think of them as indefinitely extended in space, not by the 
interposition of a finite, but of an infinite number of empty 
spaces. Thus one can easily imagine a small ball of gold ex- 
panded into a very large space without the introduction of a 
finite number of empty spaces, always provided the gold is 
made up of an infinite number of indivisible parts. 

SIMP. It seems to me that you are travelling along toward 
those vacua advocated by a certain ancient philosopher. 

SALV. But you have failed to add, "who denied Divine Provi- 
dence," an inapt remark made on a similar occasion by a cer- 
tain antagonist of our Academician. 

Simp. 



26 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

SIMP. I noticed, and not without indignation, the rancor of 
this ill-natured opponent; further references to these affairs I 
omit, not only as a matter of good form, but also because I 
know how unpleasant they are to the good tempered and well 
ordered mind of one so religious and pious, so orthodox and 
God-fearing as you. 

But to return to our subject, your previous discourse leaves 
with me many difficulties which I am unable to solve. First 
among these is that, if the circumferences of the two circles are 
equal to the two straight lines, CE and BF, the latter con- 
sidered as a continuum, the former as interrupted with an in- 
finity of empty points, I do not see how it is possible to say that 
the line AD described by the center, and made up of an infinity 
of points, is equal to this center which is a single point. Besides, 
this building up of lines out of points, divisibles out of indivisi- 
bles, and finites out of infinites, offers me an obstacle difficult to 
avoid; and the necessity of introducing a vacuum, so conclu- 
sively refuted by Aristotle, presents the same difficulty. 

[73] 

SALV. These difficulties are real; and they are not the only 
ones. But let us remember that we are dealing with infinities 
and indivisibles, both of which transcend our finite under- 
standing, the former on account of their magnitude, the latter 
because of their smallness. In spite of this, men cannot refrain 
from discussing them, even though it must be done in a round- 
about way. 

Therefore I also should like to take the liberty to present some 
of my ideas which, though not necessarily convincing, would, 
on account of their novelty, at least, prove somewhat startling. 
But such a diversion might perhaps carry us too far away from 
the subject under discussion and might therefore appear to you 
inopportune and not very pleasing. 

SAGR. Pray let us enjoy the advantages and privileges which 
come from conversation between friends, especially upon sub- 
jects freely chosen and not forced upon us, a matter vastly 
different from dealing with dead books which give rise to many 
doubts but remove none. Share with us, therefore, the thoughts 



FIRST DAY 27 

which our discussion has suggested to you; for since we are free 
from urgent business there will be abundant time to pursue the 
topics already mentioned; and in particular the objections 
raised by Simplicio ought not in any wise to be neglected. 

SALV. Granted, since you so desire. The first question was, 
How can a single point be equal to a line? Since I cannot do 
more at present I shall attempt to remove, or at least diminish, 
one improbability by introducing a similar or a greater one, 
just as sometimes a wonder is diminished by a miracle.* 

And this I shall do by showing you two equal surfaces, to- 
gether with two equal solids located upon these same surfaces 
as bases, all four of which diminish continuously and uniformly 
in such a way that their remainders always preserve equality 
among themselves, and finally both the surfaces and the solids 
terminate their previous constant equality by degenerating, the 
one solid and the one surface into a very long line, the other 
solid and the other surface into a single point; that is, the 
latter to one point, the former to an infinite number of points. 

(74) 

SAGR. This proposition appears to me wonderful, indeed; 
but let us hear the explanation and demonstration. 

SALV. Since the proof is purely geometrical we shall need 
a figure. Let AFB be a semicircle with center at C; about it 
describe the rectangle ADEB and from the center draw the 
straight lines CD and CE to the points D and E. Imagine the 
radius CF to be drawn perpendicular to either of the lines AB or 
DE, and the entire figure to rotate about this radius as an axis. 
It is clear that the rectangle ADEB will thus describe a cylinder, 
the semicircle AFB a hemisphere, and the triangle CDE, a cone. 
Next let us remove the hemisphere but leave the cone and the 
rest of the cylinder, which, on account of its shape, we will call a 
"bowl." First we shall prove that the bowl and the cone are 
equal; then we shall show that a plane drawn parallel to the circle 
which forms the base of the bowl and which has the line DE for 
diameter and F for a center a plane whose trace is GN cuts 
the bowl in the points G, I, O, N, and the cone in the points H, L, 
so that the part of the cone indicated by CHL is always equal to 
* C/. p. 30 below. [Trans.] 




28 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the part of the bowl whose profile is represented by the triangles 

GAI and BON. Besides this we shall prove that the base of the 

cone, i. e., the circle whose diameter is HL, is equal to the circular 

^ B surface which forms the base of 

this portion of the bowl, or as 
one might say, equal to a ribbon 
N whose width is GI. (Note by 
the way the nature of mathe- 
matical definitions which con- 
sist merely in the imposition of 
names or, if you prefer, abbrevi- 
Fig. 6 ations of speech established and 

introduced in order to avoid the tedious drudgery which you 
and I now experience simply because we have not agreed 
to call this surface a "circular band" and that sharp solid 
portion of the bowl a "round razor.") Now call them by 

[75] 

what name you please, it suffices to understand that the plane, 
drawn at any height whatever, so long as it is parallel to 
the base, i. e., to the circle whose diameter is DE, always cuts 
the two solids so that the portion CHL of the cone is equal to the 
upper portion of the bowl; likewise the two areas which are the 
bases of these solids, namely the band and the circle HL, are also 
equal. Here we have the miracle mentioned above; as the cut- 
ting plane approaches the line AB the portions of the solids cut 
off are always equal, so also the areas of their bases. And as the 
cutting plane comes near the top, the two solids (always equal) 
as well as their bases (areas which are also equal) finally vanish, 
one pair of them degenerating into the circumference of a circle, 
the other into a single point, namely, the upper edge of the bowl 
and the apex of the cone. Now, since as these solids diminish 
equality is maintained between them up to the very last, we are 
justified in saying that, at the extreme and final end of this 
diminution, they are still equal and that one is not infinitely 
greater than the other. It appears therefore that we may 
equate the circumference of a large circle to a single point. And 
this which is true of the solids is true also of the surfaces which 

form 



FIRST DAY 29 

form their bases; for these also preserve equality between them- 
selves throughout their diminution and in the end vanish, the 
one into the circumference of a circle, the other into a single 
point. Shall we not then call them equal seeing that they are the 
last traces and remnants of equal magnitudes? Note also that, 
even if these vessels were large enough to contain immense 
celestial hemispheres, both their upper edges and the apexes of 
the cones therein contained would always remain equal and 
would vanish, the former into circles having the dimensions of 
the largest celestial orbits, the latter into single points. Hence 
in conformity with the preceding we may say that all circum- 
ferences of circles, however different, are equal to each other, 
and are each equal to a single point. 

SAGR. This presentation strikes me as so clever and novel 
that, even if I were able, I would not be willing to oppose it; 
for to deface so beautiful a structure by a blunt pedantic attack 
would be nothing short of sinful. But for our complete satisfac- 

[76] 

tion pray give us this geometrical proof that there is always 
equality between these solids and between their bases; for it 
cannot, I think, fail to be very ingenious, seeing how subtle is 
the philosophical argument based upon this result. 

SALV. The demonstration is both short and easy. Referring 
to the preceding figure, since IPC is a right angle the square of 
the radius 1C is equal to the sum of the squares on the two sides 
IP, PC; but the radius 1C is equal to AC and also to GP, while 
CP is equal to PH. Hence the square of the line GP is equal to 
the sum of the squares of IP and PH, or multiplying through by 
4, we have the square of the diameter GN equal to the sum of the 
squares on IO and HL. And, since the areas of circles are to 
each other as the squares of their diameters, it follows that the 
area of the circle whose diameter is GN is equal to the sum of the 
areas of circles having diameters IO and HL, so that if we remove 
the common area of the circle having IO for diameter the re- 
maining area of the circle GN will be equal to the area of the 
circle whose diameter is HL. So much for the first part. As for 
the other part, we leave its demonstration for the present, partly 

because 



3 o THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

because those who wish to follow it will find it in the twelfth 
proposition of the second book of De centra gravitatis solidorum 
by the Archimedes of our age, Luca Valerio,* who made use of it 
for a different object, and partly because, for our purpose, it 
suffices to have seen that the above-mentioned surfaces are 
always equal and that, as they keep on diminishing uniformly, 
they degenerate, the one into a single point, the other into the 
circumference of a circle larger than any assignable; in this fa eft 
lies our miracle. t 

SAGR. The demonstration is ingenious and the inferences 
drawn from it are remarkable. And now let us hear something 
concerning the other difficulty raised by Simplicio, if you have 
anything special to say, which, however, seems to me hardly 
possible, since the matter has already been so thoroughly dis- 
cussed. 

SALV. But I do have something special to say, and will first 
of all repeat what I said a little while ago, namely, that in- 
finity and indivisibility are in their very nature incomprehensi- 
ble to us; imagine then what they are when combined. Yet if 

[77] 

we wish to build up a line out of indivisible points, we must 
take an infinite number of them, and are, therefore, bound to 
understand both the infinite and the indivisible at the same 
time. Many ideas have passed through my mind concerning this 
subject, some of which, possibly the more important, I may not 
be able to recall on the spur of the moment; but in the course 
of our discussion it may happen that I shall awaken in you, and 
especially in Simplicio, objections and difficulties which in 
turn will bring to memory that which, without such stimulus, 
would have lain dormant in my mind. Allow me therefore the 
customary liberty of introducing some of our human fancies, for 
indeed we may so call them in comparison with supernatural 
truth which furnishes the one true and safe recourse for deci- 
sion in our discussions and which is an infallible guide in the 
dark and dubious paths of thought. 

* Distinguished Italian mathematician; born at Ferrara about 1552; 
admitted to the Accademia dei Lincei 1612; died 1618. [Trans.} 
f C/. p. 27 above. [Trans.} 



FIRST DAY 31 

One of the main objections urged against this building up 
of continuous quantities out of indivisible quantities [continue 
cT indwisibili\ is that the addition of one indivisible to an- 
other cannot produce a divisible, for if this were so it would 
render the indivisible divisible. Thus if two indivisibles, say 
two points, can be united to form a quantity, say a divisible 
line, then an even more divisible line might be formed by the 
union of three, five, seven, or any other odd number of points. 
Since however these lines can be cut into two equal parts, it 
becomes possible to cut the indivisible which lies exactly in the 
middle of the line. In answer to this and other objections of the 
same type we reply that a divisible magnitude cannot be con- 
structed out of two or ten or a hundred or a thousand indivisibles, 
but requires an infinite number of them. 

SIMP. Here a difficulty presents itself which appears to me 
insoluble. Since it is clear that we may have one line greater 
than another, each containing an infinite number of points, 
we are forced to admit that, within one and the same class, 
we may have something greater than infinity, because the in- 
finity of points in the long line is greater than the infinity of 
points in the short line. This assigning to an infinite quantity 
a value greater than infinity is quite beyond my comprehension. 

SALV. This is one of the difficulties which arise when we 
attempt, with our finite minds, to discuss the infinite, assigning 
to it those properties which we give to the finite and limited; but 

[78] 

this I think is wrong, for we cannot speak of infinite quantities 
as being the one greater or less than or equal to another. To 
prove this I have in mind an argument which, for the sake of 
clearness, I shall put in the form of questions to Simplicio who 
raised this difficulty. 

I take it for granted that you know which of the numbers are 
squares and which are not. 

SIMP. I am quite aware that a squared number is one which re- 
sults from the multiplication of another number by itself; thus 
4, 9, etc., are squared numbers which come from multiplying 2, 3, 
etc., by themselves. 

Salv. 



32 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

SALV. Very well; and you also know that just as the products 
are called squares so the fadlors are called sides or roots; while 
on the other hand those numbers which do not consist of two 
equal fadlors are not squares. Therefore if I assert that all 
numbers, including both squares and non-squares, are more 
than the squares alone, I shall speak the truth, shall I not? 

SIMP. Most certainly. 

SALV. If I should ask further how many squares there are one 
might reply truly that there are as many as the corresponding 
number of roots, since every square has its own root and every 
root its own square, while no square has more than one root 
and no root more than one square. 

SIMP. Precisely so. 

SALV. But if I inquire how many roots there are, it cannot 
be denied that there are as many as there are numbers because 
every number is a root of some square. This being granted 
we must say that there are as many squares as there are num- 
bers because they are just as numerous as their roots, and all 
the numbers are roots. Yet at the outset we said there are 
many more numbers than squares, since the larger portion of 
them are not squares. Not only so, but the proportionate 
number of squares diminishes as we pass to larger numbers. 
Thus up to 100 we have 10 squares, that is, the squares constitute 
i/io part of all the numbers; up to 10000, we find only i/ioo 

[79] 

part to be squares; and up to a million only i/iooo part; on the 
other hand in an infinite number, if one could conceive of such a 
thing, he would be forced to admit that there are as many 
squares as there are numbers all taken together. 

SAGR. What then must one conclude under these circum- 
stances ? 

SALV. So far^as I see we can only infer that the totality of 
all numbers is infinite, that the number of squares is infinite, 
and that the number of their roots is infinite; neither is the 
number of squares less than the totality of all numbers, nor 
the latter greater than the former; and finally the attributes 
"equal," "greater," and "less," are not applicable to infinite, 

but 



FIRST DAY 33 

but only to finite, quantities. When therefore Simplicio in- 
troduces several lines of different lengths and asks me how it 
is possible that the longer ones do not contain more points 
than the shorter, I answer him that one line does not contain 
more or less or just as many points as another, but that each 
line contains an infinite number. Or if I had replied to him 
that the points in one line were equal in number to the squares; 
in another, greater than the totality of numbers; and in the little 
one, as many as the number of cubes, might I not, indeed, have 
satisfied him by thus placing more points in one line than in 
another and yet maintaining an infinite number in each? So 
much for the first difficulty. 

SAGR. Pray stop a moment and let me add to what has al- 
ready been said an idea which just occurs to me. If the pre- 
ceding be true, it seems to me impossible to say either that one 
infinite number is greater than another or even that it is greater 
than a finite number, because if the infinite number were greater 
than, say, a million it would follow that on passing from the 
million to higher and higher numbers we would be approach- 
ing the infinite; but this is not so; on the contrary, the lar- 
ger the number to which we pass, the more we recede from 
[this property of] infinity, because the greater the numbers the 
fewer [relatively] are the squares contained in them; but the 
squares in infinity cannot be less than the totality of all the 
numbers, as we have just agreed; hence the approach to greater 
and greater numbers means a departure from infinity.* 

SALV. And thus from your ingenious argument we are led to 

[80] 

conclude that the attributes "larger," "smaller," and "equal" 
have no place either in comparing infinite quantities with each 
other or in comparing infinite with finite quantities. 

I pass now to another consideration. Since lines and all 
continuous quantities are divisible into parts which are them- 
selves divisible without end, I do not see how it is possible 

* A certain confusion of thought appears to be introduced here through 
a failure to distinguish between the number n and the class of the first n 
numbers; and likewise from a failure to distinguish infinity as a number 
from infinity as the class of all numbers. [Trans.] 



34 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

to avoid the conclusion that these lines are built up of an in- 
finite number of indivisible quantities because a division and a 
subdivision which can be carried on indefinitely presupposes 
that the parts are infinite in number, otherwise the subdivision 
would reach an end; and if the parts are infinite in number, we 
must conclude that they are not finite in size, because an in- 
finite number of finite quantities would give an infinite magni- 
tude. And thus we have a continuous quantity built up of an 
infinite number of indivisibles. 

SIMP. But if we can carry on indefinitely the division into 
finite parts what necessity is there then for the introduction 
of non-finite parts? 

SALV. The very fact that one is able to continue, without 
end, the division into finite parts [in parti quante] makes it nec- 
essary to regard the quantity as composed of an infinite num- 
ber of immeasurably small elements [di infiniti non quanti}. 
Now in order to settle this matter I shall ask you to tell me 
whether, in your opinion, a continuum is made up of a finite 
or of an infinite number of finite parts [parti quante]. 

SIMP. My answer is that their number is both infinite and 
finite; potentially infinite but actually finite [infinite, in po- 
tenza; e finite, in atto] ; that is to say, potentially infinite before 
division and actually finite after division; because parts cannot 
be said to exist in a body which is not yet divided or at least 
marked out; if this is not done we say that they exist potentially. 

SALV. So that a line which is, for instance, twenty spans 
long is not said to contain actually twenty lines each one span 
in length except after division into twenty equal parts; before 
division it is said to contain them only potentially. Suppose 
the facts are as you say; tell me then whether, when the division 
is once made, the size of the original quantity is thereby in- 
creased, diminished, or unaffected. 

SIMP. It neither increases nor diminishes. 

SALV. That is my. opinion also. Therefore the finite parts 
[parti quante] in a continuum, whether adlually or potentially 
present, do not make the quantity either larger or smaller; but 
it is perfectly clear that, if the number of finite parts actually 

contained 



FIRST DAY 35 

contained in the whole is infinite in number, they will make the | 
magnitude infinite. Hence the number of finite parts, although 
existing only potentially, cannot be infinite unless the magnitude 
containing them be infinite; and conversely if the magnitude is ; 

PI] 

finite it cannot contain an infinite number of finite parts either 
actually or potentially. 

SAGR. How then is it possible to divide a continuum without 
limit into parts which are themselves always capable of subdivi- 
sion ? 

SALV. This distinction of yours between actual and potential 
appears to render easy by one method what would be impossible 
by another. But I shall endeavor to reconcile these mattersx 
in another way; and as to the query whether the finite parts * 
of a limited continuum [continuo terminate] are finite or in- 
finite in number I will, contrary to the opinion of Simplicio, , 
answer that they are neither finite nor infinite. 

SIMP. This answer would never have occurred to me since I 
did not think that there existed any intermediate step between 
the finite and the infinite, so that the classification or distinc- 
tion which assumes that a thing must be either finite or infinite 
is faulty and defective. 

SALV. So it seems to me. And if we consider discrete quanti- 
ties I think there is, between finite and infinite quantities, a 
third intermediate term which corresponds to every assigned 
number; so that if asked, as in the present case, whether the 
finite parts of a continuum are finite or infinite in number the 
best reply is that they are neither finite nor infinite but corre- 
spond to every assigned number. In order that this may be 
possible, it is necessary that those parts should not be included 
within a limited number, for in that case they would not corre- 
spond to a number which is greater; nor can they be infinite in 
number since no assigned number is infinite; and thus at the 
pleasure of the questioner we may, to any given line, assign a 
hundred finite parts, a thousand, a hundred thousand, or indeed 
any number we may please so long as it be not infinite. I grant, 
therefore, to the philosophers, that the continuum contains as ' 

many 



36 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

many finite parts as they please and I concede also that it con- 
tains them, either actually or potentially, as they may like; but 
I must add that just as a line ten fathoms [canne] in length con- 
tains ten lines each of one fathom and forty lines each of one 
cubit [braccia] and eighty lines each of half a cubit, etc., so it 
contains an infinite number of points; call them actual or po- 
tential, as you like, for as to this detail, Simplicio, I defer to your 
opinion and to your judgment. 

[82] 

SIMP. I cannot help admiring your discussion; but I fear 
that this parallelism between the points and the finite parts 
contained in a line will not prove satisfactory, and that you will 
not find it so easy to divide a given line into an infinite num- 
ber of points as the philosophers do to cut it into ten fathoms or 
forty cubits; not only so, but such a division is quite impossible 
to realize in practice, so that this will be one of those poten- 
tialities which cannot be reduced to actuality. 

SALV. The fact that something can be done only with effort 
or diligence or with great expenditure of time does not render it 
impossible; for I think that you yourself could not easily divide 
a line into a thousand parts, and much less if the number of 
parts were 937 or any other large prime number. But if I 
were to accomplish this division which you deem impossible as 
readily as another person would divide the line into forty parts 
would you then be more willing, in our discussion, to concede the 
possibility of such a division ? 

SIMP. In general I enjoy greatly your method; and replying 
to your query, I answer that it would be more than sufficient 
if it prove not more difficult to resolve a line into points than to 
divide it into a thousand parts. 

SALV. I will now say something which may perhaps astonish 
you; it refers to the possibility of dividing a line into its in- 
finitely small elements by following the same order which one 
employs in dividing the same line into forty, sixty, or a hundred 
parts, that is, by dividing it into two, four, etc. He who thinks 
that, by following this method, he can reach an infinite number 
of points is greatly mistaken; for if this process were followed to 

eternity 






FIRST DAY 37 

eternity there would still remain finite parts which were un-| 
divided. 

Indeed by such a method one is very far from reaching the 
goal of indivisibility; on the contrary he recedes from it and 
while he thinks that, by continuing this division and by multi- 
plying the multitude of parts, he will approach infinity, he is, 
in my opinion, getting farther and farther away from it. My 
reason is this. In the preceding discussion we concluded that, 
in an infinite number, it is necessary that the squares and cubes 
should be as numerous as the totality of the natural numbers 
[tutti i numeri], because both of these are as numerous as their 
roots which constitute the totality of the natural numbers. 
Next we saw that the larger the numbers taken the more sparsely 
distributed were the squares, and still more sparsely the cubes; 
therefore it is clear that the larger the numbers to which we pass 
the farther we recede from the infinite number; hence it follows 

. [83] 

that, since this process carries us farther and farther from the a 
end sought, if on turning back we shall find that any number , 
can be said to be infinite, it must be unity. Here indeed are I 
satisfied all those conditions which are requisite for an infinite 
number; I mean that unity contains in itself as many squares as I 
there are cubes and natural numbers [tutti i numeri]. 

SIMP. I do not quite grasp the meaning of this. 

SALV. There is no difficulty in the matter because unity is at 
once a square, a cube, a square of a square and all the other 
powers [dignita] ; nor is there any essential peculiarity in squares 
or cubes which does not belong to unity; as, for example, the 
property of two square numbers that they have between them a 
mean proportional; take any square number you please as the 
first term and unity for the other, then you will always find a 
number which is a mean proportional. Consider the two square 
numbers, 9 and 4; then 3 is the mean proportional between 
9 and I ; while 2 is a mean proportional between 4 and I ; between 
9 and 4 we have 6 as a mean proportional. A property of cubes 
is that they must have between them two mean proportional 
numbers; take 8 and 27; between them lie 12 and 18; while 

between 



38 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

between I and 8 we have 2 and 4 intervening; and between I and 
27 there lie 3 and 9. Therefore we conclude that unity is the 
only infinite number. These are some of the marvels which our 
imagination cannot grasp and which should warn us against the 
serious error of those who attempt to discuss the infinite by 
assigning to it the same properties which we employ for the 
finite, the natures of the two having nothing in common. 

With regard to this subject I must tell you of a remarkable 
property which just now occurs to me and which will explain 
the vast alteration and change of character which a finite quan- 
tity would undergo in passing to infinity. Let us draw the 
straight line AB of arbitrary length and let the point C divide 
it into two unequal parts; then I say that, if pairs of lines be 
drawn, one from each of the terminal points A and B, and if 
the ratio between the lengths of these lines is the same as that 
between AC and CB, their points of intersection will all lie upon 
the circumference of one and the same circle. Thus, for ex- 

[84] 

ample, AL and BL drawn from A and B, meeting at the point L, 
bearing to one another the same ratio as AC to BC, and the 

pair AK and BK 
meeting at K also 
bearing to one an- 
other the same ratio, 
and likewise the pairs 
| E AI,BI,AH,BH,AG, 
BG, AF, BF, AE, 
BE, have their points 
of intersection L, K, 
I,H,G, F,E, allly- 
Fig. 7 ing upon the circum- 

ference of one and the same circle. Accordingly if we imagine 
the point C to move continuously in such a manner that the lines 
drawn from it to the fixed terminal points, A and B, always main- 
tain the same ratio between their lengths as exists between the 
original parts, AC and CB, then the point C will, as I shall pres- 
ently prove, describe a circle. And the circle thus described will 

increase 







FIRST DAY 39 

increase in size without limit as the point C approaches the mid- 
dle point which we may call O; but it will diminish in size as C 
approaches the end B. So that the infinite number of points lo- 
cated in the line OB will, if the motion be as explained above, de- 
scribe circles of every size, some smaller than the pupil of the eye 
of a flea, others larger than the celestial equator. Now if we move 
any of the points lying between the two ends O and B they will 
all describe circles, those nearest O, immense circles; but if we 
move the point O itself, and continue to move it according to 
the aforesaid law, namely, that the lines drawn from O to the 
terminal points, A and B, maintain the same ratio as the original 
lines AO and OB, what kind of a line will be produced ? A circle 
will be drawn larger than the largest of the others, a circle which 
is therefore infinite. But from the point O a straight line will also 
be drawn perpendicular to BA and extending to infinity with- 
out ever turning, as did the others, to join its last end with its 
first; for the point C, with its limited motion, having described 



the upper semi-circle, CHE, proceeds to describe the lower 
semicircle EMC, thus returning to the starting point. But the 
point O having started to describe its circle, as did all the other 
points in the line AB, (for the points in the other portion OA 
describe their circles also, the largest being those nearest the 
point O) is unable to return to its starting point because the 
circle it describes, being the largest of all, is infinite; in fact, it 
describes an infinite straight line as circumference of its infinite 
circle. Think now what a difference there is between a finite and 
an infinite circle since the latter changes character in such a 
manner that it loses not only its existence but also its possibility 
of existence; indeed, we already clearly understand that there 
can be no such thing as an infinite circle; similarly there can be 
no infinite sphere, no infinite body, and no infinite surface of 
any shape. Now what shall we say concerning this metamorpho- 
sis in the transition from finite to infinite? And why should we 
feel greater repugnance, seeing that, in our search after the 
infinite among numbers we found it in unity? Having broken 
up a solid into many parts, having reduced it to the finest of 

powder 



4 o THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

powder and having resolved it into its infinitely small indivisible 
atoms why may we not say that this solid has been reduced to a 
single continuum [un solo continuo] perhaps a fluid like water or 
mercury or even a liquified metal? And do we not see stones 
melt into glass and the glass itself under strong heat become more 
fluid than water? 

SAGR. Are we then to believe that substances become fluid in 
virtue of being resolved into their infinitely small indivisible 
components ? 

SALV. I am not able to find any better means of accounting 
for certain phenomena of which the following is one. When I 
take a hard substance such as stone or metal and when I reduce 
it by means of a hammer or fine file to the most minute and 
impalpable powder, it is clear that its finest particles, although 
when taken one by one are, on account of their smallness, im- 
perceptible to our sight and touch, are nevertheless finite in 
size, possess shape, and capability of being counted. It is also 
true that when once heaped up they remain in a heap ; and if an 
excavation be made within limits the cavity will remain and the 
surrounding particles will not rush in to fill it; if shaken the 
particles come to rest immediately after the external disturbing 
agent is removed; the same effects are observed in all piles of 

[86] 

larger and larger particles, of any shape, even if spherical, as is 
the case with piles of millet, wheat, lead shot, and every other 
material. But if we attempt to discover such properties in 
water we do not find them; for when once heaped up it imme- 
diately flattens out unless held up by some vessel or other exter- 
nal retaining body; when hollowed out it quickly rushes in to fill 
the cavity; and when disturbed it fluctuates for a long time 
and sends out its waves through great distances. 

Seeing that water has less firmness [consistenza] than the 
finest of powder, in fact has no consistence whatever, we may, 
it seems to me, very reasonably conclude that the smallest 
particles into which it can be resolved are quite different from 
finite and divisible particles; indeed the only difference I am 
able to discover is that the former are indivisible. The exquisite 

transparency 



FIRST DAY 41 

transparency of water also favors this view; for the most trans- 
parent crystal when broken and ground and reduced to powder 
loses its transparency; the finer the grinding the greater the loss; 
but in the case of water where the attrition is of the highest 
degree we have extreme transparency. Gold and silver when 
pulverized with acids [acque forti\ more finely than is possible 
with any file still remain powders,* and do not become fluids 
until the finest particles [gf indivisibili] of fire or of the rays of 
the sun dissolve them, as I think, into their ultimate, indivisible, 
and infinitely small components. 

SAGR. This phenomenon of light which you mention is one 
which I have many times remarked with astonishment. I have, 
for instance, seen lead melted instantly by means of a concave 
mirror only three hands \palmi\ in diameter. Hence I think 
that if the mirror were very large, well-polished and of a para- 
bolic figure, it would just as readily and quickly melt any other 
metal, seeing that the small mirror, which was not well polished 
and had only a spherical shape, was able so energetically to melt 
lead and burn every combustible substance. Such effects as 
these render credible to me the marvels accomplished by the 
mirrors of Archimedes. 

SALV. Speaking of the effects produced by the mirrors of 
Archimedes, it was his own books (which I had already read and 
studied with infinite astonishment) that rendered credible to me 
all the miracles described by various writers. And if any doubt 
had remained the book which Father Buenaventura Cavalierif 

[87] 

has recently published on the subject of the burning glass 
[specchio ustorio] and which I have read with admiration would 
have removed the last difficulty. 

SAGR. I also have seen this treatise and have read it with 

* It is not clear what Galileo here means by saying that gold and 
silver when treated with acids still remain powders. [Trans.] 

f One of the most active investigators among Galileo's contemporaries; 
born at Milan 1598; died at Bologna 1647; a Jesuit father, first to intro- 
duce the use of logarithms into Italy and first to derive the expression for 
the focal length of a lens having unequal radii of curvature. His " method 
of indivisibles" is to be reckoned as a precursor of the infinitesimal 
calculus. [Trans.] 



42 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

pleasure and astonishment; and knowing the author I was con- 
firmed in the opinion which I had already formed of him that 
he was destined to become one of the leading mathematicians 
of our age. But now, with regard to the surprising effect of 
solar rays in melting metals, must we believe that such a furious 
adlion is devoid of motion or that it is accompanied by the most 
rapid of motions ? 

SALV. We observe that other combustions and resolutions are 
accompanied by motion, and that, the most rapid; note the ac- 
tion of lightning and of powder as used in mines and petards; 
note also how the charcoal flame, mixed as it is with heavy and 
impure vapors, increases its power to liquify metals whenever 
quickened by a pair of bellows. Hence I do not understand how 
the adlion of light, although very pure, can be devoid of motion 
and that of the swiftest type. 

SAGR. But of what kind and how great must we consider this 
speed of light to be ? Is it instantaneous or momentary or does 
it like other motions require time? Can we not decide this by 
experiment? 

SIMP. Everyday experience shows that the propagation of 
light is instantaneous; for when we see a piece of artillery fired, 
at great distance, the flash reaches our eyes without lapse of 
time; but the sound reaches the ear only after a noticeable 
interval. 

SAGR. Well, Simplicio, the only thing I am able to infer from 
this familiar bit of experience is that sound, in reaching our 
ear, travels more slowly than light; it does not inform me whether 
the coming of the light is instantaneous or whether, although 
extremely rapid, it still occupies time. An observation of this 
kind tells us nothing more than one in which it is claimed that 
"As soon as the sun reaches the horizon its light reaches our 
eyes"; but who will assure me that these rays had not reached 
this limit earlier than they reached our vision ? 

SALV. The small conclusiveness of these and other similar 
observations once led me to devise a method by which one might 
accurately ascertain whether illumination, i. e., the propagation 
of light, is really instantaneous. The fact that the speed of 

sound 



FIRST DAY 43 

[88] 

sound is as high as it is, assures us that the motion of light 
cannot fail to be extraordinarily swift. The experiment which I 
devised was as follows : 

Let each of two persons take a light contained in a lantern, or 
other receptacle, such that by the interposition of the hand, the 
one can shut oft or admit the light to the vision of the other. 
Next let them stand opposite each other at a distance of a few 
cubits and practice until they acquire such skill in uncovering 
and occulting their lights that the instant one sees the light of his 
companion he will uncover his own. After a few trials the 
response will be so prompt that without sensible error [svario] 
the uncovering of one light is immediately followed by the un- 
covering of the other, so that as soon as one exposes his light he 
will instantly see that of the other. Having acquired skill at this 
short distance let the two experimenters, equipped as before, 
take up positions separated by a distance of two or three miles 
and let them perform the same experiment at night, noting care- 
fully whether the exposures and occultations occur in the same 
manner as at short distances; if they do, we may safely conclude 
that the propagation of light is instantaneous; but if time is 
required at a distance of three miles which, considering the 
going of one light and the coming of the other, really amounts 
to six, then the delay ought to be easily observable. If the 
experiment is to be made at still greater distances, say eight 
or ten miles, telescopes may be employed, each observer ad- 
justing one for himself at the place where he is to make the 
experiment at night; then although the lights are not large and 
are therefore invisible to the naked eye at so great a distance, 
they can readily be covered and uncovered since by aid of the 
telescopes, once adjusted and fixed, they will become easily 
visible. 

SAGR. This experiment strikes me as a clever and reliable in- 
vention. But tell us what you conclude from the results. 

SALV. In facl: I have tried the experiment only at a short 
distance, less than a mile, from which I have not been able to 
ascertain with certainty whether the appearance of the op- 
posite 



44 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

posite light was instantaneous or not; but if not instantaneous 
it is extraordinarily rapid I should call it momentary; and for 
the present I should compare it to motion which we see in the 
lightning flash between clouds eight or ten miles distant from us. 
We see the beginning of this light I might say its head and 

[89] 

source located at a particular place among the clouds; but it 
immediately spreads to the surrounding ones, which seems to be 
an argument that at least some time is required for propagation; 
for if the illumination were instantaneous and not gradual, we 
should not be able to distinguish its origin its center, so to 
speak from its outlying portions. What a sea we are grad- 
ually slipping into without knowing it! With vacua and in- 
finities and indivisibles and instantaneous motions, shall we 
ever be able, even by means of a thousand discussions, to reach 
dry land? 

SAGR. Really these matters lie far beyond our grasp. Just 
think; when we seek the infinite among numbers we find it in 
unity; that which is ever divisible is derived from indivisibles; 
the vacuum is found inseparably connected with the plenum; 
indeed the views commonly held concerning the nature of these 
matters are so reversed that even the circumference of a circle 
turns out to be an infinite straight line, a fact which, if my 
memory serves me correctly, you, Salviati, were intending to 
demonstrate geometrically. Please therefore proceed without 
further digression. 

SALV. I am at your service; but for the sake of greater clear- 
ness let me first demonstrate the following problem : 

Given a straight line divided into unequal parts which bear 
to each other any ratio whatever, to describe a circle such 
that two straight lines drawn from the ends of the given 
line to any point on the circumference will bear to each 
other the same ratio as the two parts of the given line, thus 
making those lines which are drawn from the same terminal 
points homologous. 

Let AB represent the given straight line divided into any two 
unequal parts by the point C; the problem is to describe a circle 

such 



FIRST DAY 



45 



such that two straight lines drawn from the terminal points, 
A and B, to any point on the circumference will bear to each 
other the same ratio as the part AC bears to BC, so that lines 
drawn from the same terminal points are homologous. About 
C as center describe a circle having the shorter part CB of the 
given line, as radius. Through A draw a straight line AD which 

[90] 

shall be tangent to the circle at D and indefinitely prolonged 
toward E. Draw the radius CD which will be perpendicular 
to AE. At B erect a perpendicular to AB; this perpendicular 
will intersect AE at 
some point since the 
angle at A is acute; 
call this point of in- 
tersection E, and 
from it draw a per- 
pendicular t o AE 
which will intersect 
AB prolonged in F. 
Now I say the two 
straight lines FE and 
FC are equal. For 
if we join E and C, 
we shall have two Fi S- 8 

triangles, DEC and BEC, in which the two sides of the one, 
DE and EC, are equal to the two sides of the other, BE 
and EC, both DE and EB being tangents to the circle DB 
while the bases DC and CB are likewise equal; hence the 
two angles, DEC and BEC, will be equal. Now since the 
angle BCE differs from a right angle by the angle CEB, and the 
angle CEF also differs from a right angle by the angle CED, and 
since these differences are equal, it follows that the angle FCE 
is equal to CEF ;' consequently the sides FE and FC are equal. 
If we describe a circle with F as center and FE as radius it will 
pass through the point C; let CEG be such a circle. This is the 
circle sought, for if we draw lines from the terminal points A and 
B to any point on its circumference they will bear to each other 

the 




46 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the same ratio as the two portions AC and BC which meet at the 
point C. This is manifest in the case of the two lines AE and 
BE, meeting at the point E, because the angle E of the triangle 
AEB is bisected by the line CE, and therefore AC : CB = AE : BE. 
The same may be proved of the two lines AG and BG terminat- 
ing in the point G. For since the triangles AFE and EFB are 
similar, we have AF:FE=EF:FB, or AF:FC=CF:FB, and 
dividendo AC : CF = CB : BF, or AC : FG = CB : BF ; also com- 
ponendo we have both AB : BG = CB : BF and AG : GB = CF : FB 
=AE:EB=AC:BC. Q. E. D. 



Take now any other point in the circumference, say H, 
where the two lines AH and BH intersect; in like manner we 
shall have AC: CB=AH: HB. Prolong HB until it meets the 
circumference at I and join IF; and since we have already 
found that AB:BG=CB:BF it follows that the rectangle 
AB.BF is equal to the rectangle CB.BG or IB.BH. Hence AB : 
BH=IB:BF. But the angles at B are equal and therefore 
AH:HB=IF:FB=EF:FB=AE:EB. 

Besides, I may add, that it is impossible for lines which main- 
tain this same ratio and which are drawn from the terminal 
points, A and B, to meet at any point either inside or outside the 
circle, CEG. For suppose this were possible; let AL and BL be 
two such lines intersecting at the point L outside the circle: 
prolong LB till it meets the circumference at M and join MF. 
If AL:BL=AC:BC=MF:FB, then we shall have two tri- 
angles ALB and MFB which have the sides about the two 
angles proportional, the angles at the vertex, B, equal, and the 
two remaining angles, FMB and LAB, less than right angles 
(because the right angle at M has for its base the entire diameter 
CG and not merely a part BF: and the other angle at the point 
A is acute because the line AL, the homologue of AC, is greater 
than BL, the homologue of BC). From this it follows that the 
triangles ABL and MBF are similar and therefore AB:BL= 
MB:BF, making the rectangle AB.BF =MB.BL; but it has 
been demonstrated that the rectangle AB.BF is equal to CB.BG; 
whence it would follow that the rectangle MB.BL is equal to the 

rectangle 



FIRST DAY 47 

rectangle CB.BG which is impossible; therefore the intersection 
cannot fall outside the circle. And in like manner we can show 
that it cannot fall inside; hence all these intersections fall on the 
circumference. 

But now it is time for us to go back and grant the request of 
Simplicio by showing him that it is not only not impossible to 
resolve a line into an infinite number of points but that this is 
quite as easy as to divide it into its finite parts. This I will do 
under the following condition which I am sure, Simplicio, you 
will not deny me, namely, that you will not require me to sep- 
arate the points, one from the other, and show them to you, 

[92] 

one by one, on this paper; for I should be content that you, 
without separating the four or six parts of a line from one an- 
other, should show me the marked divisions or at most that you 
should fold them at angles forming a square or a hexagon: for, 
then, I am certain you would consider the division distinctly 
and actually accomplished. 

SIMP. I certainly should. 

SALV. If now the change which takes place when you bend a 
line at angles so as to form now a square, now an octagon, now a 
polygon of forty, a hundred or a thousand angles, is sufficient 
to bring into actuality the four, eight, forty, hundred, and 
thousand parts which, according to you, existed at first only 
potentially in the straight line, may I not say, with equal right, 
that, when I have bent the straight line into a polygon having an 
infinite number of sides, i. e., into a circle, I have reduced to 
actuality that infinite number of parts which you claimed, while 
it was straight, were contained in it only potentially? Nor can 
one deny that the division into an infinite number of points is 
just as truly accomplished as the one into four parts when the 
square is formed or into a thousand parts when the millagon is 
formed; for in such a division the same conditions are satisfied as 
in the case of a polygon of a thousand or a hundred thousand 
sides. Such a polygon laid upon a straight line touches it with 
one of its sides, i. e., with one of its hundred thousand parts; 
while the circle which is a polygon of an infinite number of sides 

touches 



48 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

touches the same straight line with one of its sides which is a 
single point different from all its neighbors and therefore sep- 
arate and distinct in no less degree than is one side of a polygon 
from the other sides. And just as a polygon, when rolled along 
a plane, marks out upon this plane, by the successive contacts 
of its sides, a straight line equal to its perimeter, so the circle 
rolled upon such a plane also traces by its infinite succession of 
contacts a straight line equal in length to its own circumference. 
I am willing, Simplicio, at the outset, to grant to the Peripatetics 
the truth of their opinion that a continuous quantity [it con- 
tinue] is divisible only into parts which are still further divisible 
so that however far the division and subdivision be continued no 
end will be reached; but I am not so certain that they will 
concede to me that none of these divisions of theirs can be a 
final one, as is surely the fact, because there always remains 
"another"; the final and ultimate division is rather one which 
resolves a continuous quantity into an infinite number of in- 
divisible quantities, a result which I grant can never be reached 
by successive division into an ever-increasing number of parts. 
But if they employ the method which I propose for separating 

[93] 

and resolving the whole of infinity \tutta la infinita], at a single 
stroke (an artifice which surely ought not to be denied me), 
I think that they would be contented to admit that a continuous 
quantity is built up out of absolutely indivisible atoms, es- 
pecially since this method, perhaps better than any other, 
enables us to avoid many intricate labyrinths, such as cohesion 
in solids, already mentioned, and the question of expansion and 
contraction, without forcing upon us the objectionable admission 
of empty spaces [in solids] which carries with it the penetrability 
of bodies. Both of these objections, it appears to me, are avoided 
if we accept the above-mentioned view of indivisible con- 
stituents. 

SIMP. I hardly know what the Peripatetics would say since 
the views advanced by you would strike them as mostly new, and 
as such we must consider them. It is however not unlikely that 
they would find answers and solutions for these problems which 

I? 






FIRST DAY 49 

I, for want of time and critical ability, am at present unable to 
solve. Leaving this to one side for the moment, I should like 
to hear how the introduction of these indivisible quantities 
helps us to understand contraction and expansion avoiding at 
the same time the vacuum and the penetrability of bodies. 

SAGR. I also shall listen with keen interest to this same matter 
which is far from clear in my mind; provided I am allowed to 
hear what, a moment ago, Simplicio suggested we omit, namely, 
the reasons which Aristotle offers against the existence of the 
vacuum and the arguments which you must advance in rebuttal. 

SALV. I will do both. And first, just as, for the production 
of expansion, we employ the line described by the small circle 
during one rotation of the large one a line greater than the 
circumference of the small circle so, in order to explain con- 
traction, we point out that, during each rotation of the smaller 
circle, the larger one describes a straight line which is shorter 
than its circumference. 

For the better understanding of this we proceed to the con- 
sideration of what happens in the case of polygons. Employing 

[94] 

a figure similar to the earlier one, construct the two hexagons, 
ABC and HIK, about the common center L, and let them roll 
along the parallel lines HOM and ABc. Now holding the vertex 
I fixed, allow the smaller polygon to rotate until the side IK 
lies upon the parallel, during which motion the point K will 
describe the arc KM, and the side KI will coincide with IM. 
Let us see what, in the meantime, the side CB of the larger 
polygon has been doing. Since the rotation is about the point I, 
the terminal point B, of the line IB, moving backwards, will 
describe the arc Eb underneath the parallel cA so that when the 
side KI coincides with the line MI, the side BC will coincide with 
be, having advanced only through the distance Br, but having 
retreated through a portion of the line BA which subtends the 
arc B&. If we allow the rotation of the smaller polygon to go on 
it will traverse and describe along its parallel a line equal to its 
perimeter; while the larger one will traverse and describe a line 
less than its perimeter by as many times the length bB as there 

are 



5 o THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

are sides less one; this line is approximately equal to that de- 
scribed by the smaller polygon exceeding it only by the distance 
bE. Here now we see, without any difficulty, why the larger 

polygon, when carried by 
the smaller, does not 
measure off with its sides 
a line longer than that 
traversed by the smaller 
one; this is because a por- 
tion of each side is super- 
posed upon its immedi- 
ately preceding neighbor. 
Let us next consider 
two circles, having a com- 
mon center at A, and ly- 
ing upon their respective 
parallels, the smaller be- 
ing tangent to its parallel 
at the point B ; the larger, 
at the point C. Here when 
the small circle commen- 
ces to roll the point B 

[95] 

does not remain at rest 
for a while so as to allow 
Fig. 9 BC to move backward 

and carry with it the point C, as happened in the case of the 
polygons, where the point I remained fixed until the side KI 
coincided with MI and the line IB carried the terminal point B 
backward as far as b, so that the side BC fell upon be, thus super- 
posing upon the line BA, the portion B&, and advancing by an 
amount Be, equal to MI, that is, to one side of the smaller 
polygon. On account of these superpositions, which are the 
excesses of the sides of the larger over the smaller polygon, each 
net advance is equal to one side of the smaller polygon and, dur- 
ing one complete rotation, these amount to a straight line equal 
in length to the perimeter of the smaller polygon. 

But 







FIRST DAY 51 

But now reasoning in the same way concerning the circles, 
we must observe that whereas the number of sides in any poly- 
gon is comprised within a certain limit, the number of sides in a 
circle is infinite; the former are finite and divisible; the latter 
infinite and indivisible. In the case of the polygon, the vertices 
remain at rest during an interval of time which bears to the 
period of one complete rotation the same ratio which one side 
bears to the perimeter; likewise, in the case of the circles, the 
delay of each of the infinite number of vertices is merely in- 
stantaneous, because an instant is such a fraction of a finite 
interval as a point is of a line which contains an infinite number 
of points. The retrogression of the sides of the larger polygon is 
not equal to the length of one of its sides but merely to the 
excess of such a side over one side of the smaller polygon, the 
net advance being equal to this smaller side; but in the circle, the 
point or side C, during the instantaneous rest of B, recedes by an 
amount equal to its excess over the side B, making a net progress 
equal to B itself. In short the infinite number of indivisible 
sides of the greater circle with their infinite number of indivisible 
retrogressions, made during the infinite number of instantaneous 
delays of the infinite number of vertices of the smaller circle, 
together with the infinite number of progressions, equal to the 
infinite number of sides in the smaller circle all these, I say, 
add up to a line equal to that described by the smaller circle, 
a line which contains an infinite number of infinitely small 
superpositions, thus bringing about a thickening or contraction 
without any overlapping or interpenetration of finite parts. 
This result could not be obtained in the case of a line divided 



. 

into finite parts such as is the perimeter of any polygon, which 
when laid out in a straight line cannot be shortened except by 
the overlapping and interpenetration of its sides. This contrac- 
tion of an infinite number of infinitely small parts without the 
interpenetration or overlapping of finite parts and the previously 
mentioned [p. 70, Nat. Ed.] expansion of an infinite number of 
indivisible parts by the interposition of indivisible vacua is, in 
my opinion, the most that can be said concerning the contraction 

and 



52 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

and rarefaction of bodies, unless we give up the impenetrability 
of matter and introduce empty spaces of finite size. If you find 
anything here that you consider worth while, pray use it; if not 
regard it, together with my remarks, as idle talk; but this 
remember, we are dealing with the infinite and the indivisible. 

SAGR. I frankly confess that your idea is subtle and that it 
impresses me as new and strange; but whether, as a matter of 
fact, nature actually behaves according to such a law I am 
unable to determine; however, until I find a more satisfactory 
explanation I shall hold fast to this one. Perhaps Simplicio 
can tell us something which I have not yet heard, namely, how 
to explain the explanation which the philosophers have given 
of this abstruse matter; for, indeed, all that I have hitherto 
read concerning contraction is so dense and that concerning ex- 
pansion so thin that my poor brain can neither penetrate the 
former nor grasp the latter. 

SIMP. I am all at sea and find difficulties in following either 
path, especially this new one; because according to this theory 
an ounce of gold might be rarefied and expanded until its size 
would exceed that of the earth, while the earth, in turn, might be 
condensed and reduced until it would become smaller than a 
walnut, something which I do not believe; nor do I believe that 
you believe it. The arguments and demonstrations which you 
have advanced are mathematical, abstract, and far removed 
from concrete matter; and I do not believe that when applied to 
the physical and natural world these laws will hold. 

SALV. I am not able to render the invisible visible, nor do 
I think that you will ask this. But now that you mention gold, 
do not our senses tell us that that metal can be immensely ex- 
panded ? I do not know whether you have observed the method 

[97] 

employed by those who are skilled in drawing gold wire, of which 
really only the surface is gold, the inside material being silver. 
The way they draw it is as follows: they take a cylinder or, if 
you please, a rod of silver, about half a cubit long and three or 
four times as wide as one's thumb; this rod they cover with 
gold-leaf which is so thin that it almost floats in air, putting on 

not 



FIRST DAY 53 

not more than eight or ten thicknesses. Once gilded they begin 
to pull it, with great force, through the holes of a draw-plate; 
again and again it is made to pass through smaller and smaller 
holes, until, after very many passages, it is reduced to the 
fineness of a lady's hair, or perhaps even finer; yet the surface 
remains gilded. Imagine now how the substance of this gold has 
been expanded and to what fineness it has been reduced. 

SIMP. I do not see that this process would produce, as a 
consequence, that marvellous thinning of the substance of the 
gold which you suggest: first, because the original gilding con- 
sisting of ten layers of gold-leaf has a sensible thickness; secondly, 
because in drawing out the silver it grows in length but at the 
same time diminishes proportionally in thickness; and, since 
one dimension thus compensates the other, the area will not be 
so increased as to make it necessary during the process of gilding 
to reduce the thinness of the gold beyond that of the original 
leaves. 

SALV. You are greatly mistaken, Simplicio, because the sur- 
face increases directly as the square root of the length, a fact 
which I can demonstrate geometrically. 

SAGR. Please give us the demonstration not only for my own 
sake but also for Simplicio provided you think we can under- 
stand it. , 

SALV. I'll see if I can recall it on the spur of the moment. 
At the outset, it is clear that the original thick rod of silver and 
the wire drawn out to an enormous length are two cylinders of 
the same volume, since they are the same body of silver. So 

[98] 

that, if I determine the ratio between the surfaces of cylinders of 
the same volume, the problem will be solved. I say then, 

The areas of cylinders of equal volumes, neglecting the 
bases, bear to each other a ratio which is the square root 
of the ratio of their lengths. 

Take two cylinders of equal volume having the altitudes AB 
and CD, between which the line E is a mean proportional. Then 
I claim that, omitting the bases of each cylinder, the surface of 
the cylinder AB is to that of the cylinder CD as the length AB 

is 



54 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

is to the line E, that is, as the square root of AB is to the square 
root of CD. Now cut off the cylinder AB at F so that the alti- 
tude AF is equal to CD. Then since the bases of cylinders of 
equal volume bear to one another the inverse ratio of their 
heights, it follows that the area of the circular base of the 
cylinder CD will be to the area of the circular base of AB as the 
altitude BA is to DC: moreover, since circles are to one another 
as the squares of their diameters, the said squares will be to 
each other as BA is to CD. But BA is to CD as the square of 
BA is to the square of E : and, therefore, these 

'"""""^ four squares will form a proportion; and like- 
wise their sides; so the line AB is to E as the 
diameter of circle C is to the diameter of the 
circle A. But the diameters are proportional 
to the circumferences and the circumferences 
are proportional to the areas of cylinders of 
equal height; hence the line AB is to E as the 
surface of the cylinder CD is to the surface of 
the cylinder AF. Now since the height AF is to 
AB as the surface of AF is to the surface of AB; 
and since the height AB is to the line E as the 
m surface CD is to AF, it follows, ex cequali in 

Fig. 10 proportione perturbata* that the height AF is 
to E as the surface CD is to the surface AB, and convertendo, 
the surface of the cylinder AB is to the surface of the cyl- 
inder CD as the line E is to AF, i. e., to CD, or as AB is to 
E which is the square root of the ratio of AB to CD. Q. E. D. 

If now we apply these results to the case in hand, and assume 
that the silver cylinder at the time of gilding had a length of 
only half a cubit and a thickness three or four times that of 

[99] 

one's thumb, we shall find that, when the wire has been reduced 
to the fineness of a hair and has been drawn out to a length of 
twenty thousand cubits (and perhaps more), the area of its 
surface will have been increased not less than two hundred 
times. Consequently the ten leaves of gold which were laid on 

* See Euclid, Book V, Def. 20., Todhunter's Ed., p. 137 (London, 1877.) 

[Trans] 



FIRST DAY 55 

have been extended over a surface two hundred times greater, 
assuring us that the thickness of the gold which now covers the 
surface of so many cubits of wire cannot be greater than one 
twentieth that of an ordinary leaf of beaten gold. Consider 
now what degree of fineness it must have and whether one could 
conceive it to happen in any other way than by enormous ex- 
pansion of parts; consider also whether this experiment does not 
suggest that physical bodies [materie fisiche] are composed of 
infinitely small indivisible particles, a view which is supported 
by other more striking and conclusive examples. 

SAGR. This demonstration is so beautiful that, even if it does 
not have the cogency originally intended, although to my 
mind, it is very forceful the short time devoted to it has 
nevertheless been most happily spent. 

SALV. Since you are so fond of these geometrical demonstra- 
tions, which carry with them distinct gain, I will give you a 
companion theorem which answers an extremely interesting 
query. We have seen above what relations hold between equal 
cylinders of different height or length; let us now see what holds 
when the cylinders are equal in area but unequal in height, 
understanding area to include the curved surface, but not the 
upper and lower bases. The theorem is : 

The volumes of right cylinders having equal curved sur- 
faces are inversely proportional to their altitudes. 
Let the surfaces of the two cylinders, AE and CF, be equal but 
let the height of the latter, CD, be greater than that of the 
former, AB : then I say that the volume of the cylinder AE is 
to that of the cylinder CF as the height CD is to AB. Now 
since the surface of CF is equal to the surface of AE, it fol- 
lows that the volume of CF is less than that of AE; for, if they 
were equal, the surface of CF would, by the preceding proposi- 
tion, exceed that of AE, and the excess would be so much the 
greater if the volume of the cylinder CF were greater than that 

[100] 

of AE. Let us now take a cylinder ID having a volume equal to 
that of AE; then, according to the preceding theorem, the sur- 
face of the cylinder ID is to the surface of AE as the altitude 

IF 



56 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

IF is to the mean proportional between IF and AB. But since 
one datum of the problem is that the surface of AE is equal 
to that of CF, and since the surface ID is to the surface CF 
as the altitude IF is to the altitude CD, it follows that CD is a 
^ ^ mean proportional between IF and AB. 
Not only so, but since the volume of the 
cylinder ID is equal to that of AE, each 
will bear the same ratio to the volume of 
the cylinder CF; but the volume ID is to 
the volume CF as the altitude IF is to the 
altitude CD; hence the volume of AE is 
to the volume of CF as the length IF is 
to the length CD, that is, as the length CD 
is to the length AB. Q. E. D. 

This explains a phenomenon upon which 
the common people always look with 
wonder, namely, if we have a piece of stuff 
which has one side longer than the other, 
we can make from it a cornsack, using the 
customary wooden base, which will hold 
more when the short side of the cloth is 
used for the height of the sack and the long 
side is wrapped around the wooden base, 
than with the alternative arrangement. So that, for instance, 
from a piece of cloth which is six cubits on one side and twelve 
on the other, a sack can be made which will hold more when the 
side of twelve cubits is wrapped around the wooden base, leav- 
ing the sack six cubits high than when the six cubit side is 
put around the base making the sack twelve cubits high. From 
what has been proven above we learn not only the general fact 
that one sack holds more than the other, but we also get specific 
and particular information as to how much more, namely, 
just in proportion as the altitude of the sack diminishes the 
contents increase and vice versa. Thus if we use the figures 
given which make the cloth twice as long as wide and if we use 
the long side for the seam, the volume of the sack will be just 
one-half as great as with the opposite arrangement. Likewise 

if 



IJ 



FIRST DAY 57 

[101] 

if we have a piece of matting which measures 7 x 25 cubits and 
make from it a basket, the contents of the basket will, when the 
seam is lengthwise, be seven as compared with twenty-five when 
the seam runs endwise. 

SAGR. It is with great pleasure that we continue thus to ac- 
quire new and useful information. But as regards the subject 
just discussed, I really believe that, among those who are not 
already familiar with geometry, you would scarcely find four per- 
sons in a hundred who would not, at first sight, make the mistake 
of believing that bodies having equal surfaces would be equal in 
other respects. Speaking of areas, the same error is made when 
one attempts, as often happens, to determine the sizes of various 
cities by measuring their boundary lines, forgetting that the 
circuit of one may be equal to the circuit of another while the 
area of the one is much greater than that of the other. And 
this is true not only in the case of irregular, but also of regular 
surfaces, where the polygon having the greater number of sides 
always contains a larger area than the one with the less number 
of sides, so that finally the circle which is a polygon of an in- 
finite number of sides contains the largest area of all polygons of 
equal perimeter. I remember with particular pleasure having 
seen this demonstration when I was studying the sphere of 
Sacrobosco * with the aid of a learned commentary. 

SALV. Very true! I too came across the same passage which 
suggested to me a method of showing how, by a single short 
demonstration, one can prove that the circle has the largest 
content of all regular isoperimetric figures; and that, of other 

[102] 

figures, the one which has the larger number of sides contains a 
greater area than that which has the smaller number. 

SAGR. Being exceedingly fond of choice and uncommon propo- 
sitions, I beseech you to let us have your demonstration. 

SALV. I can do this in a few words by proving the following 
theorem: 

The area of a circle is a mean proportional between any 

* See interesting biographical note on Sacrobosco [John Holywood] 
in Ency. Brit., I ith Ed. [Trans.] 



58 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

two regular and similar polygons of which one circum- 
scribes it and the other is isoperimetric with it. In addition, 
the area of the circle is less than that of any circumscribed 
polygon and greater than that of any isoperimetric polygon. 
And further, of these circumscribed polygons, the one which 
has the greater number of sides is smaller than the one which 
has a less number; but, on the other hand, that isoperi- 
metric polygon which has the greater number of sides is 
the larger. 

Let A and B be two similar polygons of which A circumscribes 
the given circle and B is isoperimetric with it. The area of the 
circle will then be a mean proportional between the areas of the 
polygons. For if we indicate the radius of the circle by AC and 
if we remember that the area of the circle is equal to that of a 
right-angled triangle in which one of the sides about the right 
angle is equal to the radius, AC, and the other to the circum- 
ference; and if likewise we remember that the area of the poly- 
gon A is equal to the area of a right-angled triangle one of 

[103] 

whose sides about the right angle has the same length as AC and 
the other is equal to the perimeter of the polygon itself; it is then 




Fig. 12 



manifest^that the circumscribed polygon bears to the circle the 
same ratio which its perimeter bears to the circumference of the 
circle, or to the perimeter of the polygon B which is, by hypoth- 
esis, equal to the circumference of the circle. But since the 
polygons A and B are similar their areas are to each other as the 
squares of their perimeters; hence the area of the circle A is a 

mean 



FIRST DAY 59 

mean proportional between the areas of the two polygons A and 
B. And since the area of the polygon A is greater than that of 
the circle A, it is clear that the area of the circle A is greater 
than that of the isoperimetric polygon B, and is therefore the 
greatest of all regular polygons having the same perimeter as 
the circle. 

We now demonstrate the remaining portion of the theorem, 
which is to prove that, in the case of polygons circumscribing 
a given circle, the one having the smaller number of sides has 
a larger area than one having a greater number of sides; but 
that on the other hand, in the case of isoperimetric polygons, 
the one having the more sides has a larger area than the one 
with less sides. To the circle which has O for center and OA 
for radius draw the tangent AD; and on this tangent lay off, 
say, AD which shall represent one-half of the side of a circum- 
scribed pentagon and AC which shall represent one-half of the 
side of a heptagon; draw the straight lines OGC and OFD; then 
with O as a center and OC as radius draw the arc ECI. Now 
since the triangle DOC is greater than the secftor EOC and since 
the secftor COI is greater than the triangle COA, it follows that 
the triangle DOC bears to the triangle COA a greater ratio than 
the secftor EOC bears to the secftor COI, that is, than the secftor 
FOG bears to the secftor GOA. Hence, componendo et per- 
mutando, the triangle DOA bears to the secftor FOA a greater 
ratio than that which the triangle COA bears to the secftor 
GOA, and also 10 such triangles DOA bear to 10 such secftors 
FOA a greater ratio than 14 such triangles COA bear to 14 such 
secftors GOA, that is to say, the circumscribed pentagon bears 
to the circle a greater ratio than does the heptagon. Hence the 
pentagon exceeds the heptagon in area. 

But now let us assume that both the heptagon and the penta- 
gon have the same perimeter as that of a given circle. Then I 
say the heptagon will contain a larger area than the pentagon. 
For since the area of the circle is a mean proportional between 
areas of the circumscribed and of the isoperimetric pentagons, 

[104] 

and since likewise it is a mean proportional between the cir- 
cumscribed 



6o THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

cumscribed and isoperimetric heptagons, and since also we have 
proved that the circumscribed pentagon is larger than the 
circumscribed heptagon, it follows that this circumscribed pen- 
tagon bears to the circle a larger ratio than does the heptagon, 
that is, the circle will bear to its isoperimetric pentagon a 
greater ratio than to its isoperimetric heptagon. Hence the 
pentagon is smaller than its isoperimetric heptagon. Q. E. D. 

SAGR. A very clever and elegant demonstration! But how did 
we come to plunge into geometry while discussing the objections 
urged by Simplicio, objections of great moment, especially that 
one referring to density which strikes me as particularly difficult? 

SALV. If contraction and expansion [condensazione e rare- 
fazzione] consist in contrary motions, one ought to find for each 
great expansion a correspondingly large contraction. But our 
surprise is increased when, every day, we see enormous expan- 
sions taking pkce almost instantaneously. Think what a 
tremendous expansion occurs when a small quantity of gun- 
powder flares up into a vast volume of fire! Think too of the 
almost limitless expansion of the light which it produces! 
Imagine the contraction which would take place if this fire and 
this light were to reunite, which, indeed, is not impossible since 
only a little while ago they were located together in this small 
space. You will find, upon observation, a thousand such expan- 
sions for they are more obvious than contractions since dense 
matter is more palpable and accessible to our senses. We can 
take wood and see it go up in fire and light, but we do not see 

[105] 

them recombine to form wood; we see fruits and flowers and a 
thousand other solid bodies dissolve largely into odors, but we 
do not observe these fragrant atoms coming together to form 
fragrant solids. But where the senses fail us reason must step 
in; for it will enable us to understand the motion involved in the 
condensation of extremely rarefied and tenuous substances just 
as clearly as that involved in the expansion and dissolution of 
solids. Moreover we are trying to find out how it is possible to 
produce expansion and contraction in bodies which are capable 
of such changes without introducing vacua and without giving 

up 



FIRST DAY 61 

up the impenetrability of matter; but this does not exclude the 
possibility of there being materials which possess no such prop- 
erties and do not, therefore, carry with them consequences 
which you call inconvenient and impossible. And finally, 
Simplicio, I have, for the sake of you philosophers, taken pains 
to find an explanation of how expansion and contraction can 
take place without our admitting the penetrability of matter and 
introducing vacua, properties which you deny and dislike; if 
you were to admit them, I should not oppose you so vigorously. 
Now either admit these difficulties or accept my views or sug- 
gest something better. 

SAGR. I quite agree with the peripatetic philosophers in 
denying the penetrability of matter. As to the vacua I should 
like to hear a thorough discussion of Aristotle's demonstration 
in which he opposes them, and what you, Salviati, have to say in 
reply. I beg of you, Simplicio, that you give us the precise 
proof of the Philosopher and that you, Salviati, give us the 
reply. 

SIMP. So far as I remember, Aristotle inveighs against the 
ancient view that a vacuum is a necessary prerequisite for 
motion and that the latter could not occur without the former. 
In opposition to this view Aristotle shows that it is precisely 
the phenomenon of motion, as we shall see, which renders 
untenable the idea of a vacuum. His method is to divide the 
argument into two parts. He first supposes bodies of different 
weights to move in the same medium; then supposes, one and the 
same body to move in different media. In the first case, he 

[106] 

supposes bodies of different weight to move in one and the same 
medium with different speeds which stand to one another in the 
same ratio as the weights ; so that, for example, a body which is 
ten times as heavy as another will move ten times as rapidly as 
the other. In the second case he assumes that the speeds of one 
and the same body moving in different media are in inverse 
ratio to the densities of these media; thus, for instance, if the 
density of water were ten times that of air, the speed in air would 
be ten times greater than in water. From this second supposi- 
tion, 



62 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

tion, he shows that, since the tenuity of a vacuum differs in- 
finitely from that of any medium filled with matter however 
rare, any body which moves in a plenum through a certain 
space in a certain time ought to move through a vacuum in- 
stantaneously; but instantaneous motion is an impossibility; 
it is therefore impossible that a vacuum should be produced by 
motion. 

SALV. The argument is, as you see, ad hominem, that is, it is 
directed against those who thought the vacuum a prerequisite 
for motion. Now if I admit the argument to be conclusive and 
concede also that motion cannot take place in a vacuum, the 
assumption of a vacuum considered absolutely and not with 
reference to motion, is not thereby invalidated. But to tell you 
what the ancients might possibly have replied and in order to 
better understand just how conclusive Aristotle's demonstra- 
tion is, we may, in my opinion, deny both of his assumptions. 
And as to the first, I greatly doubt that Aristotle ever tested by 
experiment whether it be true that two stones, one weighing ten 
times as much as the other, if allowed to fall, at the same in- 
stant, from a height of, say, 100 cubits, would so differ in speed 
that when the heavier had reached the ground, the other would 
not have fallen more than 10 cubits. 

SIMP. His language would seem to indicate that he had tried 
the experiment, because he says: We see the heavier; now the 
word see shows that he had made the experiment. 

SAGR. But I, Simplicio, who have made the test can assure 



you that a cannon ball weighing one or two hundred pounds, or 
even more, will not reach the ground by as much as a span ahead 
of a musket ball weighing only half a pound, provided both are 
dropped from a height of 200 cubits. 

SALV. But, even without further experiment, it is possible to 
prove clearly, by means of a short and conclusive argument, 
that a heavier body does not move more rapidly than a lighter 
one provided both bodies are of the same material and in short 
such as those mentioned by Aristotle. But tell me, Simplicio, 
whether you admit that each falling body acquires a definite 

speed 



FIRST DAY 63 

speed fixed by nature, a velocity which cannot be increased or 
diminished except by the use of force [violenza] or resistance. 

SIMP. There can be no doubt but that one and the same body 
moving in a single medium has a fixed velocity which is deter- 
mined by nature and which cannot be increased except by the 
addition of momentum [impeto] or diminished except by some 
resistance which retards it. 

SALV. If then we take two bodies whose natural speeds are 
different, it is clear that on uniting the two, the more rapid one 
will be partly retarded by the slower, and the slower will be 
somewhat hastened by the swifter. Do you not agree with me 
in this opinion ? 

SIMP. You are unquestionably right. 

SALV. But if this is true, and if a large stone moves with a 
speed of, say, eight while a smaller moves with a speed of four, 
then when they are united, the system will move with a speed 
less than eight; but the two stones when tied together make a 
stone larger than that which before moved with a speed of eight. 
Hence the heavier body moves with less speed than the lighter; 
an effect which is contrary to your supposition. Thus you see 

[108] 

how, from your assumption that the heavier body moves more 
rapidly than the lighter one, I infer that the heavier body moves 
more slowly. 

SIMP. I am all at sea because it appears to me that the smaller 
stone when added to the larger increases its weight and by adding 
weight I do not see how it can fail to increase its speed or, at 
least, not to diminish it. 

SALV. Here again you are in error, Simplicio, because it is 
not true that the smaller stone adds weight to the larger. 

SIMP. This is, indeed, quite beyond my comprehension. 

SALV. It will not be beyond you when I have once shown you 
the mistake under which you are laboring. Note that it is 
necessary to distinguish between heavy bodies in motion and the 
same bodies at rest. A large stone placed in a balance not only 
acquires additional weight by having another stone placed upon 
it, but even by the addition of a handful of hemp its weight is 

augmented 



64 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

augmented six to ten ounces according to the quantity of hemp. 
But if you tie the hemp to the stone and allow them to fall 
freely from some height, do you believe that the hemp will 
press down upon the stone and thus accelerate its motion or do 
you think the motion will be retarded by a partial upward 
pressure? One always feels the pressure upon his shoulders 
when he prevents the motion of a load resting upon him ; but if 
one descends just as rapidly as the load would fall how can it 
gravitate or press upon him ? Do you not see that this would be 
the same as trying to strike a man with a lance when he is run- 
ning away from you with a speed which is equal to, or even 
greater, than that with which you are following him ? You must 
therefore conclude that, during free and natural fall, the small 
stone does not press upon the larger and consequently does not 
increase its weight as it does when at rest. 

SIMP. But what if we should place the larger stone upon 
the smaller? 

[109] 

SALV. Its weight would be increased if the larger stone moved 
more rapidly; but we have already concluded that when the 
small stone moves more slowly it retards to some extent the 
speed of the larger, so that the combination of the two, which is 
a heavier body than the larger of the two stones, would move less 
rapidly, a conclusion which is contrary to your hypothesis. 
We infer therefore that large and small bodies move with the 
same speed provided they are of the same specific gravity. 

SIMP. Your discussion is really admirable; yet I do not find it 
easy to believe that a bird-shot falls as swiftly as a cannon ball. 

SALV. Why not say a grain of sand as rapidly as a grindstone? 
But, Simplicio, I trust you will not follow the example of many 
others who divert the discussion from its main intent and fasten 
upon some statement of mine which lacks a hair's-breadth of the 
truth and, under this hair, hide the fault of another which is as 
big as a ship's cable. Aristotle says that "an iron ball of one 
hundred pounds falling from a height of one hundred cubits 
reaches the ground before a one-pound ball has fallen a single 
cubit." I say that they arrive at the same time. You find, on 

making 



FIRST DAY 65 

making the experiment, that the larger outstrips the smaller by 
two finger-breadths, that is, when the larger has reached the 
ground, the other is short of it by two finger-breadths; now you 
would not hide behind these two fingers the ninety-nine cubits of 
Aristotle, nor would you mention my small error and at the same 
time pass over in silence his very large one. Aristotle declares 
that bodies of different weights, in the same medium, travel 
(in so far as their motion depends upon gravity) with speeds 
which are proportional to their weights ; this he illustrates by use 
of bodies in which it is possible to perceive the pure and un- 
adulterated effect of gravity, eliminating other considerations, 
for example, figure as being of small importance [minimi mo- 
menti\, influences which are greatly dependent upon the medium 
which modifies the single effect of gravity alone. Thus we ob- 
serve that gold, the densest of all substances, when beaten out 
into a very thin leaf, goes floating through the air; the same 
thing happens with stone when ground into a very fine powder. 
But if you wish to maintain the general proposition you will 
have to show that the same ratio of speeds is preserved in the 

[no] 

case of all heavy bodies, and that a stone of twenty pounds 
moves ten times as rapidly as one of two; but I claim that this 
is false and that, if they fall from a height of fifty or a hundred 
cubits, they will reach the earth at the same moment. 

SIMP. Perhaps the result would be different if the fall took 
place not from a few cubits but from some thousands of cubits. 

SALV. If this were what Aristotle meant you would burden 
him with another error which would amount to a falsehood; 
because, since there is no such sheer height available on earth, it 
is clear that Aristotle could not have made the experiment; yet 
he wishes to give us the impression of his having performed it 
when he speaks of such an effect as one which we see. 

SIMP. In fact, Aristotle does not employ this principle, but 
uses the other one which is not, I believe, subject to these same 
difficulties. 

SALV. But the one is as false as the other; and I am surprised 
that you yourself do not see the fallacy and that you do not 

perceive 



66 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

perceive that if it were true that, in media of different densities 
and different resistances, such as water and air, one and the 
same body moved in air more rapidly than in water, in propor- 
tion as the density of water is greater than that of air, then it 
would follow that any body which falls through air ought also 
to fall through water. But this conclusion is false inasmuch as 
many bodies which descend in air not only do not descend in 
water, but acftually rise. 

SIMP. I do not understand the necessity of your inference; 
and in addition I will say that Aristotle discusses only those 
bodies which fall in both media, not those which fall in air but 
rise in water. 

SALV. The arguments which you advance for the Philos- 
opher are such as he himself would have certainly avoided so as 
not to aggravate his first mistake. But tell me now whether the 
density [corpulenza] of the water, or whatever it may be that 



retards the motion, bears a definite ratio to the density of air 
which is less retardative; and if so fix a value for it at your 
pleasure. 

SIMP. Such a ratio does exist; let us assume it to be ten; then, 
for a body which falls in both these media, the speed in water will 
be ten times slower than in air. 

SALV. I shall now take one of those bodies which fall in air 
but not in water, say a wooden ball, and I shall ask you to assign 
to it any speed you please for its descent through air. 

SIMP. Let us suppose it moves with a speed of twenty. 

SALV. Very well. Then it is clear that this speed bears to 
some smaller speed the same ratio as the density of water bears 
to that of air; and the value of this smaller speed is two. So 
that really if we follow exadlly the assumption of Aristotle we 
ought to infer that the wooden ball which falls in air, a sub- 
stance ten times less-resisting than water, with a speed of twenty 
would fall in water with a speed of two, instead of coming to the 
surface from the bottom as it does; unless perhaps you wish to 
reply, which I do not believe you will, that the rising of the wood 
through the water is the same as its falling with a speed of two. 

But 



FIRST DAY 67 

But since the wooden ball does not go to the bottom, I think you 
will agree with me that we can find a ball of another material, 
not wood, which does fall in water with a speed of two. 

SIMP. Undoubtedly we can; but it must be of a substance 
considerably heavier than wood. 

SALV. That is it exadtly. But if this second ball falls in water 
with a speed of two, what will be its speed of descent in air? 
If you hold to the rule of Aristotle you must reply that it will 
move at the rate of twenty; but twenty is the speed which you 
yourself have already assigned to the wooden ball; hence this 
and the other heavier ball will each move through air with the 
same speed. But now how does the Philosopher harmonize 
this result with his other, namely, that bodies of different weight 
move through the same medium with different speeds speeds 
which are proportional to their weights? But without going 
into the matter more deeply, how have these common and 

[112] 

obvious properties escaped your notice ? Have you not observed 
that two bodies which fall in water, one with a speed a hundred 
times as great as that of the other, will fall in air with speeds so 
nearly equal that one will not surpass the other by as much as 
one hundredth part? Thus, for example, an egg made of marble 
will descend in water one hundred times more rapidly than a 
hen's egg, while in air falling from a height of twenty cubits the 
one will fall short of the other by less than four finger-breadths. 
In short, a heavy body which sinks through ten cubits of water 
in three hours will traverse ten cubits of air in one or two pulse- 
beats; and if the heavy body be a ball of lead it will easily 
traverse the ten cubits of water in less than double the time 
required for ten cubits of air. And here, I am sure, Simplicio, 
you find no ground for difference or objection. We conclude, 
therefore, that the argument does not bear against the existence 
of a vacuum; but if it did, it would only do away with vacua of 
considerable size which neither I nor, in my opinion, the ancients 
ever believed to exist in nature, although they might possibly be 
produced by force [violenza] as may be gathered from various ex- 
periments whose description would here occupy too much time. 

Sagr. 



68 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

SAGR. Seeing that Simplicio is silent, I will take the opportu- 
nity of saying something. Since you have clearly demonstrated 
that bodies of different weights do not move in one and the same 
medium with velocities proportional to their weights, but that 
they all move with the same speed, understanding of course 
that they are of the same substance or at least of the same 
specific gravity; certainly not of different specific gravities, for I 
hardly think you would have us believe a ball of cork moves 



with the same speed as one of lead; and again since you have 
clearly demonstrated that one and the same body moving 
through differently resisting media does not acquire speeds which 
are inversely proportional to the resistances, I am curious to 
learn what are the ratios actually observed in these cases. 

SALV. These are interesting questions and I have thought 
much concerning them. I will give you the method of approach 
and the result which I finally reached. Having once established 
the falsity of the proposition that one and the same body moving 
through differently resisting media acquires speeds which are 
inversely proportional to the resistances of these media, and 
having also disproved the statement that in the same medium 
bodies of different weight acquire velocities proportional to their 
weights (understanding that this applies also to bodies which 
differ merely in specific gravity), I then began to combine these 
two facts and to consider what would happen if bodies of differ- 
ent weight were placed in media of different resistances; and I 
found that the differences in speed were greater in those media 
which were more resistant, that is, less yielding. This difference 
was such that two bodies which differed scarcely at all in their 
speed through air would, in water, fall the one with a speed ten 
times as great as that of the other. Further, there are bodies 
which will fall rapidly in air, whereas if placed in water not only 
will not sink but will remain at rest or will even rise to the top: 
for it is possible to find some kinds of wood, such as knots and 
roots, which remain at rest in water but fall rapidly in air. 

SAGR. I have often tried with the utmost patience to add 
grains of sand to a ball of wax until it should acquire the same 

specific 



FIRST DAY 69 

specific gravity as water and would therefore remain at rest in 
this medium. But with all my care I was never able to accom- 
plish this. Indeed, I do not know whether there is any solid 
substance whose specific gravity is, by nature, so nearly equal 
to that of water that if placed anywhere in water it will remain 
at rest. 

SALV. In this, as in a thousand other operations, men are 
surpassed by animals. In this problem of yours one may learn 
much from the fish which are very skillful in maintaining their 
equilibrium not only in one kind of water, but also in waters 
which are notably different either by their own nature or by 



some accidental muddiness or through salinity, each of which 
produces a marked change. So perfectly indeed can fish keep 
their equilibrium that they are able to remain motionless in any 
position. This they accomplish, I believe, by means of an 
apparatus especially provided by nature, namely, a bladder 
located in the body and communicating with the mouth by 
means of a narrow tube through which they are able, at will, to 
expel a portion of the air contained in the bladder: by rising to 
the surface they can take in more air; thus they make themselves 
heavier or lighter than water at will and maintain equilibrium. 

SAGR. By means of another device I was able to deceive some 
friends to whom I had boasted that I could make up a ball of 
wax that would be in equilibrium in water. In the bottom of a 
vessel I placed some salt water and upon this some fresh water; 
then I showed them that the ball stopped in the middle of the 
water, and that, when pushed to the bottom or lifted to the 
top, would not remain in either of these places but would return 
to the middle. 

SALV. This experiment is not without usefulness. For when 
physicians are testing the various qualities of waters, especially 
their specific gravities, they employ a ball of this kind so ad- 
justed that, in certain water, it will neither rise nor fall. Then 
in testing another water, differing ever so slightly in specific 
gravity \pcso\ the ball will sink if this water be lighter and rise 
if it be heavier. And so exact is this experiment that the addi- 

tion 



yo THE NEW TWO SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

tion of two grains of salt to six pounds of water is sufficient to 
make the ball rise to the surface from the bottom to which it had 
fallen. To illustrate the precision of this experiment and also to 
clearly demonstrate the non-resistance of water to division, 
I wish to add that this notable difference in specific gravity can 
be produced not only by solution of some heavier substance, 
but also by merely heating or cooling; and so sensitive is water 
to this process that by simply adding four drops of another water 
which is slightly warmer or cooler than the six pounds one can 
cause the ball to sink or rise; it will sink when the warm water is 
poured in and will rise upon the addition of cold water. Now you 

["Si 

can see how mistaken are those philosophers who ascribe to water 
viscosity or some other coherence of parts which offers resistance 
to separation of parts and to penetration. 

SAGR. With regard to this question I have found many con- 
vincing arguments in a treatise by our Academician; but there is 
one great difficulty of which I have not been able to rid myself, 
namely, if there be no tenacity or coherence between the particles 
of water how is it possible for those large drops of water to stand 
out in relief upon cabbage leaves without scattering or spreading 
out? 

SALV. Although those who are in possession of the truth are 
able to solve all objections raised, I would not arrogate to myself 
such power; nevertheless my inability should not be allowed to 
becloud the truth. To begin with let me confess that I do not 
understand how these large globules of water stand out and hold 
themselves up, although I know for a certainty, that it is not 
owing to any internal tenacity acting between the particles of 
water; whence it must follow that the cause of this effect is 
external. Beside the experiments already shown to prove that 
the cause is not internal, I can offer another which is very con- 
vincing. If the particles of water which sustain themselves in a 
heap, while surrounded by air, did so in virtue of an internal 
cause then they would sustain themselves much more easily when 
surrounded by a medium in which they exhibit less tendency to 
fall than they do in air; such a medium would be any fluid 

heavier 



FIRST DAY 71 

heavier than air, as, for instance, wine: and therefore if some 
wine be poured about such a drop of water, the wine might rise 
until the drop was entirely covered, without the particles of 
water, held together by this internal coherence, ever parting 
company. But this is not the fadl; for as soon as the wine 
touches the water, the latter without waiting to be covered 
scatters and spreads out underneath the wine if it be red. The 
cause of this effecl: is therefore external and is possibly to be 
found in the surrounding air. Indeed there appears to be a 
considerable antagonism between air and water as I have ob- 
served in the following experiment. Having taken a glass globe 
which had a mouth of about the same diameter as a straw, I 
filled it with water and turned it mouth downwards; neverthe- 

[116] 

less, the water, although quite heavy and prone to descend, and 
the air, which is very light and disposed to rise through the 
water, refused, the one to descend and the other to ascend 
through the opening, but both remained stubborn and defiant. 
On the other hand, as soon as I apply to this opening a glass 
of red wine, which is almost inappreciably lighter than water, 
red streaks are immediately observed to ascend slowly through 
the water while the water with equal slowness descends through 
the wine without mixing, until finally the globe is completely 
filled with wine and the water has all gone down into the vessel 
below. What then can we say except that there exists, between 
water and air, a certain incompatibility which I do not under- 
stand, but perhaps. . . . 

SIMP. I feel almost like laughing at the great antipathy which 
Salviati exhibits against the use of the word antipathy; and yet 
it is excellently adapted to explain the difficulty. 

SALV. Alright, if it please Simplicio, let this word antipathy 
be the solution of our difficulty. Returning from this digression, 
let us again take up our problem. We have already seen that 
the difference of speed between bodies of different specific 
gravities is most marked in those media which are the most 
resistant: thus, in a medium of quicksilver, gold not merely 
sinks to the bottom more rapidly than lead but it is the only 

substance 



72 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

substance that will descend at all; all other metals and stones rise 
to the surface and float. On the other hand the variation of 
speed in air between balls of gold, lead, copper, porphyry, and 
other heavy materials is so slight that in a fall of 100 cubits a 
ball of gold would surely not outstrip one of copper by as much 
as four fingers. Having observed this I came to the conclusion 
that in a medium totally devoid of resistance all bodies would 
fall with the same speed. 

SIMP. This is a remarkable statement, Salviati. But I shall 
never believe that even in a vacuum, if motion in such a place 
were possible, a lock of wool and a bit of lead can fall with the 
same velocity. 

SALV. A little more slowly, Simplicio. Your difficulty is not 
so recondite nor am I so imprudent as to warrant you in 
believing that I have not already considered this matter and 
found the proper solution. Hence for my justification and 



for your enlightenment hear what I have to say. Our problem 
is to find out what happens to bodies of different weight moving 
in a medium devoid of resistance, so that the only difference in 
speed is that which arises from inequality of weight. Since no 
medium except one entirely free from air and other bodies, be it 
ever so tenuous and yielding, can furnish our senses with the 
evidence we are looking for, and since such a medium is not 
available, we shall observe what happens in the rarest and 
least resistant media as compared with what happens in denser 
and more resistant media. Because if we find as a fact that the 
variation of speed among bodies of different specific gravities is 
less and less according as the medium becomes more and more 
yielding, and if finally in a medium of extreme tenuity, though 
not a perfect vacuum, we find that, in spite of great diversity of 
specific gravity [pH>], the difference in speed is very small and 
almost inappreciable, then we are justified in believing it highly 
probable that in a vacuum all bodies would fall with the same 
speed. Let us, in view of this, consider what takes place in air, 
where for the sake of a definite figure and light material imagine 
an inflated bladder. The air in this bladder when surrounded by 

air 



FIRST DAY 73 

air will weigh little or nothing, since it can be only slightly com- 
pressed; its weight then is small being merely that of the skin 
which does not amount to the thousandth part of a mass of 
lead having the same size as the inflated bladder. Now, Sim- 
plicio, if we allow these two bodies to fall from a height of four 
or six cubits, by what distance do you imagine the lead will 
anticipate the bladder? You may be sure that the lead will not 
travel three times, or even twice, as swiftly as the bladder, 
although vou would have made it move a thousand times as 
rapidly. 

SIMP. It may be as you say during the first four or six cubits 
of the fall; but after the motion has continued a long while, I 
believe that the lead will have left the bladder behind not only 
six out of twelve parts of the distance but even eight or 
ten. 

SALV. I quite agree with you and doubt not that, in very 
long distances, the lead might cover one hundred miles while the 

[118] 

bladder was traversing one; but, my dear Simplicio, this phenom- 
enon which you adduce against my proposition is precisely the 
one which confirms it. Let me once more explain that the 
variation of speed observed in bodies of different specific gravi- 
ties is not caused by the difference of specific gravity but de- 
pends upon external circumstances and, in particular, upon the 
resistance of the medium, so that if this is removed all bodies 
would fall with the same velocity; and this result I deduce 
mainly from the fact which you have just admitted and which is 
very true, namely, that, in the case of bodies which differ 
widely in weight, their velocities differ more and more as the 
spaces traversed increase, something which would not occur if 
the effect depended upon differences of specific gravity. For 
since these specific gravities remain constant, the ratio between 
the distances traversed ought to remain constant whereas the 
fact is that this ratio keeps on increasing as the motion con- 
tinues. Thus a very heavy body in a fall of one cubit will not 
anticipate a very light one by so much as the tenth part of this 
space; but in a fall of twelve cubits the heavy body would out- 
strip 



74 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 
strip the other by one-third, and in a fall of one hundred cubits 
by 90/100, etc. 

SIMP. Very well: but, following your own line of argument, 
if differences of weight in bodies of different specific gravities 
cannot produce a change in the ratio of their speeds, on the 
ground that their specific gravities do not change, how is it 
possible for the medium, which also we suppose to remain con- 
stant, to bring about any change in the ratio of these velocities ? 

SALV. This objection with which you oppose my statement 
is clever; and I must meet it. I begin by saying that a heavy 
body has an inherent tendency to move with a constantly and 
uniformly accelerated motion toward the common center of 
gravity, that is, toward the center of our earth, so that during 
equal intervals of time it receives equal increments of momentum 
and velocity. This, you must understand, holds whenever all 
external and accidental hindrances have been removed; but of 
these there is one which we can never remove, namely, the 
medium which must be penetrated and thrust aside by the 
falling body. This quiet, yielding, fluid medium opposes motion 

[119]. 

through it with a resistance which is proportional to the rapidity 
with which the medium must give way to the passage of the 
body; which body, as I have said,. is by nature continuously 
accelerated so that it meets with more and more resistance in 
the medium and hence a diminution in its rate of gain of speed 
until finally the speed reaches such a point and the resistance of 
the medium becomes so great that, balancing each other, they 
prevent any further acceleration and reduce the motion of the 
body to one which is uniform and which will thereafter maintain 
a constant value. There is, therefore, an increase in the resist- 
ance of the medium, not on account of any change in its essential 
properties, but on account of the change in rapidity with which 
it must yield and give way laterally to the passage of the falling 
body which is being constantly accelerated. 

Now seeing how great is the resistance which the air offers to 
the slight momentum [momenta] of the bladder and how small 
that which it offers to the large weight [peso] of the lead, I 

am 



FIRST DAY 75 

am convinced that, if the medium were entirely removed, the 
advantage received by the bladder would be so great and that 
coming to the lead so small that their speeds would be equalized. 
Assuming this principle, that all falling bodies acquire equal 
speeds in a medium which, on account of a vacuum or something 
else, offers no resistance to the speed of the motion, we shall be 
able accordingly to determine the ratios of the speeds of both 
similar and dissimilar bodies moving either through one and the 
same medium or through different space-filling, and therefore 
resistant, media. This result we may obtain by observing how 
much the weight of the medium detracts from the weight of the 
moving body, which weight is the means employed by the falling 
body to open a path for itself and to push aside the parts of the 
medium, something which does not happen in a vacuum where, 
therefore, no difference [of speed] is to be expected from a 
difference of specific gravity. And since it is known that the 
effect of the medium is to diminish the weight of the body by the 
weight of the medium displaced, we may accomplish our purpose 
by diminishing in just this proportion the speeds of the falling 
bodies, which in a non-resisting medium we have assumed to be 
equal. 

Thus, for example, imagine lead to be ten thousand times as 
heavy as air while ebony is only one thousand times as heavy. 

[120] 

Here we have two substances whose speeds of fall in a medium 
devoid of resistance are equal: but, when air is the medium, it 
will subtract from the speed of the lead one part in ten thousand, 
and from the speed of the ebony one part in one thousand, i. e. 
ten parts in ten thousand. While therefore lead and ebony 
would fall from any given height in the same interval of time, 
provided the retarding effect of the air were removed, the lead 
will, in air, lose in speed one part in ten thousand; and the ebony, 
ten parts in ten thousand. In other words, if the elevation from 
which the bodies start be divided into ten thousand parts, the 
lead will reach the ground leaving the ebony behind by as much 
as ten, or at least nine, of these parts. Is it not clear then that a 
leaden ball allowed to fall from a tower two hundred cubits 

high 



76 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

high will outstrip an ebony ball by less than four inches ? Now 
ebony weighs a thousand times as much as air but this inflated 
bladder only four times as much; therefore air diminishes the 
inherent and natural speed of ebony by one part in a thousand ; 
while that of the bladder which, if free from hindrance, would 
be the same, experiences a diminution in air amounting to one 
part in four. So that when the ebony ball, falling from the 
tower, has reached the earth, the bladder will have traversed 
only three-quarters of this distance. Lead is twelve times as 
heavy as water; but ivory is only twice as heavy. The speeds of 
these two substances which, when entirely unhindered, are equal 
will be diminished in water, that of lead by one part in twelve, 
that of ivory by half. Accordingly when the lead has fallen 
through eleven cubits of water the ivory will have fallen through 
only six. Employing this principle we shall, I believe, find a 
much closer agreement of experiment with our computation than 
with that of Aristotle. 

In a similar manner we may find the ratio of the speeds of one 
and the same body in different fluid media, not by comparing the 
different resistances of the media, but by considering the excess 
of the specific gravity of the body above those of the media. 
Thus, for example, tin is one thousand times heavier than air 
and ten times heavier than water; hence, if we divide its un- 
hindered speed into 1000 parts, air will rob it of one of these 
parts so that it will fall with a speed of 999, while in water its 
speed will be 900, seeing that water diminishes its weight by one 
part in ten while air by only one part in a thousand. 

Again take a solid a little heavier than water, such as oak, a 
ball of which will weigh let us say 1000 drachms; suppose an 

[121] 

equal volume of water to weigh 950, and an equal volume of air, 
2; then it is clear that if the unhindered speed of the ball is 1000, 
its speed in air will be 998, but in water only 50, seeing that the 
water removes 950 of the 1000 parts which the body weighs, 
leaving only 50. 

Such a solid would therefore move almost twenty times as 
fast in air as in water, since its specific gravity exceeds that of 

water 



FIRST DAY 77 

water by one part in twenty. And here we must consider the 
fact that only those substances which have a specific gravity 
greater than water can fall through it substances which must, 
therefore, be hundreds of times heavier than air; hence when we 
try to obtain the ratio of the speed in air to that in water, we 
may, without appreciable error, assume that air does not, to any 
considerable extent, diminish the free weight [assoluta gravitd], 
and consequently the unhindered speed [assoluta velocitd] of such 
substances. Having thus easily found the excess of the weight of 
these substances over that of water, we can say that their speed 
in air is to their speed in water as their free weight [totale gravitd] 
is to the excess of this weight over that of water. For example, 
a ball of ivory weighs 20 ounces; an equal volume of water 
weighs 17 ounces; hence the speed of ivory in air bears to its 
speed in water the approximate ratio of 20:3. 

SAGR. I have made a great step forward in this truly interest- 
ing subject upon which I have long labored in vain. In order 
to put these theories into practice we need only discover a 
method of determining the specific gravity of air with reference 
to water and hence with reference to other heavy substances. 

SIMP. But if we find that air has levity instead of gravity 
what then shall we say of the foregoing discussion which, in 
other respects, is very clever? 

SALV. I should say that it was empty, vain, and trifling. 
But can you doubt that air has weight when you have the clear 
testimony of Aristotle affirming that all the elements have weight 
including air, and excepting only fire? As evidence of this he 
cites the fact that a leather bottle weighs more when inflated 
than when collapsed. 

[122] 

SIMP. I am inclined to believe that the increase of weight 
observed in the inflated leather bottle or bladder arises, not from 
the gravity of the air, but from the many thick vapors mingled 
with it in these lower regions. To this I would attribute the 
increase of weight in the leather bottle. 

SALV. I would not have you say this, and much less attribute 
it to Aristotle; because, if speaking of the elements, he wished to 

persuade 




78 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

persuade me by experiment that air has weight and were to say 
to me: "Take a leather bottle, fill it with heavy vapors and ob- 
serve how its weight increases," I would reply that the bottle 
would weigh still more if filled with bran; and would then add 
that this merely proves that bran and thick vapors are heavy, 
but in regard to air I should still remain in the same doubt as 
before. However, the experiment of Aristotle is good and the 
proposition is true. But I cannot say as much of a certain other 
consideration, taken at face value; this consideration was of- 
fered by a philosopher whose name slips me; but I know I have 
read his argument which is that air exhibits greater gravity than 
levity, because it carries heavy bodies downward more easily 
than it does light ones upward. 

SAGR. Fine indeed! So according to this theory air is much 
heavier than water, since all heavy bodies are carried downward 
more easily through air than through water, and all light bodies 
buoyed up more easily through water than through air; further 
there is an infinite number of heavy bodies which fall through 
air but ascend in water and there is an infinite number of sub- 
stances which rise in water and fall in air. But, Simplicio, the 
question as to whether the weight of the leather bottle is owing 
to thick vapors or to pure air does not affect our problem which 
is to discover how bodies move through this vapor-laden atmos- 
phere of ours. Returning now to the question which interests me 
more, I should like, for the sake of more complete and thorough 
knowledge of this matter, not only to be strengthened in my 
belief that air has weight but also to learn, if possible, how great 
its specific gravity is. Therefore, Salviati, if you can satisfy my 
curiosity on this point pray do so. 

SALV. The experiment with the inflated leather bottle of 
Aristotle proves conclusively that air possesses positive gravity 
and not, as some have believed, levity, a property possessed 
possibly by no substance whatever; for if air did possess this 
quality of absolute and positive levity, it should on compression 

[123] 

exhibit greater levity and, hence, a greater tendency to rise; 
but experiment shows precisely the opposite. 

As 



FIRST DAY 79 

As to the other question, namely, how to determine the 
specific gravity of air, I have employed the following method. 
I took a rather large glass bottle with a narrow neck and at- 
tached to it a leather cover, binding it tightly about the neck of 
the bottle: in the top of this cover I inserted and firmly fastened 
the valve of a leather bottle, through which I forced into the 
glass bottle, by means of a syringe, a large quantity of air. 
And since air is easily condensed one can pump into the bottle 
two or three times its own volume of air. After this I took an 
accurate balance and weighed this bottle of compressed air with 
the utmost precision, adjusting the weight with fine sand. I 
next opened the valve and allowed the compressed air to escape ; 
then replaced the flask upon the balance and found it per- 
ceptibly lighter: from the sand which had been used as a counter- 
weight I now removed and laid aside as much as was necessary 
to again secure balance. Under these conditions there can be no 
doubt but that the weight of the sand thus laid aside represents 
the weight of the air which had been forced into the flask and had 
afterwards escaped. But after all this experiment tells me 
merely that the weight of the compressed air is the same as that 
of the sand removed from the balance; when however it comes to 
knowing certainly and definitely the weight of air as compared 
with that of water or any other heavy substance this I cannot 
hope to do without first measuring the volume [qicantiia] of 
compressed air; for this measurement I have devised the two 
following methods. 

According to the first method one takes a bottle with a narrow 
neck similar to the previous one; over the mouth of this bottle is 
slipped a leather tube which is bound tightly about the neck of 
the flask; the other end of this tube embraces the valve attached 
to the first flask and is tightly bound about it. This second 
flask is provided with a hole in the bottom through which an 
iron rod can be placed so as to open, at will, the valve above 
mentioned and thus permit the surplus air of the first to escape 
after it has once been weighed: but his second bottle must be 
filled with water. Having prepared everything in the manner 

[124] 

above 



8o THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

above described, open the valve with the rod; the air will rush 
into the flask containing the water and will drive it through the 
hole at the bottom, it being clear that the volume [quantita] of 
water thus displaced is equal to the volume [mole e quantita] of 
air escaped from the other vessel. Having set aside this dis- 
placed water, weigh the vessel from which the air has escaped 
(which is supposed to have been weighed previously while 
containing the compressed air), and remove the surplus of sand 
as described above; it is then manifest that the weight of this 
sand is precisely the weight of a volume [mole] of air equal to the 
volume of water displaced and set aside; this water we can weigh 
and find how many times its weight contains the weight of the 
removed sand, thus determining definitely how many times 
heavier water is than air; and we shall find, contrary to the 
opinion of Aristotle, that this is not 10 times, but, as our experi- 
ment shows, more nearly 400 times. 

The second method is more expeditious and can be carried 
out with a single vessel fitted up as the first was. Here no air 
is added to that which the vessel naturally contains but water is 
forced into it without allowing any air to escape; the water thus 
introduced necessarily compresses the air. Having forced into 
the vessel as much water as possible, filling it, say, three-fourths 
full, which does not require any extraordinary effort, place it 
upon the balance and weigh it accurately; next hold the vessel 
mouth up, open the valve, and allow the air to escape; the 
volume of the air thus escaping is precisely equal to the volume 
of water contained in the flask. Again weigh the vessel which 
will have diminished in weight on account of the escaped air; 
this loss in weight represents the weight of a volume of air equal 
to the volume of water contained in the vessel. 

SIMP. No one can deny the cleverness and ingenuity of your 
devices; but while they appear to give complete intellectual 
satisfaction they confuse me in another direction. For since it is 
undoubtedly true that the elements when in their proper places 
have neither weight nor levity, I cannot understand how it is 
possible for that portion of air, which appeared to weigh, say, 
4 drachms of sand, should really have such a weight in air as the 

sand 



FIRST DAY 81 

sand which counterbalances it. It seems to me, therefore, that 
the experiment should be carried out, not in air, but in a medium 

.[125] 

in which the air could exhibit its property of weight if such it 
really has. 

SALV. The objection of Simplicio is certainly to the point and 
must therefore either be unanswerable or demand an equally 
clear solution. It is perfectly evident that that air which, under 
compression, weighed as much as the sand, loses this weight 
when once allowed to escape into its own element, while, indeed, 
the sand retains its weight. Hence for this experiment it be- 
comes necessary to select a place where air as well as sand can 
gravitate; because, as has been often remarked, the medium 
diminishes the weight of any substance immersed in it by an 
amount equal to the weight of the displaced medium; so that 
air in air loses all its weight. If therefore this experiment is to be 
made with accuracy it should be performed in a vacuum where 
every heavy body exhibits its momentum without the slightest 
diminution. If then, Simplicio, we were to weigh a portion of 
air in a vacuum would you then be satisfied and assured of the 
fact? 

SIMP. Yes truly: but this is to wish or ask the impossible. 

SALV. Your obligation will then be very great if, for your 
sake, I accomplish the impossible. But I do not want to sell you 
something which I have already given you; for in the previous 
experiment we weighed the air in vacuum and not in air or other 
medium. The fact that any fluid medium diminishes the 
weight of a mass immersed in it, is due, Simplicio, to the resist- 
ance which this medium offers to its being opened up, driven 
aside, and finally lifted up. The evidence for this is seen in the 
readiness with which the fluid rushes to fill up any space for- 
merly occupied by the mass; if the medium were not affected by 
such an immersion then it would not react against the immersed 
body. Tell me now, when you have a flask, in air, filled with its 
natural amount of air and then proceed to pump into the vessel 
more air, does this extra charge in any way separate or divide or 
change the circumambient air? Does the vessel perhaps expand 



82 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

so that the surrounding medium is displaced in order to give 
more room? Certainly not. Therefore one is able to say that 

[126] 

this extra charge of air is not immersed in the surrounding 
medium for it occupies no space in it, but is, as it were, in a 
vacuum. Indeed, it is really in a vacuum; for it diffuses into the 
vacuities which are not completely filled by the original and 
uncondensed air. In facft I do not see any difference between 
the enclosed and the surrounding media: for the surrounding 
medium does not press upon the enclosed medium and, vice versa, 
the enclosed medium exerts no pressure against the surrounding 
one; this same relationship exists in the case of any matter in a 
vacuum, as well as in the case of the extra charge of air com- 
pressed into the flask. The weight of this condensed air is 
therefore the same as that which it would have if set free in a 
vacuum. It is true of course that the weight of the sand used as 
a counterpoise would be a little greater in vacuo than in free air. 
We must, then, say that the air is slightly lighter than the sand 
required to counterbalance it, that is to say, by an amount equal 
to the weight in vacuo of a volume of air equal to the volume of 
the sand. 

At this point in an annotated copy of the original edition the following 
note by Galileo is found. 

[SAGR. A very clever discussion, solving a wonderful problem, because 
it demonstrates briefly and concisely the manner in which one may 
find the weight of a body in vacuo by simply weighing it in air. The 
explanation is as follows: when a heavy body is immersed in air it loses in 
weight an amount equal to the weight of a volume [mole} of air equivalent 
to the volume [mole] of the body itself. Hence if one adds to a body, 
without expanding it, a quantity of air equal to that which it displaces 
and weighs it, he will obtain its absolute weight in vacuo, since, without 
increasing it in size, he has increased its weight by just the amount which 
it lost through immersion in air. 

When therefore we force a quantity of water into a vessel which al- 
ready contains its normal amount of air, without allowing any of this 
air to escape it is clear that this normal quantity of air will be compressed 
and condensed into a smaller space in order to make room for the water 
which is forced in: it is also clear that the volume of air thus com- 
pressed is equal to the volume of water added. If now the vessel be 

weighed 



FIRST DAY 83 

weighed in air in this condition, it is manifest that the weight of the 
water will be increased by that of an equal volume of air; the total weight 
of water and air thus obtained is equal to the weight of the water alone 
in vacuo. 

Now record the weight of the entire vessel and then allow the com- 
pressed air to escape; weigh the remainder; the difference of these two 
weights will be the weight of the compressed air which, in volume, is 
equal to that of the water. Next find the weight of the water alone and 
add to it that of the compressed air; we shall then have the water alone 
in vacuo. To find the weight of the water we shall have to remove it 
from the vessel and weigh the vessel alone; subtrad this weight from 
that of the vessel and water together. It is clear that the remainder will 
be the weight of the water alone in air.] 

[127] 

SIMP. The previous experiments, in my opinion, left some- 
thing to be desired : but now I am fully satisfied. 

SALV. The facts set forth by me up to this point and, in 
particular, the one which shows that difference of weight, even 
when very great, is without effect in changing the speed of falling 
bodies, so that as far as weight is concerned they all fall with 
equal speed: this idea is, I say, so new, and at first glance so 
remote from fact, that if we do not have the means of making it 
just as clear as sunlight, it had better not be mentioned; but 
having once allowed it to pass my lips I must neglect no experi- 
ment or argument to establish it. 

SAGR. Not only this but also many other of your views are 
so far removed from the commonly accepted opinions and 
doctrines that if you were to publish them you would stir up 
a large number of antagonists; for human nature is such that 
men do not look with favor upon discoveries either of truth or 
fallacy in their own field, when made by others than them- 
selves. They call him an innovator of doctrine, an unpleasant 
title, by which they hope to cut those knots which they cannot 
untie, and by subterranean mines they seek to destroy struc- 
tures which patient artisans have built with customary tools. 

[128] 

But as for ourselves who have no such thoughts, the experi- 
ments and arguments which you have thus far adduced are 
fully satisfactory; however if you have any experiments' which 

are 



84 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

are more direct or any arguments which are more convincing 
we will hear them with pleasure. 

SALV. The experiment made to ascertain whether two bodies, 
differing greatly in weight will fall from a given height with the 
same speed offers some difficulty; because, if the height is con- 
siderable, the retarding effect of the medium, which must be 
penetrated and thrust aside by the falling body, will be greater 
in the case of the small momentum of the very light body than 
in the case of the great force [violenza] of the heavy body; so 
that, in a long distance, the light body will be left behind; if the 
height be small, one may well doubt whether there is any 
difference; and if there be a difference it will be inappreciable. 

It occurred to me therefore to repeat many times the fall 
through a small height in such a way that I might accumulate 
all those small intervals of time that elapse between the arrival 
of the heavy and light bodies respectively at their common 
terminus, so that this sum makes an interval of time which is 
not only observable, but easily observable. In order to employ 
the slowest speeds possible and thus reduce the change which the 
resisting medium produces upon the simple effect of gravity it 
occurred to me to allow the bodies to fall along a plane slightly 
inclined to the horizontal. For in such a plane, just as well as in 
a vertical plane, one may discover how bodies of different weight 
behave: and besides this, I also wished to rid myself of the 
resistance which might arise from contact of the moving body 
with the aforesaid inclined plane. Accordingly I took two 
balls, one of lead and one of cork, the former more than a hun- 
dred times heavier than the latter, and suspended them by means 
of two equal fine threads, each four or five cubits long. Pulling 
each ball aside from the perpendicular, I let them go at the same 
instant, and they, falling along the circumferences of circles 
having these equal strings for semi-diameters, passed beyond the 
perpendicular and returned along the same path. This free 
vibration [per lor medesime le andate e le tornate] repeated a 
hundred times showed clearly that the heavy body maintains so 

[129] 

nearly the period of the light body that neither in a hundred 

swings 



FIRST DAY 85 

swings nor even in a thousand will the former anticipate the 
latter by as much as a single moment [minima momenta], so 
perfectly do they keep step. We can also observe the effect of 
the medium which, by the resistance which it offers to motion, 
diminishes the vibration of the cork more than that of the lead, 
but without altering the frequency of either; even when the arc 
traversed by the cork did not exceed five or six degrees while that 
of the lead was fifty or sixty, the swings were performed in equal 
times. 

SIMP. If this be so, why is not the speed of the lead greater 
than that of the cork, seeing that the former traverses sixty de- 
grees in the same interval in which the latter covers scarcely six? 

SALV. But what would you say, Simplicio, if both covered 
their paths in the same time when the cork, drawn aside through 
thirty degrees, traverses an arc of sixty, while the lead pulled 
aside only two degrees traverses an arc of four? Would not 
then the cork be proportionately swifter? And yet such is the 
experimental fact. But observe this: having pulled aside the 
pendulum of lead, say through an arc of fifty degrees, and set it 
free, it swings beyond the perpendicular almost fifty degrees, 
thus describing an arc of nearly one hundred degrees; on the 
return swing it describes a little smaller arc; and after a large 
number of such vibrations it finally comes to rest. Each vibra- 
tion, whether of ninety, fifty, twenty, ten, or four degrees 
occupies the same time: accordingly the speed of the moving 
body keeps on diminishing since in equal intervals of time, it 
traverses arcs which grow smaller and smaller. 

Precisely the same things happen with the pendulum of cork, 
suspended by a string of equal length, except that a smaller 
number of vibrations is required to bring it to rest, since on 
account of its lightness it is less able to overcome the resistance 
of the air; nevertheless the vibrations, whether large or small, are 
all performed in time-intervals which are not only equal among 
themselves, but also equal to the period of the lead pendulum. 
Hence it is true that, if while the lead is traversing an arc of 
fifty degrees the cork covers one of only ten, the cork moves 
more slowly than the lead; but on the other hand it is also true 

that 



86 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

[130] 

that the cork may cover an arc of fifty while the lead passes over 
one of only ten or six; thus, at different times, we have now 
the cork, now the lead, moving more rapidly. But if these same 
bodies traverse equal arcs in equal times we may rest assured 
that their speeds are equal. 

SIMP. I hesitate to admit the conclusiveness of this argument 
because of the confusion which arises from your making both 
bodies move now rapidly, now slowly and now very slowly, 
which leaves me in doubt as to whether their velocities are 
always equal. 

SAGR. Allow me, if you please, Salviati, to say just a few 
words. Now tell me, Simplicio, whether you admit that one 
can say with certainty that the speeds of the cork and the lead 
are equal whenever both, starting from rest at the same moment 
and descending the same slopes, always traverse equal spaces 
in equal times? 

SIMP. This can neither be doubted nor gainsaid. 

SAGR. Now it happens, in the case of the pendulums, that each 
of them traverses now an arc of sixty degrees, now one of fifty, or 
thirty or ten or eight or four or two, etc. ; and when they both 
swing through an arc of sixty degrees they do so in equal inter- 
vals of time; the same thing happens when the arc is fifty degrees 
or thirty or ten or any other number; and therefore we conclude 
that the speed of the lead in an arc of sixty degrees is equal to the 
speed of the cork when the latter also swings through an arc of 
sixty degrees; in the case of a fifty-degree arc these speeds are 
also equal to each other; so also in the case of other arcs. 
But this is not saying that the speed which occurs in an arc of 
sixty is the same as that which occurs in an arc of fifty; nor is 
the speed in an arc of fifty equal to that in one of thirty, etc. ; but 
the smaller the arcs, the smaller the speeds; the facft observed is 
that one and the same moving body requires the same time for 
traversing a large arc of sixty degrees as for a small arc of fifty 
or even a very small arc of ten; all these arcs, indeed, are covered 
in the same interval of time. It is true therefore that the lead 

[131] 

and 



FIRST DAY 87 

and the cork each diminish their speed [moto] in proportion as 
their arcs diminish; but this does not contradict the fact that 
they maintain equal speeds in equal arcs. 

My reason for saying these things has been rather because I 
wanted to learn whether I had correctly understood Salviati, 
than because I thought Simplicio had any need of a clearer ex- 
planation than that given by Salviati which like everything else 
of his is extremely lucid, so lucid, indeed, that when he solves 
questions which are difficult not merely in appearance, but in 
reality and in fact, he does so with reasons, observations and 
experiments which are common and familiar to everyone. 

In this manner he has, as I have learned from various sources, 
given occasion to a highly esteemed professor for undervaluing 
his discoveries on the ground that they are commonplace, and 
established upon a mean and vulgar basis; as if it were not a 
most admirable and praiseworthy feature of demonstrative 
science that it springs from and grows out of principles well- 
known, understood and conceded by all. 

But let us continue with this light diet; and if Simplicio is 
satisfied to understand and admit that the gravity inherent 
[interna graviia] in various falling bodies has nothing to do with 
the difference of speed observed among them, and that all 
bodies, in so far as their speeds depend upon it, would move 
with the same velocity, pray tell us, Salviati, how you explain 
the appreciable and evident inequality of motion; please reply 
also to the objection urged by Simplicio an objection in which 
I .concur namely, that a cannon ball falls more rapidly than a 
bird-shot. From my point of view, one might expect the differ- 
ence of speed to be small in the case of bodies of the same sub- 
stance moving through any single medium, whereas the larger 
ones will descend, during a single pulse-beat, a distance which 
the smaller ones will not traverse in an hour, or in four, or even 
in twenty hours; as for instance in the case of stones and fine 
sand and especially that very fine sand which produces muddy 
water and which in many hours will not fall through as much as 
two cubits, a distance which stones not much larger will traverse 
in a single pulse-beat. 

Salv. 



88 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

SALV. The acflion of the medium in producing a greater 
retardation upon those bodies which have a less specific gravity 
has already been explained by showing that they experience a 
diminution of weight. But to explain how one and the same 



medium produces such different retardations in bodies which 
are made of the same material and have the same shape, but 
differ only in size, requires a discussion more clever than that 
by which one explains how a more expanded shape or an op- 
posing motion of the medium retards the speed of the moving 
body. The solution of the present problem lies, I think, in the 
roughness and porosity which are generally and almost neces- 
sarily found in the surfaces of solid bodies. When the body is in 
motion these rough places strike the air or other ambient me- 
dium. The evidence for this is found in the humming which 
accompanies the rapid motion of a body through air, even when 
that body is as round as possible. One hears not only humming, 
but also hissing and whistling, whenever there is any appreciable 
cavity or elevation upon the body. We observe also that a 
round solid body rotating in a lathe produces a current of air. 
But what more do we need ? When a top spins on the ground at 
its greatest speed do we not hear a distinct buzzing of high 
pitch? This sibilant note diminishes in pitch as the speed of 
rotation slackens, which is evidence that these small rugosities 
on the surface meet resistance in the air. There can be no doubt, 
therefore, that in the motion of falling bodies these rugosities 
strike the surrounding fluid and retard the speed; and this they 
do so much the more in proportion as the surface is larger, which 
is the case of small bodies as compared with greater. 

SIMP. Stop a moment please, I am getting confused. For al- 
though I understand and admit that f riction of the medium upon 
the surface of the body retards its motion and that, if other 
things are the same, the larger surface suffers greater retarda- 
tion, I do not see on what ground you say that the surface of the 
smaller body is larger. Besides if, as you say, the larger surface 
suffers greater retardation the larger solid should move more 
slowly, which is not the fact. But this objection can be easily 

met 



FIRST DAY 89 

met by saying that, although the larger body has a larger sur- 
face, it has also a greater weight, in comparison with which the 
resistance of the larger surface is no more than the resistance of 
the small surface in comparison with its smaller weight; so that 
the speed of the larger solid does not become less. I therefore 
see no reason for expecting any difference of speed so long as the 
driving weight \gravita movente] diminishes in the same propor- 

[133] 
tion as the retarding power [facolta ritardante] of the surface. 

SALV. I shall answer all your objections at once. You will 
admit, of course, Simplicio, that if one takes two equal bodies, of 
the same material and same figure, bodies which would therefore 
fall with equal speeds, and if he diminishes the weight of one of 
them in the same proportion as its surface (maintaining the 
similarity of shape) he would not thereby diminish the speed of 
this body. 

SIMP. This inference seems to be in harmony with your theory 
which states that the weight of a body has no effect in either 
accelerating or retarding its motion. 

SALV. I quite agree with you in this opinion from which it 
appears to follow that, if the weight of a body is diminished in 
greater proportion than its surface, the motion is retarded to a 
certain extent; and this retardation is greater and greater in 
proportion as the diminution of weight exceeds that of the sur- 
face. 

SIMP. This I admit without hesitation. 

SALV. Now you must know, Simplicio, that it is not possible 
to diminish the surface of a solid body in the same ratio as the 
weight, and at the same time maintain similarity of figure. 
For since it is clear that in the case of a diminishing solid the 
weight grows less in proportion to the volume, and since the 
volume always diminishes more rapidly than the surface, when 
the same shape is maintained, the weight must therefore dimin- 
ish more rapidly than the surface. But geometry teaches us 
that, in the case of similar solids, the ratio of two volumes is 
greater than the ratio of their surfaces; which, for the sake of 
better understanding, I shall illustrate by a particular case. 

Take, 



90 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

Take, for example, a cube two inches on a side so that each 
face has an area of four square inches and the total area, i. e., 
the sum of the six faces, amounts to twenty-four square inches; 
now imagine this cube to be sawed through three times so as to 
divide it into eight smaller cubes, each one inch on the side, each 
face one inch square, and the total surface of each cube six 
square inches instead of twenty-four as in the case of the larger 

[134] 

cube. It is evident therefore that the surface of the little cube is 
only one-fourth that of the larger, namely, the ratio of six to 
twenty-four; but the volume of the solid cube itself is only one- 
eighth; the volume, and hence also the weight, diminishes there- 
fore much more rapidly than the surface. If we again divide the 
little cube into eight others we shall have, for the total surface 
of one of these, one and one-half square inches, which is one- 
sixteenth of the surface of the original cube; but its volume is 
only one-sixty-fourth part. Thus, by two divisions, you see that 
the volume is diminished four times as much as the surface. 
And, if the subdivision be continued until the original solid be 
reduced to a fine powder, we shall find that the weight of one of 
these smallest particles has diminished hundreds and hundreds of 
times as much as its surface. And this which I have illustrated 
in the case of cubes holds also in the case of all similar solids, 
where the volumes stand in sesquialteral ratio to their surfaces. 
Observe then how much greater the resistance, arising from con- 
tact of the surface of the moving body with the medium, in the 
case of small bodies than in the case of large; and when one 
considers that the rugosities on the very small surfaces of fine 
dust particles are perhaps no smaller than those on the surfaces 
of larger solids which have been carefully polished, he will see 
how important it is that the medium should be very fluid and 
offer no resistance to being thrust aside, easily yielding to a small 
force. You see, therefore, Simplicio, that I was not mistaken 
when, not long ago, I said that the surface of a small solid is 
comparatively greater than that of a large one. 

SIMP. I am quite convinced; and, believe me, if I were again 
beginning my studies, I should follow the advice of Plato and 

start 



FIRST DAY 91 

start with mathematics, a science which proceeds very cautiously 
md admits nothing as established until it has been rigidly dem- 
onstrated. 

SAGR. This discussion has afforded me great pleasure; but 
Before proceeding further I should like to hear the explanation of 
i phrase of yours which is new to me, namely, that similar solids 
ire to each other in the sesquialteral ratio of their surfaces; for 
although I have seen and understood the proposition in which it 
s demonstrated that the surfaces of similar solids are in the 

[135] 

luplicate ratio of their sides and also the proposition which 
Droves that the volumes are in the triplicate ratio of their sides, 
^et I have not so much as heard mentioned the ratio of the 
/olume of a solid to its surface. 

SALV. You yourself have suggested the answer to your ques- 
tion and have removed every doubt. For if one quantity is 
the cube of something of which another quantity is the square 
does it not follow that the cube is the sesquialteral of the square? 
Surely. Now if the surface varies as the square of its linear 
dimensions while the volume varies as the cube of these dimen- 
sions may we not say that the volume stands in sesquialteral 
ratio to the surface? 

SAGR. Quite so. And now although there are still some de- 
tails, in connection with the subject under discussion, con- 
:erning which I might ask questions yet, if we keep making one 
digression after another, it will be long before we reach the 
main topic which has to do with the variety of properties found 
in the resistance which solid bodies offer to fracture; and, 
therefore, if you please, let us return to the subject which we 
originally proposed to discuss. 

SALV. Very well; but the questions which we have already 
considered are so numerous and so varied, and have taken up 
so much time that there is not much of this day left to spend 
upon our main topic which abounds in geometrical demonstra- 
tions calling for careful consideration. May I, therefore, suggest 
that we postpone the meeting until to-morrow, not only for the 
reason just mentioned but also in order that I may bring with 

me 



92 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

me some papers in which I have set down in an orderly way the 
theorems and propositions dealing with the various phases of 
this subject, matters which, from memory alone, I could not 
present in the proper order. 

SAGR. I fully concur in your opinion and all the more will- 
ingly because this will leave time to-day to take up some of 
my difficulties with the subject which we have just been dis- 
cussing. One question is whether we are to consider the re- 
sistance of the medium as sufficient to destroy the acceleration 
of a body of very heavy material, very large volume, and 



. 
spherical figure. I say spherical in order to select a volume which 

is contained within a minimum surface and therefore less sub- 
ject to retardation. 

Another question deals with the vibrations of pendulums 
which may be regarded from several viewpoints; the first is 
whether all vibrations, large, medium, and small, are performed 
in exactly and precisely equal times : another is to find the ratio 
of the times of vibration of pendulums supported by threads of 
unequal length. 

SALV. These are interesting questions : but I fear that here, as 
in the case of all other facts, if we take up for discussion any one 
of them, it will carry in its wake so many other facts and curious 
consequences that time will not remain to-day for the discussion 
of all. 

SAGR. If these are as full of interest as the foregoing, I would 
gladly spend as many days as there remain hours between now 
and nightfall; and I dare say that Simplicio would not be 
wearied by these discussions. 

SIMP. Certainly not; especially when the questions pertain 
to natural science and have not been treated by other philos- 
ophers. 

SALV. Now taking up the first question, I can assert without 
hesitation that there is no sphere so large, or composed of 
material so dense but that the resistance of the medium, al- 
though very slight, would check its acceleration and would, in 
time reduce its motion to uniformity; a statement which is 

strongly 



FIRST DAY 93 

strongly supported by experiment. For if a falling body, as 
time goes on, were to acquire a speed as great as you please, no 
such speed, impressed by external forces [motore esterno], can be 
so great but that the body will first acquire it and then, owing to 
the resisting medium, lose it. Thus, for instance, if a cannon 
ball, having fallen a distance of four cubits through the air and 
having acquired a speed of, say, ten units [gradi\ were to strike 
the surface of the water, and if the resistance of the water were 
not able to check the momentum [impeto] of the shot, it would 
either increase in speed or maintain a uniform motion until the 
bottom were reached: but such is not the observed fact; on the 
contrary, the water when only a few cubits deep hinders and 
diminishes the motion in such a way that the shot delivers 
to the bed of the river or lake a very slight impulse. Clearly 

[137] 

then if a short fall through the water is sufficient to deprive a 
cannon ball of its speed, this speed cannot be regained by a fall 
of even a thousand cubits. How could a body acquire, in a fall of 
a thousand cubits, that which it loses in a fall of four? But what 
more is needed? Do we not observe that the enormous momen- 
tum, delivered to a shot by a cannon, is so deadened by passing 
through a few cubits of water that the ball, so far from injuring 
the ship, barely strikes it? Even the air, although a very yield- 
ing medium, can also diminish the speed of a falling body, as 
may be easily understood from similar experiments. For if a 
gun be fired downwards from the top of a very high tower the 
shot will make a smaller impression upon the ground than if 
the gun had been fired from an elevation of only four or six 
cubits; this is clear evidence that the momentum of the ball, 
fired from the top of the ^ower, diminishes continually from 
the instant it leaves the barrel until it reaches the ground. 
Therefore a fall from ever so great an altitude will not suffice to 
give to a body that momentum which it has once lost through 
the resistance of the air, no matter how it was originally acquired. 
In like manner, the destructive effect produced upon a wall by a 
shot fired from a gun at a distance of twenty cubits cannot be 
duplicated by the fall of the same shot from any altitude how- 
ever 



94 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 
ever great. My opinion is, therefore, that under the circum- 
stances which occur in nature, the acceleration of any body fall- 
ing from rest reaches an end and that the resistance of the 
medium finally reduces its speed to a constant value which is 
thereafter maintained. 

SAGR. These experiments are in my opinion much to the 
purpose; the only question is whether an opponent might not 
make bold to deny the fact in the case of bodies \moli] which are 
very large and heavy or to assert that a cannon ball, falling from 
the distance of the moon or from the upper regions of the atmos- 
phere, would deliver a heavier blow than if just leaving the 
muzzle of the gun. 

SALV. No doubt many objections may be raised not all of 
which can be refuted by experiment: however in this particular 

[138] 

case the following consideration must be taken into account, 
namely, that it is very likely that a heavy body falling from a 
height will, on reaching the ground, have acquired just as much 
momentum as was necessary to carry it to that height; as may 
be clearly seen in the case of a rather heavy pendulum which, 
when pulled aside fifty or sixty degrees from the vertical, will 
acquire precisely that speed and force which are sufficient to 
carry it to an equal elevation save only that small portion which 
it loses through friction on the air. In order to place a cannon 
ball at such a height as might suffice to give it just that momen- 
tum which the powder imparted to it on leaving the gun we 
need only fire it vertically upwards from the same gun; and we 
can then observe whether on falling back it delivers a blow equal 
to that of the gun fired at close range; in my opinion it would be 
much weaker. The resistance of the air would, therefore, I 
think, prevent the muzzle velocity from being equalled by a 
natural fall from rest at any height whatsoever. 

We come now to the other questions, relating to pendulums, 
a subject which may appear to many exceedingly arid, es- 
pecially to those philosophers who are continually occupied 
with the more profound questions of nature. Nevertheless, the 
problem is one which I do not scorn. I am encouraged by the 

example 



FIRST DAY 95 

example of Aristotle whom I admire especially because he did 
not fail to discuss every subject which he thought in any degree 
worthy of consideration. 

Impelled by your queries I may give you some of my ideas 
concerning certain problems in music, a splendid subject, upon 
which so many eminent men have written: among these is 
Aristotle himself who has discussed numerous interesting acous- 
tical questions. Accordingly, if on the basis of some easy and 
tangible experiments, I shall explain some striking phenomena 
in the domain of sound, I trust my explanations will meet your 
approval. 

SAGR. I shall receive them not only gratefully but eagerly. 
For, although I take pleasure in every kind of musical instru- 

[139] 

ment and have paid considerable attention to harmony, I have 
never been able to fully understand why some combinations of 
tones are more pleasing than others, or why certain combina- 
tions not only fail to please but are even highly offensive. 
Then there is the old problem of two stretched strings in unison; 
when one of them is sounded, the other begins to vibrate and 
to emit its note; nor do I understand the different ratios of 
harmony [forme delle consonanze] and some other details. 

SALV. Let us see whether we cannot derive from the pendulum 
a satisfactory solution of all these difficulties. And first, as to 
the question whether one and the same pendulum really per- 
forms its vibrations, large, medium, and small, all in exactly 
the same time, I shall rely upon what I have already heard from 
our Academician. He has clearly shown that the time of 
descent is the same along all chords, whatever the arcs which 
subtend them, as well along an arc of 1 80 (i. e., the whole 
diameter) as along one of 100, 60, 10, 2, ^> or 4'. It is 
understood, of course, that these arcs all terminate at the 
lowest point of the circle, where it touches the horizontal plane. 

If now we consider descent along arcs instead of their chords 
then, provided these do not exceed 90, experiment shows that 
they are all traversed in equal times; but these times are greater 
for the chord than for the arc, an effect which is all the more 

remarkable 



96 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

remarkable because at first glance one would think just the 
opposite to be true. For since the terminal points of the two 
motions are the same and since the straight line included be- 
tween these two points is the shortest distance between them, it 
would seem reasonable that motion along this line should be 
executed in the shortest time; but this is not the case, for the 
shortest time and therefore the most rapid motion is that 
employed along the arc of which this straight line is the chord. 

As to the times of vibration of bodies suspended by threads of 
different lengths, they bear to each other the same proportion as 
the square roots of the lengths of the thread; or one might say 
the lengths are to each other as the squares of the times; so that 
if one wishes to make the vibration-time of one pendulum twice 
that of another, he must make its suspension four times as long. 
In like manner, if one pendulum has a suspension nine times as 

[140] 

long as another, this second pendulum will execute three vibra- 
tions during each one of the first; from which it follows that the 
lengths of the suspending cords bear to each other the [inverse] 
ratio of the squares of the number of vibrations performed in the 
same time. 

SAGR. Then, if I understand you corredlly, I can easily meas- 
ure the length of a string whose upper end is attached at any 
height whatever even if this end were invisible and I could see 
only the lower extremity. For if I attach to the lower end of this 
string a rather heavy weight and give it a to-and-fro motion, 
and if I ask a friend to count a number of its vibrations, while I, 
during the same time-interval, count the number of vibrations 
of a pendulum which is exactly one cubit in length, then knowing 
the number of vibrations which each pendulum makes in the 
given interval of time one can determine the length of the 
string. Suppose, for example, that my friend counts 20 vibra- 
tions of the long cord during the same time in which I count 
240 of my string which is one cubit in length; taking the squares 
of the two numbers, 20 and 240, namely 400 and 57600, then, I 
say, the long string contains 57600 units of such length that 
my pendulum will contain 400 of them; and since the length of 

my 



FIRST DAY 97 

my string is one cubit, I shall divide 57600 by 400 and thus ob- 
tain 144. Accordingly I shall call the length of the string 144 
cubits. 

SALV. Nor will you miss it by as much as a hand's breadth, 
especially if you observe a large number of vibrations. 

SAGR. You give me frequent occasion to admire the wealth 
and profusion of nature when, from such common and even 
trivial phenomena, you derive facts which are not only striking 
and new but which are often far removed from what we would 
have imagined. Thousands of times I have observed vibrations 
especially in churches where lamps, suspended by long cords, 
had been inadvertently set into motion; but the most which I 
could infer from these observations was that the view of those 
who think that such vibrations are maintained by the medium 
is highly improbable: for, in that case, the air must needs have 
considerable judgment and little else to do but kill time by push- 
ing to and fro a pendent weight with perfect regularity. But I 
never dreamed of learning that one and the same body, when 

[Hi] 

suspended from a string a hundred cubits long and pulled aside 
through an arc of 90 or even i or ^2, would employ the same 
time in passing through the least as through the largest of these 
arcs; and, indeed, it still strikes me as somewhat unlikely. 
Mow I am waiting to hear how these same simple phenomena can 
\irnish solutions for those acoustical problems solutions which 
will be at least partly satisfactory. 

SALV. First of all one must observe that each pendulum has 
ts own time of vibration so definite and determinate that 
t is not possible to make it move with any other period [altro 
periodo] than that which nature has given it. For let any one 
:ake in his hand the cord to which the weight is attached and 
:ry, as much as he pleases, to increase or diminish the frequency 
frequenza] of its vibrations; it will be time wasted. On the 
other hand, one can confer motion upon even a heavy pendulum 
which is at rest by simply blowing against it; by repeating these 
Dlasts with a frequency which is the same as that of the pendu- 
lum one can impart considerable motion. Suppose that by the 

first 



98 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

first puff we have displaced the pendulum from the vertical b; 
say, half an inch; then if, after the pendulum has returned and 
about to begin the second vibration, we add a second puff, w 
shall impart additional motion; and so on with other bias 
provided they are applied at the right instant, and not when tl: 
pendulum is coming toward us since in this case the blast woul 
impede rather than aid the motion. Continuing thus wit 
many impulses [impulsi\ we impart to the pendulum sue 
momentum [impeto] that a greater impulse [forza] than that of 
single blast will be needed to stop it. 

SAGR. Even as a boy, I observed that one man alone h 
giving these impulses at the right instant was able to ring 
bell so large that when four, or even six, men seized the rof 
and tried to stop it they were lifted from the ground, all < 
them together being unable to counterbalance the momentu] 
which a single man, by properly-timed pulls, had given it. 

SALV. Your illustration makes my meaning clear and is quil 
as well fitted, as what I have just said, to explain the wonderfi 
phenomenon of the strings of the cittern [cetera] or of the spin< 

[142] 

[cimbalo], namely, the fact that a vibrating string will s< 
another string in motion and cause it to sound not only when tl: 
latter is in unison but even when it differs from the former by a 
octave or a fifth. A string which has been struck begins 1 
vibrate and continues the motion as long as one hears tit 
sound [risonanza]; these vibrations cause the immediately su: 
rounding air to vibrate and quiver; then these ripples in the a 
expand far into space and strike not only all the strings of tli 
same instrument but even those of neighboring instrument; 
Since that string which is tuned to unison with the one plucke 
is capable of vibrating with the same frequency, it acquire: 
at the first impulse, a slight oscillation; after receiving tw< 
three, twenty, or more impulses, delivered at proper interval; 
it finally accumulates a vibratory motion equal to that of th 
plucked string, as is clearly shown by equality of amplitude i 
their vibrations. This undulation expands through the air an 
sets into vibration not only strings, but also any other bod 

whic 



FIRST DAY 99 

which happens to have the same period as that of the plucked 
string. Accordingly if we attach to the side of an instrument 
small pieces of bristle or other flexible bodies, we shall observe 
that, when a spinet is sounded, only those pieces respond that 
have the same period as the string which has been struck; the 
remaining pieces do not vibrate in response to this string, nor 
do the former pieces respond to any other tone. 

If one bows the base string on a viola rather smartly and 
brings near it a goblet of fine, thin glass having the same tone 
[tuono] as that of the string, this goblet will vibrate and audibly 
resound. That the undulations of the medium are widely 
dispersed about the sounding body is evinced by the fact that a 
glass of water may be made to emit a tone merely by the friction 
of the finger-tip upon the rim of the glass; for in this water is 
produced a series of regular waves. The same phenomenon is 
observed to better advantage by fixing the base of the goblet 
upon the bottom of a rather large vessel of water filled nearly to 
the edge of the goblet; for if, as before, we sound the glass by 
friction of the finger, we shall see ripples spreading with the 
utmost regularity and with high speed to large distances about 
the glass. I have often remarked, in thus sounding a rather 

[143] 

large glass nearly full of water, that at first the waves are spaced 
with great uniformity, and when, as sometimes happens, the 
tone of the glass jumps an octave higher I have noted that at 
this moment each of the aforesaid waves divides into two; a 
phenomenon which shows clearly that the ratio involved in the 
octave [forma delV ottava] is two. 

SAGR. More than once have I observed this same thing, much 
to my delight and also to my profit. For a long time I have 
Deen perplexed about these different harmonies since the ex- 
planations hitherto given by those learned in music impress 
me as not sufficiently conclusive. They tell us that the diapa- 
son, i. e. the octave, involves the ratio of two, that the diapente 
which we call the fifth involves a ratio of 3 :2, etc. ; because if 
the open string of a monochord be sounded and afterwards a 
bridge be placed in the middle and the half length be sounded 

one 



ioo THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

one hears theocftave; and if the bridge be placed at 1/3 the lengt 
of the string, then on plucking first the open string and afte 
wards 2/3 of its length the fifth is given ; for this reason they sa 
that the octave depends upon the ratio of two to one [coi 
tenuta tra'l due e Vuno\ and the fifth upon the ratio of three t 
two. This explanation does not impress me as sufficient t 
establish 2 and 3/2 as the natural ratios of theocftave and thefiftl 
and my reason for thinking so is as follows. There are thrc 
different ways in which the tone of a string may be sharpenec 
namely, by shortening it, by stretching it and by making 
thinner. If the tension and size of the string remain constar 
one obtains the odlave by shortening it to one-half, i. e., by sounc 
ing first the open string and then one-half of it; but if length an 
size remain constant and one attempts to produce the octave b 
stretching he will find that it does not suffice to double th 
stretching weight; it must be quadrupled; so that, if the fundc 
mental note is produced by a weight of one pound, four will b 
required to bring out the octave. 

And finally if the length and tension remain constant, whii 
one changes the size * of the string he will find that in order t 
produce the odlave the size must be reduced to X tnat wn i c 
gave the fundamental. And what I have said concerning th 
octave, namely, that its ratio as derived from the tension an 
size of the string is the square of that derived from the lengtl 
applies equally well to all other musical intervals [interval 



musici\. Thus if one wishes to produce a fifth by changing th 
length he finds that the ratio of the lengths must be sesquialtera 
in other words he sounds first the open string, then two-third 
of it; but if he wishes to produce this same result by stretching c 
thinning the string then it becomes necessary to square th 
ratio 3/2 that is by taking 9/4 [dupla sesquiquarta]; according!} 
if the fundamental requires a weight of 4 pounds, the highe 
note will be produced not by 6, but by 9 pounds; the same i 
true in regard to size, the string which gives the fundamental i 
larger than that which yields the fifth in the ratio of 9 to 4 
In view of these facts, I see no reason why those wise philos 
* For the exact meaning of "size" see p. 103 below. [Trans.] 



FIRST DAY 101 

ophers should adopt 2 rather than 4 as the ratio of the octave, 
or why in the case of the fifth they should employ the sesquialt- 
eral ratio, 3/2, rather than that of 9/4. Since it is impossible to 
count the vibrations of a sounding string on account of its high 
frequency, I should still have been in doubt as to whether a 
string, emitting the upper octave, made twice as many vibra- 
tions in the same time as one giving the fundamental, had it 
not been for the following fact, namely, that at the instant when 
the tone jumps to the octave, the waves which constantly ac- 
company the vibrating glass divide up into smaller ones which 
are precisely half as long as the former. 

SALV. This is a beautiful experiment enabling us to distin- 
guish individually the waves which are produced by the vibra- 
tions of a sonorous body, which spread through the air, bringing 
to the tympanum of the ear a stimulus which the mind translates 
into sound. But since these waves in the water last only so long 
as the friction of the finger continues and are, even then, not 
constant but are always forming and disappearing, would it not 
be a fine thing if one had the ability to produce waves which 
would persist for a long while, even months and years, so as to 
easily measure and count them? 

SAGR. Such an invention would, I assure you, command my 
admiration. 

SALV. The device is one which I hit upon by accident; my part 
consists merely in the observation of it and in the appreciation 
of its value as a confirmation of something to which I had given 
profound consideration; and yet the device is, in itself, rather 
common. As I was scraping a brass plate with a sharp iron 

[145] 

chisel in order to remove some spots from it and was running 
the chisel rather rapidly over it, I once or twice, during many 
strokes, heard the plate emit a rather strong and clear whistling 
sound; on looking at the plate more carefully, I noticed a long 
row of fine streaks parallel and equidistant from one another. 
Scraping with the chisel over and over again, I noticed that it 
was only when the plate emitted this hissing noise that any 
marks were left upon it; when the scraping was not accompanied 

by 



102 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

by this sibilant note there was not the least trace of such marks. 
Repeating the trick several times and making the stroke, now 
with greater now with less speed, the whistling followed with a 
pitch which was correspondingly higher and lower. I noted 
also that the marks made when the tones were higher were 
closer together; but when the tones were deeper, they were 
farther apart. I also observed that when, during a single stroke, 
the speed increased toward the end the sound became sharper 
and the streaks grew closer together, but always in such a way as 
to remain sharply defined and equidistant. Besides whenever 
the stroke was accompanied by hissing I felt the chisel tremble 
in my grasp and a sort of shiver run through my hand. In short 
we see and hear in the case of the chisel precisely that which 
is seen and heard in the case of a whisper followed by a loud 
voice; for, when the breath is emitted without the production 
of a tone, one does not feel either in the throat or mouth any 
motion to speak of in comparison with that which is felt in the 
larynx and upper part of the throat when the voice is used, 
especially when the tones employed are low and strong. 

At times I have also observed among the strings of the spinet 
two which were in unison with two of the tones produced by the 
aforesaid scraping; and among those which differed most in 
pitch I found two which were separated by an interval of a 
perfect fifth. Upon measuring the distance between the mark- 
ings produced by the two scrapings it was found that the space 
which contained 45 of one contained 30 of the other, which is 
precisely the ratio assigned to the fifth. 

But now before proceeding any farther I want to call your 
attention to the fact that, of the three methods for sharpening a 
tone, the one which you refer to as the fineness of the string 
should be attributed to its weight. So long as the material of 

[146] 

the string is unchanged, the size and weight vary in the same 
ratio. Thus in the case of gut-strings, we obtain the octave by 
making one string 4 times as large as the other; so also in the 
case of brass one wire must have 4 times the size of the other; 
but if now we wish to obtain the octave of a gut-string, by use of 

brass 



FIRST DAY 103 

brass wire, we must make it, not four times as large, but four 
times as heavy as the gut-string: as regards size therefore the 
metal string is not four times as big but four times as heavy. 
The wire may therefore be even thinner than the gut notwith- 
standing the fact that the latter gives the higher note. Hence if 
two spinets are strung, one with gold wire the other with brass, 
and if the corresponding strings each have the same length, 
diameter, and tension it follows that the instrument strung with 
gold will have a pitch about one-fifth lower than the other be- 
cause gold has a density almost twice that of brass. And here 
it is to be noted that it is the weight rather than the size of a 
moving body which offers resistance to change of motion [velocita 
del moto] contrary to what one might at first glance think. For 
it seems reasonable to believe that a body which is large and light 
should suffer greater retardation of motion in thrusting aside the 
medium than would one which is thin and heavy; yet here 
exactly the opposite is true. 

Returning now to the original subject of discussion, I assert 
that the ratio of a musical interval is not immediately deter- 
mined either by the length, size, or tension of the strings but 
rather by the ratio of their frequencies, that is, by the number 
of pulses of air waves which strike the tympanum of the ear, 
causing it also to vibrate with the same frequency. This fact 
established, we may possibly explain why certain pairs of notes, 
differing in pitch produce a pleasing sensation, others a less 
pleasant effect, and still others a disagreeable sensation. Such 
an explanation would be tantamount to an explanation of the 
more or less perfect consonances and of dissonances. The un- 
pleasant sensation produced by the latter arises, I think, from 
the discordant vibrations of two different tones which strike the 
ear out of time [sproporzionatamente]. Especially harsh is the 
dissonance between notes whose frequencies are incommen- 
surable; such a case occurs when one has two strings in unison 
and sounds one of them open, together with a part of the other 

[147] 

which bears the same ratio to its wnole length as the side of a 
square bears to the diagonal; this yields a dissonance similar 

to 



104 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

to the augmented fourth or diminished fifth [tritono o semi- 
diapente]. 

Agreeable consonances are pairs of tones which strike the 
ear with a certain regularity; this regularity consists in the 
fact that the pulses delivered by the two tones, in the same 
interval of time, shall be commensurable in number, so as not to 
keep the ear drum in perpetual torment, bending in two different 
directions in order to yield to the ever-discordant impulses. 

The first and most pleasing consonance is, therefore, the 
odtave since, for every pulse given to the tympanum by the 
lower string, the sharp string delivers two; accordingly at every 
other vibration of the upper string both pulses are delivered 
simultaneously so that one-half the entire number of pulses are 
delivered in unison. But when two strings are in unison their 
vibrations always coincide and the effect is that of a single 
string; hence we do not refer to it as consonance. The fifth is 
also a pleasing interval since for every two vibrations of the 
lower string the upper one gives three, so that considering the 
entire number of pulses from the upper string one-third of them 
will strike in unison, i. e., between each pair of concordant vibra- 
tions there intervene two single vibrations; and when the in- 
terval is a fourth, three single vibrations intervene. In case the 
interval is a second where the ratio is 9/8 it is only every ninth 
vibration of the upper string which reaches the ear simulta- 
neously with one of the lower; all the others are discordant and 
produce a harsh effect upon the recipient ear which interprets 
them as dissonances. 

SIMP. Won't you be good enough to explain this argument a 
little more clearly? 

SALV. Let AB denote the length of a wave [lo spazio e la 
dilatazione d'una vibrazione] emitted by the lower string and 
CD that of a higher string which is emitting the odlave of AB; 
divide AB in the middle at E. If the two strings begin their 
motions at A and C, it is clear that when the sharp vibration has 
reached the end D, the other vibration will have travelled only 
as far as E, which, not being a terminal point, will emit no pulse; 
but there is a blow delivered at D. Accordingly when the one 

wave 



FIRST DAY 105 

wave comes back from D to C, the other passes on from E to B ; 
hence the two pulses from B and C strike the drum of the ear 
simultaneously. Seeing that these vibrations are repeated 
again and again in the same manner, we con- jv, E B 
elude that each alternate pulse from CD falls ' ' 

in unison with one from AB. But each of the , - L 

[I 4 8] C D 

pulsations at the terminal points, A and B, is A B 

constantly accompanied by one which leaves al- * ' ' ' 

ways from C or always from D. This is clear t i i 
because if we suppose the waves to reach A and c m D 
C at the same instant, then, while one wave Fig. 13 
travels from A to B, the other will proceed from C to D and 
back to C, so that waves strike at C and B simultaneously; 
during the passage of the wave from B back to A the disturbance 
at C goes to D and again returns to C, so that once more the 
pulses at A and C are simultaneous. 

Next let the vibrations AB and CD be separated by an in- 
terval of a fifth, that is, by a ratio of 3/2; choose the points E and 
O such that they will divide the wave length of the lower string 
into three equal parts and imagine the vibrations to start at the 
same instant from each of the terminals A and C. It is evident 
that when the pulse has been delivered at the terminal D, the 
wave in AB has travelled only as far as O; the drum of the ear 
receives, therefore, only the pulse from D. Then during the 
return of the one vibration from D to C, the other will pass from 
O to B and then back to O, producing an isolated pulse at B a 
pulse which is out of time but one which must be taken into 
consideration. 

Now since we have assumed that the first pulsations started 
from the terminals A and C at the same instant, it follows that 
the second pulsation, isolated at D, occurred after an interval of 
time equal to that required for passage from C to D or, what is 
the same thing, from A to O; but the next pulsation, the one at 
B, is separated from the preceding by only half this interval, 
namely, the time required for passage from O to B. Next while 
the one vibration travels from O to A, the other travels from C to 

D, 



106 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

D, the result of which is that two pulsations occur simulta- 
neously at A and D. Cycles of this kind follow one after an- 
other, i. e., one solitary pulse of the lower string interposed be- 
tween two solitary pulses of the upper string. Let us no\\ 
imagine time to be divided into very small equal intervals 
then if we assume that, during the first two of these intervals, 
the disturbances which occurred simultaneously at A and C have 
travelled as far as O and D and have produced a pulse at D; anc 
if we assume that during the third and fourth intervals one 
disturbance returns from D to C, producing a pulse at C, while 
the other, passing on from O to B and back to O, produces i 
pulse at B ; and if finally, during the fifth and sixth intervals, the 
disturbances travel from O and C to A and D, producing c 
pulse at each of the latter two, then the sequence in which the 
pulses strike the ear will be such that, if we begin to count time 
from any instant where two pulses are simultaneous, the ea] 
drum will, after the lapse of two of the said intervals, receive c 
solitary pulse; at the end of the third interval, another solitary 



pulse; so also at the end of the fourth interval; and two in- 
tervals later, i. e., at the end of the sixth interval, will be hearc 
two pulses in unison. Here ends the cycle the anomaly, so tc 
speak which repeats itself over and over again. 

SAGR. I can no longer remain silent; for I must express to yoi; 
the great pleasure I have in hearing such a complete explanatior 
of phenomena with regard to which I have so long been ir 
darkness. Now I understand why unison does not differ from z 
single tone; I understand why the ocftave is the principal har- 
mony, but so like unison as often to be mistaken for it and alsc 
why it occurs with the other harmonies. It resembles unisor 
because the pulsations of strings in unison always occur simulta- 
neously, and those of the lower string of the octave are always 
accompanied by those of the upper string; and among the lattei 
is interposed a solitary pulse at equal intervals and in such a 
manner as to produce no disturbance; the result is that such a 
harmony is rather too much softened and lacks fire. But the 
fifth is characterized by its displaced beats and by the interposi- 

tion 



FIRST DAY 107 

tion of two solitary beats of the upper string and one solitary 
beat of the lower string between each pair of simultaneous 
pulses; these three solitary pulses are separated by intervals of 
time equal to half the interval which separates each pair of 
simultaneous beats from the solitary beats of the upper string. 
Thus the effect of the fifth is to produce a tickling of the ear 
drum such that its softness is modified with sprightliness, giving 
at the same moment the impression of a gentle kiss and of a bite. 

SALV. Seeing that you have derived so much pleasure from 
these novelties, I must show you a method by which the eye may 
enjoy the same game as the ear. Suspend three balls of lead, or 
other heavy material, by means of strings of different length 
such that while the longest makes two vibrations the shortest 
will make four and the medium three; this will take place when 
the longest string measures 16, either in hand breadths or in any 
other unit, the medium 9 and the shortest 4, all measured in the 
same unit. 

Now pull all these pendulums aside from the perpendicular 
and release them at the same instant; you will see a curious 
interplay of the threads passing each other in various manners 
but such that at the completion of every fourth vibration of 
the longest pendulum, all three will arrive simultaneously at 
the same terminus, whence they start over again to repeat the 
same cycle. This combination of vibrations, when produced on 
strings is precisely that which yields the interval of the octave 
and the intermediate fifth. If we employ the same disposition 

[150] 

of apparatus but change the lengths of the threads, always 
however in such a way that their vibrations correspond to those 
of agreeable musical intervals, we shall see a different crossing 
of these threads but always such that, after a definite interval of 
time and after a definite number of vibrations, all the threads, 
whether three or four, will reach the same terminus at the same 
instant, and then begin a repetition of the cycle. 

If however the vibrations of two or more strings are incom- 
mensurable so that they never complete a definite number of 
vibrations at the same instant, or if commensurable they return 

only 



io8 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

only after a long interval of time and after a large number oi 
vibrations, then the eye is confused by the disorderly succession 
of crossed threads. In like manner the ear is pained by an 
irregular sequence of air waves which strike the tympanum with- 
out any fixed order. 

But, gentlemen, whither have we drifted during these many 
hours lured on by various problems and unexpected digressions ? 
The day is already ended and we have scarcely touched the 
subject proposed for discussion. Indeed we have deviated so far 
that I remember only with difficulty our early introduction and 
the little progress made in the way of hypotheses and principles 
for use in later demonstrations. 

SAGR. Let us then adjourn for to-day in order that our minds 
may find refreshment in sleep and that we may return to- 
morrow, if so please you, and resume the discussion of the main 
question. 

SALV. I shall not fail to be here to-morrow at the same hour, 
hoping not only to render you service but also to enjoy your 
company. 



END OF THE FIRST DAY. 





SECOND DAY 

GR. While Simplicio and I were awaiting 
your arrival we were trying to recall that last 
consideration which you advanced as a prin- 
ciple and basis for the results you intended to 
obtain; this consideration dealt with the 
resistance which all solids offer to fracflure 
and depended upon a certain cement which 
held the parts glued together so that they 
would yield and separate only under considerable pull [potente 
attrazzione]. Later we tried to find the explanation of this 
coherence, seeking it mainly in the vacuum; this was the occa- 
sion of our many digressions which occupied the entire day and 
led us far afield from the original question which, as I have 
already stated, was the consideration of the resistance [resistenza] 
that solids offer to fracfture. 

SALV. I remember it all very well. Resuming the thread of 
our discourse, whatever the nature of this resistance which solids 
offer to large tractive forces [violenta attrazzione] there can at 
least be no doubt of its existence; and though this resistance is 
very great in the case of a direct pull, it is found, as a rule, to be 
less in the case of bending forces [net violentargli per traverso]. 
Thus, for example, a rod of steel or of glass will sustain a longi- 
tudinal pull of a thousand pounds while a weight of fifty pounds 
would be quite sufficient to break it if the rod were fastened at 
right angles into a vertical wall. It is this second type of re- 
sistance which we must consider, seeking to discover in what 

[152] 

proportion 



i io THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

proportion it is found in prisms and cylinders of the same 
material, whether alike or unlike in shape, length, and thick- 
ness. In this discussion I shall take for granted the well-known 
mechanical principle which has been shown to govern the 
behavior of a bar, which we call a lever, namely, that the force 
bears to the resistance the inverse ratio of the distances which 
separate the fulcrum from the force and resistance respectively. 

SIMP. This was demonstrated first of all by Aristotle, in his 
Mechanics. 

SALV. Yes, I am willing to concede him priority in point of 
time; but as regards rigor of demonstration the first place must 
be given to Archimedes, since upon a single proposition proved 
in his book on Equilibrium * depends not only the law of the 
lever but also those of most other mechanical devices. 

SAGR. Since now this principle is fundamental to all the 
demonstrations which you propose to set forth would it not be 
advisable to give us a complete and thorough proof of this 
proposition unless possibly it would take too much time? 

SALV. Yes, that would be quite proper, but it is better I 
think to approach our subject in a manner somewhat different 
from that employed by Archimedes, namely, by first assuming 
merely that equal weights placed in a balance of equal arms will 
produce equilibrium a principle also assumed by Archimedes 
and then proving that it is no less true that unequal weights 
produce equilibrium when the arms of the steelyard have 
lengths inversely proportional to the weights suspended from 
them; in other words, it amounts to the same thing whether 
one places equal weights at equal distances or unequal weights 
at distances which bear to each other the inverse ratio of the 
weights. 

In order to make this matter clear imagine a prism or solid 
cylinder, AB, suspended at each end to the rod [linea] HI, and 
supported by two threads HA and IB; it is evident that if I 
attach a thread, C, at the middle point of the balance beam HI, 
the entire prism AB will, according to the principle assumed, hang 
in equilibrium since one-half its weight lies on one side, and the 
other half on the other side, of the point of suspension C. Now 

* Works of Archimedes. Trans, by T. L. Heath, pp. 189-220. [Trans] 



SECOND DAY in 

suppose the prism to be divided into unequal parts by a plane 

[153] 

through the line D, and let the part DA be the larger and DB 
the smaller: this division having been made, imagine a thread 
ED, attached at the point E and supporting the parts AD and 
DB, in order that these parts may remain in the same position 
relative to line HI: and since the relative position of the prism 
and the beam HI remains unchanged, there can be no doubt 
but that the prism will maintain its former state of equilibrium. 



H 




Fig. 14 

But circumstances would remain the same if that part of the 
prism which is now held up, at the ends, by the threads AH and 
D.E were supported at the middle by a single thread GL; and 
likewise the other part DB would not change position if held 
by a thread FM placed at its middle point. Suppose now the 
threads HA, ED, and IB to be removed, leaving only the two 
GL and FM, then the same equilibrium will be maintained so 
long as the suspension is at C. Now let us consider that we have 
here two heavy bodies AD and DB hung at the ends G and F, of 
a balance beam GF in equilibrium about the point C, so that 
the line CG is the distance from C to the point of suspension 
of the heavy body AD, while CF is the distance at which the 
other heavy body, DB, is supported. It remains now only to 
show that these distances bear to each other the inverse ratio 
of the weights themselves, that is, the distance GC is to the 
distance CF as the prism DB is to the prism DA a proposition 
which we shall prove as follows: Since the line GE is the half of 
EH, and since EF is the half of El, the whole length GF will be 

half 



ii2 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

half of the entire line HI, and therefore equal to CI : if now we 
subtract the common part CF the remainder GC will be equal to 
the remainder FI, that is, to FE, and if to each of these we add 
CE we shall have GE equal to CF: hence GE:EF=FC:CG. 
But GE and EF bear the same ratio to each other as do their 
doubles HE and El, that is, the same ratio as the prism AD to 
DB. Therefore, by equating ratios we have, convertendo, the 
distance GC is to the distance CF as the weight BD is to the 
weight DA, which is what I desired to prove. 

[154] 

If what precedes is clear, you will not hesitate, I think, to 
admit that the two prisms AD and DB are in equilibrium about 
the point C since one-half of the whole body AB lies on the 
right of the suspension C and the other half on the left; in other 
words, this arrangement is equivalent to two equal weights dis- 
posed at equal distances. I do not see how any one can doubt, if 
the two prisms AD and DB were transformed into cubes, spheres, 
or into any other figure whatever and if G and F were retained as 
points of suspension, that they would remain in equilibrium 
about the point C, for it is only too evident that change of figure 
does not produce change of weight so long as the mass [quantita 
di materia] does not vary. From this we may derive the general 
conclusion that any two heavy bodies are in equilibrium at 
distances which are inversely proportional to their weights. 

This principle established, I desire, before passing to any 
other subject, to call your attention to the fact that these forces, 
resistances, moments, figures, etc., may be considered either in 
the abstract, dissociated from matter, or in the concrete, asso- 
ciated with matter. Hence the properties which belong to 
figures that are merely geometrical and non-material must be 
modified when we fill these figures with matter and therefore 
give them weight. Take, for example, the lever BA which, 
resting upon the support E, is used to lift a heavy stone D. 
The principle just demonstrated makes it clear that a force ap- 
plied at the extremity B will just suffice to equilibrate the 
resistance offered by the heavy body D provided this force 
[momenta] bears to the force [momenta] at D the same ratio as the 

distance 



SECOND DAY 113 

distance AC bears to the distance CB ; and this is true so long as 
we consider only the moments of the single force at B and of the 
resistance at D, treating the lever as an immaterial body devoid 
of weight. But if we take into account the weight of the lever 
itself an instrument which may be made either of wood or of 
iron it is manifest that, when this weight has been added to the 



force at B, the ratio will be changed and must therefore be 
expressed in different terms. Hence before going further let 



B 




Fig. 15 

us agree to distinguish between these two points of view; when 
we consider an instrument in the abstract, i. e., apart from the 
weight of its own material, we shall speak of "taking it in an 
absolute sense " [prendere assolutamente] ; but if we fill one of these 
simple and absolute figures with matter and thus give it weight, 
we shall refer to such a material figure as a "moment" or 
"compound force" [momenta oforza composta]. 

SAGR. I must break my resolution about not leading you off 
into a digression; for I cannot concentrate my attention upon 
what is to follow until a certain doubt is removed from my 
mind, namely, you seem to compare the force at B with the 
total weight of the stone D, a part of which possibly the 
greater part rests upon the horizontal plane: so that . . . 

SALV. I understand perfectly: you need go no further. How- 
ever please observe that I have not mentioned the total weight 
of the stone; I spoke only of its force [momenta] at the point A, 
the extremity of the lever BA, which force is always less than 
the total weight of the stone, and varies with its shape and 
elevation. 

SAGR. Good : but there occurs to me another question about 

which 



ii 4 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

which I am curious. For a complete understanding of this 
matter, I should like you to show me, if possible, how one can 
determine what part of the total weight is supported by the 
underlying plane and what part by the end A of the lever. 
SALV. The explanation will not delay us long and I shall 
therefore have pleasure in granting your request. In the accom- 
panying figure, let us understand that the weight having its 
center of gravity at A rests with the end B upon the horizontal 
plane and with the other end upon the lever CG. Let N be 
the fulcrum of a lever to which the force [potenza] is applied at G. 
Let fall the perpendiculars, AO and CF, from the center A and 
the end C. Then I say, the magnitude [momenta] of the entire 
weight bears to the magnitude of the force [momenta delta 
potenza] at G a ratio compounded of the ratio between the two 




Fig. 16 

distances GN and NC and the ratio between FB and BO. 
Lay off a distance X such that its ratio to NC is the same as that 
of BO to FB; then, since the total weight A is counterbalanced 
by the two forces at B and at C, it follows that the force at B is to 
that at C as the distance FO is to the distance OB. Hence, 

[156] 

componendo, the sum of the forces at B and C, that is, the total 
weight A [momento di tutto V peso A\ is to the force at C as the 
line FB is to the line BO, that is, as NC is to X: but the force 
[momento delta potenza} applied at C is to the force applied at 
G as the distance GN is to the distance NC; hence it follows, 
ex aquali in propprtione perturbata* that the entire weight A is 
to the force applied at G as the distance GN is to X. But the 
ratio of GN to X is compounded of the ratio of GN to NC and of 
NC to X, that is, of FB to BO; hence the weight A bears to the 

* For definition of perturbata see Todhunter's Euclid. Book V, Def . 20. 

[Trans.] 






SECOND DAY 115 

equilibrating force at G a ratio compounded of that of GN to 
NC and of FB to BO: which was to be proved. 

Let us now return to our original subject; then, if what has 
hitherto been said is clear, it will be easily understood that, 

PROPOSITION I 

A prism or solid cylinder of glass, steel, wood or other break- 
able material which is capable of sustaining a very heavy weight 
when applied longitudinally is, as previously remarked, easily 
broken by the transverse application of a weight which may be 
much smaller in proportion as the length of the cylinder exceeds 
its thickness. 

Let us imagine a solid prism ABCD fastened into a wall at 
the end AB, and supporting a weight E at the other end; under- 
stand also that the wall is vertical and that the prism or cylinder 
is fastened at right angles to the wall. It is clear that, if the 
cylinder breaks, fracture will occur at the point B where the 
edge of the mortise acts as a fulcrum for the lever BC, to which 
the force is applied; the thickness of the solid BA is the other arm 
of the lever along which is located the resistance. This resistance 
opposes the separation of the part BD, lying outside the wall, 
from that portion lying inside. From the preceding, it follows 
that the magnitude [momenta] of the force applied at C bears to 
the magnitude [momento] of the resistance, found in the thickness 
of the prism, i. e., in the attachment of the base BA to its con- 
tiguous parts, the same ratio which the length CB bears to half 
the length BA; if now we define absolute resistance to fracture 

[157] 

as that offered to a longitudinal pull (in which case the stretch- 
ing force acts in the same direction as that through which the 
body is moved), then it follows that the absolute resistance of 
the prism BD is to the breaking load placed at the end of the 
lever BC in the same ratio as the length BC is to the half of AB 
in the case of a prism, or the semidiameter in the case of a 
linden This is our first proposition.* Observe that in what 

* The one fundamental error which is implicitly introduced into this 
>roposition and which is carried through the entire discussion of the 



ii6 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

has here been said the weight of the solid BD itself has been 
left out of consideration, or rather, the prism has been assumed 
to be devoid of weight. But if the weight of the prism is to be 
taken account of in conjunction with the weight E, we must add 

to the weight E one 




half 



that 
BD: 



of 
so 



the 
that 



prism 

if, for example, the 
latter weighs two 
pounds and the 
weight E is ten 
pounds w e must 
treat the weight E 
as if it were eleven 
pounds. 

SIMP. Why not 
twelve? 

SALV. The weight 
E, my dear Simp- 
licio, hanging at the 
extreme end C acts 
upon the lever BC 
with its full mo- 
ment of ten pounds : 
so also would the 
Fig. 17 solid BD if sus- 

pended at the same point exert its full moment of two pounds; 
but, as you know, this solid is uniformly distributed through- 



Second Day consists in a failure to see that, in such a beam, there must 
be equilibrium between the forces of tension and compression over any 
cross-section. The correct point of view seems first to have been found 
by E. Mariotte in 1680 and by A. Parent in 1713. Fortunately this 
error does not vitiate the conclusions of the subsequent propositions 
which deal only with proportions not actual strength of beams. 
Following K. Pearson (Todhunter's History of Elasticity) one might say 
that Galileo's mistake lay in supposing the fibres of the strained beam to 
be inextensible. Or, confessing the anachronism, one might say that the 
error consisted in taking the lowest fibre of the beam as the neutral axis. 

[Trans] 



SECOND DAY 117 

out its entire length, BC, so that the parts which lie near the 
end B are less effective than those more remote. 

Accordingly if we strike a balance between the two, the 
weight of the entire prism may be considered as concentrated 
at its center of gravity which lies midway of the lever BC. 
But a weight hung at the extremity C exerts a moment twice 
as great as it would if suspended from the middle: therefore 

[158] 

if we consider the moments of both as located at the end C we 
must add to the weight E one-half that of the prism. 

SIMP. I understand perfectly; and moreover, if I mistake not, 
the force of the two weights BD and E, thus disposed, would 
exert the same moment as would the entire weight BD together 
with twice the weight E suspended at the middle of the lever 
BC. 

SALV. Precisely so, and a fact worth remembering. Now 
we can readily understand 

PROPOSITION II 

How and in what proportion a rod, or rather a prism, whose 
width is greater than its thickness offers more resistance to 
fracture when the 
loice is applied in 
the direction of its 
breadth than in the 
direction of its 
thickness. 

For the sake of 
clearness, take a 
ruler ad whose 
width is ac and 
whose thickness, Fig. 18 

cb, is much less than its width. The question now is why will 
the ruler, if stood on edge, as in the first figure, withstand a 
great weight T, while, when laid flat, as in the second figure, 
it will not support the weight X which is less than T. The 
answer is evident when we remember that in the one case 

the 




ii8 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the fulcrum is at the line be, and in the other case at ca, 
while the distance at which the force is applied is the same in 
both cases, namely, the length bd: but in the first case the 
distance of the resistance from the fulcrum half the line ca 
is greater than in the other case where it is only half of be. 
Therefore the weight T is greater than X in the same ratio as 
half the width ca is greater than half the thickness be, since the 
former adls as a lever arm for ca, and the latter for cb, against 
the same resistance, namely, the strength of all the fibres in the 
cross-sedtion ab. We conclude, therefore, that any given ruler, 
or prism, whose width exceeds its thickness, will offer greater 
resistance to fradlure when standing on edge than when lying 
flat, and this in the ratio of the width to the thickness. 

PROPOSITION III 

Considering now the case of a prism or cylinder growing longer 
in a horizontal direction, we must find out in what ratio the 
moment of its own weight increases in comparison with its 
resistance to fradhzre. This moment I find increases in propor- 

[159] 

tion to the square of the length. In order to prove this let AD 
be a prism or cylinder lying horizontal with its end A firmly fixed 
in a wall. Let the length of the prism be increased by the addi- 
tion of the portion BE. It is clear that merely changing the 
length of the lever from AB to AC will, if we disregard its weight, 
increase the moment of the force [at the end] tending to produce 
fracfture at A in the ratio of CA to BA. But, besides this, the 
weight of the solid portion BE, added to the weight of the solid 
AB increases the moment of the total weight in the ratio of the 
weight of the prism AE to that of the prism AB, which is the 
same as the ratio of the length AC to AB. 

It follows, therefore, that, when the length and weight are 
simultaneously increased in any given proportion, the moment, 
which is the product of these two, is increased in a ratio which is 
the square of the preceding proportion. The conclusion is then 
that the bending moments due to the weight of prisms and 
cylinders which have the same thickness but different lengths, 

bear 



SECOND DAY 119 

bear to each other a ratio which is the square of the ratio of 
their lengths, or, what is the same thing, the ratio of the squares 
of their lengths. 
We shall next show in what ratio the resistance to fradhire 




Fig. 19 

[bending strength], in prisms and cylinders, increases with in- 

[160] 

crease of thickness while the length remains unchanged. Here 
I say that 

PROPOSITION IV 

In prisms and cylinders of equal length, but of unequal 
thicknesses, the resistance to fradture increases in the same 
ratio as the cube of the diameter of the thickness, i. e., of 
the base. 

JLet A and B be two cylinders of equal lengths DG, FH; let their 
|bases be circular but unequal, having the diameters CD and EF. 
"hen I say that the resistance to fradlure offered by the cylinder 

B 



120 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

B is to that offered by A as the cube of the diameter FE is to the 
cube of the diameter DC. For, if we consider the resistance to 
fracture by longitudinal pull as dependent upon the bases, i. e., 
upon the circles EF and DC, no one can doubt that the strength 
[resistenza] of the cylinder B is greater than that of A in the 
same proportion in which the area of the circle EF exceeds that 
of CD; because it is precisely in this ratio that the number of 
fibres binding the parts of the solid together in the one cylinder 
exceeds that in the other cylinder. 

But in the case of a force acting transversely it must be re- 
membered that we are employing two levers in which the forces 

are applied at distances DG, 
FH, and the fulcrums are 
located at the points D and 
F; but the resistances are 
applied at distances which 
are equal to the radii of the 
circles DC and EF, since 
the fibres distributed over 
F these entire cross-sections 
Fig. 20 act as if concentrated at the 

centers. Remembering this and remembering also that the 
arms, DG and FH, through which the forces G and H act are 
equal, we can understand that the resistance, located at the 
center of the base EF, acting against the force at H, is more 
effective [maggiore] than the resistance at the center of the 
base CD opposing the force G, in the ratio of the radius FE 
to the radius DC. Accordingly the resistance to fracture of- 
fered by the cylinder B is greater than that of the cylinder A 
in a ratio which is compounded of that of the area of the circles 
EF and DC and that of their radii, i. e., of their diameters; but 
the areas of circles are as the squares of their diameters. There- 
fore the ratio of the resistances, being the product of the two 
preceding ratios, is the same as that of the cubes of the diameters. 
This is what I set out to prove. Also since the volume of a cube 

[161] 

varies as the third power of its edge we may say that the re- 
sistance 




SECOND DAY 121 

sistance [strength] of a cylinder whose length remains constant 
varies as the third power of its diameter. 
From the preceding we are able to conclude that 

COROLLARY 

The resistance [strength] of a prism or cylinder of constant 
length varies in the sesquialteral ratio of its volume. 

This is evident because the volume of a prism or cylinder of 
constant altitude varies direclly as the area of its base, i. e., as 
the square of a side or diameter of this base; but, as just demon- 
strated, the resistance [strength] varies as the cube of this same 
side or diameter. Hence the resistance varies in the sesquialteral 
ratio of the volume consequently also of the weight of the 
solid itself. 

SIMP. Before proceeding further I should like to have one of 
my difficulties removed. Up to this point you have not taken 
into consideration a certain other kind of resistance which, it 
appears to me, diminishes as the solid grows longer, and this is 
quite as true in the case of bending as in pulling; it is precisely 
thus that in the case of a rope we observe that a very long one is 
less able to support a large weight than a short one. Whence, I 
believe, a short rod of wood or iron will support a greater weight 
than if it were long, provided the force be always applied longi- 
tudinally and not transversely, and provided also that we take 
into account the weight of the rope itself which increases with its 
ength. 

SALV. I fear, Simplicio, if I correcflly catch your meaning, 
hat in this particular you are making the same mistake as many 
others; that is if you mean to say that a long rope, one of perhaps 
.o cubits, cannot hold up so great a weight as a shorter length, 
ay one or two cubits, of the same rope. 

SIMP. That is what I meant, and as far as I see the proposition 
s highly probable. 

SALV. On the contrary, I consider it not merely improbable 
)ut false; and I think I can easily convince you of your error, 
t AB represent the rope, fastened at the upper end A: at the 
ower end attach a weight C whose force is just sufficient to 

break 



122 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 
break the rope. Now, Simplicio, point out the exact place where 
you think the break ought to occur. 



SIMP. Let us say D. 
SALV. And why at D? 

SIMP. Because at this point the rope is not strong enough to 
support, say, 100 pounds, made up of the portion of the rope DB 
and the stone C. 

SALV. Accordingly whenever the rope is stretched [violentata] 
with the weight of 100 pounds at D it will break there. 
SIMP. I think so. 

SALV. But tell me, if instead of attaching the weight at the 
end of the rope, B, one fastens it at a point nearer 
D, say, at E: or if, instead of fixing the upper end 
of the rope at A, one fastens it at some point F, just 
above D, will not the rope, at the point D, be sub j eel 
to the same pull of 100 pounds? 

SIMP. It would, provided you include with the 
stone C the portion of rope EB. 

SALV. Let us therefore suppose that the rope is 
stretched at the point D with a weight of 100 pounds, 
then according to your own admission it will break; 
but FE is only a small portion of AB; how can you 
therefore maintain that the long rope is weaker than 
the short one? Give up then this erroneous view 
which you share with many very intelligent people, 
and let us proceed. 

Now having demonstrated that, in the case of 
[uniformly loaded] prisms and cylinders of constant 
thickness, the moment of force tending to produce 
fracture [momenta sopra le proprie resistenze] varies 
as the square of the length; and having likewise shown that, 
when the length is constant and the thickness varies, the resist- 
ance to fracfture varies as the cube of the side, or diameter, 
of the base, let us pass to the investigation of the case of solids 
which simultaneously vary in both length and thickness. Here I 
observe that, 




Fig. 21 



SECOND DAY 123 

PROPOSITION V 

Prisms and cylinders which differ in both length and 
thickness offer resistances to fraclure [i. e., can support at 
their ends loads] which are direcflly proportional to the 
cubes of the diameters of their bases and inversely propor- 
tional to their lengths. 



Let ABC and DEF be two such cylinders; then the resistance 

[bending strength] of the cylinder AC bears to the resistance of 

the cylinder DF a ratio which is the producft of the cube of the 

diameter AB divided by the cube of the diameter DE, and of the 

length EF divided by the A 

length BC. Make EG 

equal to BC: let H be a 

third proportional to the 

lines AB and DE; let I 

be a fourth proportional, 

[AB/DE = H/I]: and let 

I:S=EF:BC 

Now since the resistance 
of the cylinder AC is to 
that of the cylinder DG 
as the cube of AB is to the 
cube of DE, that is, as the 
length AB is to the length 
I; and since the resistance Fig. 22 

of the cylinder DG is to that of the cylinder DF as the length 
FE is to EG, that is, as I is to S, it follows that the length AB 
is to S as the resistance of the cylinder AC is to that of the 
cylinder DF. But the line AB bears to S a ratio which is the 
produdl of AB/I and I/S. Hence the resistance [bending 
strength] of the cylinder AC bears to the resistance of the cyl- 
inder DF a ratio which is the producl of AB/I (that is, AB 3 / 
DE 3 ) and of I/S (that is, EF/BC): which is what I meant to 
prove. 

This proposition having been demonstrated, let us next 

consider 




i2 4 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

consider the case of prisms and cylinders which are similar. 
Concerning these we shall show that, 

PROPOSITION VI 

In the case of similar cylinders and prisms, the moments 
[stretching forces] which result from multiplying together 
their weight and length [i. e., from the moments produced 
by their own weight and length], which latter acts as a 
lever-arm, bear to each other a ratio which is the sesqui- 
alteral of the ratio between the resistances of their bases. 
In order to prove this let us indicate the two similar cylinders 
by AB and CD : then the magnitude of the force [momenta] in the 
cylinder AB, opposing the resistance of its base B, bears to the 
magnitude [momenta] of the force at CD, opposing the resistance 
of its base D, a ratio which is the sesquialteral of the ratio 

between the resistance of the base B and the resistance of the 

base D. And since the 
B solids AB and CD, are 
effective in opposing 
the resistances of their 
bases B and D, in pro- 
D portion to their weights 

and to the mechanical 
&* 2 3 advantages [forze] of 

their lever arms respectively, and since the advantage [forza] of 
the lever arm AB is equal to the advantage [forza] of the lever 
arm CD (this is true because in virtue of the similarity of the 
cylinders the length AB is to the radius of the base B as the 
length CD is to the radius of the base D), it follows that the total 
force [momenta] of the cylinder AB is to the total force [momenta] 
of the cylinder CD as the weight alone of the cylinder AB is to 
the weight alone of the cylinder CD, that is, as the volume of 
the cylinder AB [I'istesso cilindro AB] is to the volume CD 
[airistesso CD]: but these are as the cubes of the diameters 
of their bases B and D; and the resistances of the bases, being 

to 




SECOND DAY 125 

to each other as their areas, are to each other consequently 
as the squares of their diameters. Therefore the forces [momenti] 
of the cylinders are to each other in the sesquialteral ratio of the 
resistance of their bases.* 

SIMP. This proposition strikes me as both new and surprising: 
at first glance it is very different from anything which I my- 
self should have guessed: for since these figures are similar 
in all other respects, I should have certainly thought that 
the forces [momenti] and the resistances of these cylinders would 
have borne to each other the same ratio. 

SAGR. This is the proof of the proposition to which I referred, 
at the very beginning of our discussion, as one imperfectly un- 
derstood by me. 

SALV. For a while, Simplicio, I used to think, as you do, that 
the resistances of similar solids were similar; but a certain casual 
observation showed me that similar solids do not exhibit a 
strength which is proportional to their size, the larger ones being 
less fitted to undergo rough usage just as tall men are more apt 
than small children to be injured by a fall. And, as we re- 
marked at the outset, a large beam or column falling from a 

[165] 

given height will go to pieces when under the same circumstances 
a small scantling or small marble cylinder will not break. It was 
this observation which led me to the investigation of the fact 
which I am about to demonstrate to you: it is a very remarkable 
thing that, among the infinite variety of solids which are similar 
one to another, there are no two of which the forces [momenti], 
and the resistances of these solids are related in the same ratio. 
SIMP. You remind me now of a passage in Aristotle's Questions 

* The preceding paragraph beginning with Prop. VI is of more than 
usual interest as illustrating the confusion of terminology current in the 
time of Galileo. The translation given is literal except in the case of 
those words for which the Italian is supplied. The facts which Galileo 
has in mind are so evident that it is difficult to see how one can here 
interpret "moment" to mean the force "opposing the resistance of its 
base" unless "the force of the lever arm AB" be taken to mean "the 
mechanical advantage of the lever made up of AB and the radius of the 
base B"; and similarly for "the force of the lever arm CD." 

[Trans] 



126 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

in Mechanics in which he tries to explain why it is that a wooden 
beam becomes weaker and can be more easily bent as it grows 
longer, notwithstanding the fact that the shorter beam is thin- 
ner and the longer one thicker: and, if I remember correctly, 
he explains it in terms of the simple lever. 

SALV. Very true: but, since this solution seemed to leave 
room for doubt, Bishop di Guevara,* whose truly learned com- 
mentaries have greatly enriched and illuminated this work, 
indulges in additional clever speculations with the hope of thus 
overcoming all difficulties ; nevertheless even he is confused as 
regards this particular point, namely, whether, when the length 
and thickness of these solid figures increase in the same ratio, 
their strength and resistance to fracture, as well as to bending, 
remain constant. After much thought upon this subject, I have 
reached the following result. First I shall show that, 

PROPOSITION VII 

Among heavy prisms and cylinders of similar figure, there 

is one and only one which under the stress of its own 

weight lies just on the limit between breaking and not 

breaking: so that every larger one is unable to carry the 

load of its own weight and breaks; while every smaller one 

is able to withstand some additional force tending to break it. 

Let AB be a heavy prism, the longest possible that will just 

sustain its own weight, so that if it be lengthened the least bit it 

will break. Then, I say, this prism is unique among all similar 

prisms infinite in number in occupying that boundary line 

between breaking and not breaking; so that every larger one 

[166] 

will break under its own weight, and every smaller one will not 
break, but will be able to withstand some force in addition to its 
own weight. 

Let the prism CE be similar to, but larger than, AB: then, 

I say, it will not remain intact but will break under its own 

weight. Lay off the portion CD, equal in length to AB. And, 

since, the resistance [bending strength] of CD is to that of AB as 

* Bishop of Teano; b. 1561 ; d. 1641. [Trans.] 




SECOND DAY 127 

the cube of the thickness of CD is to the cube of the thickness of 
AB, that is, as the prism CE is to the similar prism AB, it follows 
that the weight of CE is the utmost load which a prism of the 
length CD can sustain; but the length of CE is greater; there- 
fore the prism CE will break. . 
Now take another prism FG 
which is smaller than AB. 
Let FH equal AB, then it can 
be shown in a similar manner 
that the resistance [bending 
strength] of FG is to that of Fig. 24 

AB as the prism FG is to the prism AB provided the dis- 
tance AB that is FH, is equal to the distance FG; but AB 
is greater than FG, and therefore the moment of the prism 
FG applied at G is not sufficient to break the prism FG. 

SAGR. The demonstration is short and clear; while the proposi- 
tion which, at first glance, appeared improbable is now seen 
to be both true and inevitable. In order therefore to bring this 
prism into that limiting condition which separates breaking 
from not breaking, it would be necessary to change the ratio 
between thickness and length either by increasing the thickness 
or by diminishing the length. An investigation of this limiting 
state will, I believe, demand equal ingenuity. 

SALV. Nay, even more; for the question is more difficult; this 
I know because I spent no small amount of time in its discovery 
which I now wish to share with you. 

PROPOSITION VIII 

Given a cylinder or prism of the greatest length consist- 
ent with its not breaking under its own weight; and having 
given a greater length, to find the diameter of another 
cylinder or prism of this greater length which shall be the 
only and largest one capable of withstanding its own weight. 
Let BC be the largest cylinder capable of sustaining its own 
weight; and let DE be a length greater than AC: the problem is 
to find the diameter of the cylinder which, having the length 

[167] 

DE, 



128 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

DE, shall be the largest one just able to withstand its own 
weight. Let I be a third proportional to the lengths DE and 
AC; let the diameter FD be to the diameter BA as DE is to I; 
draw the cylinder FE; then, among all cylinders having the 
same proportions, this is the largest and only one just capable 
of sustaining its own weight. 

Let M be a third proportional to DE and I: also let O be a 

fourth proportional to DE, I, and M; lay off FG equal to AC. 

Now since the diameter FD is to the diameter AB as the length 

DE is to I, and since O is a fourth proportional to DE, I and M, 

it follows that FD 3 :BA 3 =DE:O. But the resistance [bending 

A^.^^ A C strength] of the cylinder DG is 

B to the resistance of the cylinder 

^ 7" ' ** cylinder BC as the length DE is 

p, i to O. And since the moment 

Fig. 25 of the cylinder BC is held in 

equilibrium by [e equate alia} its resistance, we shall accomplish 
our end (which is to prove that the moment of the cylinder FE 
is equal to the resistance located at FD), if we show that the 
moment of the cylinder FE is to the moment of the cylinder BC 
as the resistance DF is to the resistance BA, that is, as the cube 
of FD is to the cube of BA, or as the length DE is to O. The 
moment of the cylinder FE is to the moment of the cylinder 
DG as the square of DE is to the square of AC, that is, as the 
length DE is to I; but the moment of the cylinder DG is to the 
moment of the cylinder BC, as the square of DF is to the square 
of BA, that is, as the square of DE is to the square of I, or as the 
square of I is to the square of M, or, as I is to O. Therefore by 
equating ratios, it results that the moment of the cylinder FE is 
to the moment of the cylinder BC as the length DE is to O, that 
is, as the cube of DF is to the cube of BA, or as the resistance of 
the base DF is to the resistance of the base BA; which was to be 
proven. 

SAGR. This demonstration, Salviati, is rather long and diffi- 
cult 



SECOND DAY 129 

cult to keep in mind from a single hearing. Will you not, 
therefore, be good enough to repeat it? 

SALV. As you like; but I would suggest instead a more direct 
and a shorter proof: this will, however, necessitate a different 
figure. 

[168] 

SAGR. The favor will be that much greater: nevertheless I 
hope you will oblige me by putting into written form the argu- 
ment just given so that I may study it at my leisure. 

SALV. I shall gladly do so. Let A denote a cylinder of diam- 
eter DC and the largest capable of sustaining its own weight: 
the problem is to determine a larger cylinder which shall be 
at once the maximum and the unique one capable of sustaining 
its own weight. 

Let E be such a cylinder, similar to A, having the assigned 
length, and having a diameter KL. Let MN be a third propor- 
tional to the two lengths DC and KL: 
let MN also be the diameter of an- 
other cylinder, X, having the same 
length as E: then, I say, X is the cyl- 
inder sought. Now since the resist- 
ance of the base DC is to the resist- 
ance of the base KL as the square of 
DC is to the square of KL, that is, as w 
the square of KL is to the square of 

MN, or, as the cylinder E is to the cylinder X, that is, as the 
moment E is to the moment X; and since also the resistance 
[bending strength] of the base KL is to the resistance of the 
base MN as the cube of KL is to the cube of MN, that is, 
as the cube of DC is to the cube of KL, or, as the cylinder A is 
to the cylinder E, that is, as the moment of A is to the moment 
of E; hence it follows, ex czquali in proportione perturbata* 
that the moment of A is to the moment of X as the resistance of 
the base DC is to the resistance of the base MN; therefore 
moment and resistance are related to each other in prism X 
precisely as they are in prism A. 

* For definition of perturbata see Todhunter's Euclid, Book V, Def . 20. 

[Trans.] 





130 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

Let us now generalize the problem; then it will read as 
follows : 

Given a cylinder AC in which moment and resistance 
[bending strength] are related in any manner whatsoever; 
let DE be the length of another cylinder; then determine 
what its thickness must be in order that the relation be- 
tween its moment and resistance shall be identical with 
that of the cylinder AC. 

Using Fig. 25 in the same manner as above, we may say that, 
since the moment of the cylinder FE is to the moment of the 
portion DG as the square of ED is to the square of FG, that is, 
as the length DE is to I; and since the moment of the cylinder 
FG is to the moment of the cylinder AC as the square of FD is 
to the square of AB, or, as the square of ED is to the square of 
I, or, as the square of I is to the square of M, that is, as the 
length I is to O; it follows, ex cequali, that the moment of the 



cylinder FE is to the moment of the cylinder AC as the length 
DE is to O, that is, as the cube of DE is to the cube of I, or, 
as the cube of FD is to the cube of AB, that is, as the resistance 
of the base FD is to the resistance of the base AB; which was to 
be proven. 

From what has already been demonstrated, you can plainly 
see the impossibility of increasing the size of structures to vast 
dimensions either in art or in nature; likewise the impossibility 
of building ships, palaces, or temples of enormous size in such a 
way that their oars, yards, beams, iron-bolts, and, in short, all 
their other parts will hold together; nor can nature produce 
trees of extraordinary size because the branches would break 
down under their own weight; so also it would be impossible to 
build up the bony structures of men, horses, or other animals so 
as to hold together and perform their normal functions if these 
animals were to be increased enormously in height; for this 
increase in height can be accomplished only by employing a 
material which is harder and stronger than usual, or by enlarging 
the size of the bones, thus changing their shape until the form 
and appearance of the animals suggest a monstrosity. This is 

perhaps 



SECOND DAY 131 

perhaps what our wise Poet had in mind, when he says, in 
describing a huge giant: 

"Impossible it is to reckon his height 
"So beyond measure is his size." * 

To illustrate briefly, I have sketched a bone whose natural 
length has been increased three times and whose thickness 
has been multiplied until, for a correspondingly large animal, 
it would perform the same function which the small bone per- 
forms for its small animal. From the figures here shown you 
can see how out of proportion the enlarged bone appears. 
Clearly then if one wishes to maintain in a great giant the same 
proportion of limb as that 
found in an ordinary man 
he must either find a 
harder and stronger ma- 
terial for making the 




bones, or he must admit 
a diminution of strength 
in comparison with men 
of medium stature; for if 
his height be increased 
inordinately he will fall and be crushed under his own weight. 
Whereas, if the size of a body be diminished, the strength of 
that body is not diminished in the same proportion; indeed the 
smaller the body the greater its relative strength. Thus a 
small dog could probably carry on his back two or three dogs 
of his own size; but I believe that a horse could not carry even 
one of his own size. 

SIMP. This may be so; but I am led to doubt it on account of 
the enormous size reached by certain fish, such as the whale 
which, I understand, is ten times as large as an elephant; yet 
they all support themselves. 

SALV. Your question, Simplicio, suggests another principle, 

* Non si pub compartir quanta sia lungo, 
Si smisuratamentf e tutto grosso. 

Ariosto's Orlando Furioso, XVII, 30 [Trans.] 



132 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

one which had hitherto escaped my attention and which enables 
giants and other animals of vast size to support themselves 
and to move about as well as smaller animals do. This result 
may be secured either by increasing the strength of the bones 
and other parts intended to carry not only their weight but also 
the superincumbent load; or, keeping the proportions of the 
bony structure constant, the skeleton will hold together in the 
same manner or even more easily, provided one diminishes, 
in the proper proportion, the weight of the bony material, 
of the flesh, and of anything else which the skeleton has to 
carry. It is this second principle which is employed by nature 
in the structure of fish, making their bones and muscles not 
merely light but entirely devoid of weight. 

SIMP. The trend of your argument, Salviati, is evident. 
Since fish live in water which on account of its density [corpulenza] 
or, as others would say, heaviness [gravita] diminishes the 
weight [peso] of bodies immersed in it, you mean to say that, 
for this reason, the bodies of fish will be devoid of weight and 
will be supported without injury to their bones. But this is not 
all; for although the remainder of the body of the fish may be 
without weight, there can be no question but that their bones 
have weight. Take the case of a whale's rib, having the dimen- 
sions of a beam; who can deny its great weight or its tendency to 
go to the bottom when placed in water? One would, therefore, 



hardly expect these great masses to sustain themselves. 

SALV. A very shrewd objection ! And now, in reply, tell me 
whether you have ever seen fish stand motionless at will under 
water, neither descending to the bottom nor rising to the top, 
without the exertion of force by swimming? 

SIMP. This is a well-known phenomenon. 

SALV. The fact then that fish are able to remain motionless 
under water is a conclusive reason for thinking that the material 
of their bodies has the same specific gravity as that of water; 
accordingly, if in their make-up there are certain parts which 
are heavier than water there must be others which are lighter, 
for otherwise they would not produce equilibrium. 

Hence 



SECOND DAY 133 

Hence, if the bones are heavier, it is necessary that the mus- 
cles or other constituents of the body should be lighter in order 
that their buoyancy may counterbalance the weight of the 
bones. In aquatic animals therefore circumstances are just 
reversed from what they are with land animals inasmuch as, in 
the latter, the bones sustain not only their own weight but also 
that of the flesh, while in the former it is the flesh which sup- 
ports not only its own weight but also that of the bones. We 
must therefore cease to wonder why these enormously large 
animals inhabit the water rather than the land, that is to say, 
the air. 

SIMP. I am convinced and I only wish to add that what we 
call land animals ought really to be called air animals, seeing 
that they live in the air, are surrounded by air, and breathe air. 

SAGR. I have enjoyed Simplicio's discussion including both 
the question raised and its answer. Moreover I can easily 
understand that one of these giant fish, if pulled ashore, would 
not perhaps sustain itself for any great length of time, but would 
be crushed under its own mass as soon as the connections 
between the bones gave way. 

SALV. I am inclined to your opinion; and, indeed, I almost 
think that the same thing would happen in the case of a very 
big ship which floats on the sea without going to pieces under 



its load of merchandise and armament, but which on dry land 
and in air would probably fall apart. But let us proceed and 
show how: 

Given a prism or cylinder, also its own weight and the 

maximum load which it can carry, it is then possible to 

find a maximum length beyond which the cylinder cannot 

be prolonged without breaking under its own weight. 

Let AC indicate both the prism and its own weight; also 

let D represent the maximum load which the prism can carry 

at the end C without fradhire; it is required to find the max- 

imum to which the length of the said prism can be increased 

without breaking. Draw AH of such a length that the weight 

of the prism AC is to the sum of AC and twice the weight D 

as 




134 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

as the length CA is to AH; and let AG be a mean proportional 
between CA and AH; then, I say, AG is the length sought. 
Since the moment of the weight [momento gravante} D attached 
at the point C is equal to the moment of a weight twice as large 
as D placed at the middle point AC, through which the weight of 
'"11\ - H t ^ ie P r * sm AC acts, it fol- 

jG ' lows that the moment of 

j the resistance of the prism 

AC located at A is equiva- 
lent to twice the weight D 
plus the weight of AC, both 
acting through the middle 
point of AC. And since we 
have agreed that the moment of the weights thus located, 
namely, twice D plus AC, bears to the moment of AC the same 
ratio which the length HA bears to CA and since AG is a mean 
proportional between these two lengths, it follows that the mo- 
ment of twice D plus AC is to the moment of AC as the square 
of GA is to the square of CA. But the moment arising from 
the weight [momento premente] of the prism GA is to the moment 
of AC as the square of GA is to the square of CA; thence AG is 
the maximum length sought, that is, the length up to which the 
prism AC may be prolonged and still support itself, but beyond 
which it will break. 

Hitherto we have considered the moments and resistances 
of prisms and solid cylinders fixed at one end with a weight 
applied at the other end; three cases were discussed, namely 
that in which the applied force was the only one acting, tha 
in which the weight of the prism itself is also taken into con 
sideration, and that in which the weight of the prism alone 
taken into consideration. Let us now consider these sam< 

[173] 

prisms and cylinders when supported at both ends or at a singl< 
point placed somewhere between the ends. In the first place. 
I remark that a cylinder carrying only its own weight and having 
the maximum length, beyond which it will break, will, whei 
supported either in the middle or at both ends, have twice th 

lengtl 



SECOND DAY 135 

length of one which is mortised into a wall and supported only 
at one end. This is very evident because, if we denote the 
cylinder by ABC and if we assume that one-half of it, AB, is 
the greatest possible length capable of supporting its own 
weight with one end fixed at B, then, for the same jeason, if the 
cylinder is carried on the point G, the first half will be counter- 
balanced by the other half BC. So also in the case of the cylinder 
DEF, if its length be such that it will support only one-half this 




Fig. 29 

length when the end D is held fixed, or the other half when the 
end F is fixed, then it is evident that when supports, such as H 
and I, are placed under the ends D and F respectively the mo- 
ment of any additional force or weight placed at E will produce 
fracture at this point. 

A more intricate and difficult problem is the following: 
neglect the weight of a solid such as the preceding and find 
whether the same force or weight which produces fracture when 
applied at the middle of a cylinder, supported at both ends, will 
also break the cylinder when applied at some other point nearer 
one end than the other. 

Thus, for example, if one wished to break a stick by holding 
it with one hand at each end and applying his knee at the 
l middle, would the same force be required to break it in the same 
I manner if the knee were applied, not at the middle, but at some 
| point nearer to one end ? 

SAGR. This problem, I believe, has been touched upon by 
Aristotle in his Questions in Mechanics. 

Salv. 



136 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

[174] 

SALV. His inquiry however is not quite the same; for he seeks 
merely to discover why it is that a stick may be more easily 
broken by taking hold, one hand at each end of the stick, that 
is, far removed from the knee, than if the hands were closer 
together. He gives a general explanation, referring it to the 
lengthened lever arms which are secured by placing the hands at 
the ends of the stick. Our inquiry calls for something more: 
what we want to know is whether, when the hands are retained 
at the ends of the stick, the same force is required to break it 
wherever the knee be placed. 

SAGR. At first glance this would appear to be so, because the 
two lever arms exert, in a certain way, the same moment, seeing 
that as one grows shorter the other grows correspondingly longer. 

SALV. Now you see how readily one falls into error and what 
caution and circumspection are required to avoid it. What you 
have just said appears at first glance highly probable, but on 
closer examination it proves to be quite far from true; as will 
be seen from the fact that whether the knee the fulcrum of the 
two levers be placed in the middle or not makes such a differ- 
ence that, if fradlure is to be produced at any other point than 
the middle, the breaking force at the middle, even wiien multi- 
plied four, ten, a hundred, or a thousand times would not 
suffice. To begin with we shall offer some general considerations 
and then pass to the determination of the ratio in which the 
breaking force must change in order to produce fradture at one 
point rather than another. 

Let AB denote a wooden cylinder which is to be broken in 
the middle, over the supporting point C, and let DE represent 
an identical cylinder which is to be broken just over the sup- 
porting point F which is not in the middle. First of all it is 
clear that, since the distances AC and CB are equal, the forces 
applied at the extremities B and A must also be equal. Secondly 
since the distance DF is less than the distance AC the moment 
of any force acting at D is less than the moment of the same 
force at A, that is, applied at the distance CA; and the moments 
are less in the ratio of the length DF to AC; consequently it is 

necessary 



SECOND DAY 



137 



B 





necessary to increase the force [momenta] at D in order to over- 
come, or even to balance, the resistance at F; but in comparison 
with the length AC the distance DF can be diminished in- 
definitely: in order therefore to counterbalance the resistance at 
F it will be necessary to increase indefinitely the force [forza] 
applied at D. On the other 
hand, in proportion as we in- 

[175] 

crease the distance FE over 

that of CB, we must diminish 

the force at E in order to 

counterbalance the resistance 

at F; but the distance FE, 

measured in terms of CB, 

cannot be increased indefi- Fig. 30 

nitely by sliding the fulcrum F toward the end D; indeed, it can- 

not even be made double the length CB. Therefore the force re- 

quired at E to balance the resistance at F will always be more 

than half that required at B. It is clear then that, as the fulcrum 

F approaches the end D, we must of necessity indefinitely in- 

crease the sum of the forces applied at E and D in order to 

balance, or overcome, the resistance at F. 

SAGR. What shall we say, Simplicio? Must we not confess 
that geometry is the most powerful of all instruments for 
sharpening the wit and training the mind to think corredtly? 
Was not Plato perfectly right when he wished that his pupils 
should be first of all well grounded in mathematics? As for 
myself, I quite understood the property of the lever and how, 
by increasing or diminishing its length, one can increase or 
diminish the moment of force and of resistance; and yet, in 
the solution of the present problem I was not slightly, but greatly, 
deceived. 

SIMP. Indeed I begin to understand that while logic is an ex- 
cellent guide in discourse, it does not, as regards stimulation to 
discovery, compare with the power of sharp distinction which 
belongs to geometry. 

SAGR. Logic, it appears to me, teaches us how to test the 

conclusiveness 



138 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

conclusiveness of any argument or demonstration already dis- 
covered and completed; but I do not believe that it teaches 
us to discover correct arguments and demonstrations. But it 
would be better if Salviati were to show us in just what pro- 
portion the forces must be increased in order to produce fracture 
as the fulcrum is moved from one point to another along one 
and the same wooden rod. 

[176] 

SALV. The ratio which you desire is determined as follows: 
If upon a cylinder one marks two points at which frac- 
ture is to be produced, then the resistances at these two 
points will bear to each other the inverse ratio of the 
rectangles formed by the distances from the respective 
points to the ends of the cylinder. 

Let A and B denote the least forces which will bring about 
fracture of the cylinder at C; likewise E and F the smallest 
forces which will break it at D. Then, I say, that the sum of the 
forces A and B is to the sum of the forces E and F as the area 
of the rectangle AD.DB is to the area of the rectangle AC.CB. 
Because the sum of the forces A and B bears to the sum of the 
forces E and F a ratio which is the product of the three following 
ratios, namely, (A+B)/B, B/F, and F/(F+E); but the length 
BA is to the length CA as the sum of the forces A and B is to the 

force B; and, as the length DB 
is to the length CB, so is the 
force B to the force F; also as 
the length AD is to AB, so is the 
force F to the sum of the forces F 
andE. 

Hence it follows that the sum of the forces A and B bears 
to the sum of the forces E and F a ratio which is the product 
of the three following ratios, namely, BA/CA, BD/BC, and 
AD/AB. But DA/CA is the product of DA/BA and BA/CA. 
Therefore the sum of the forces A and B bears to the sum of the 
forces E and F a ratio which is the product of DArCA and 
DB:CB. But the rectangle AD.DB bears to the rectangle 
AC.CB a ratio which is the product of DA/CA and DB/CB. 

Accordingly 




SECOND DAY 139 

Accordingly the sum of the forces A and B is to the sum of the 
forces E and F as the rectangle AD.DB is to the rectangle 
AC.CB, that is, the resistance to fracture at C is to the resistance 
to fracture at D as the rectangle AD.DB is to the rectangle 

AC.CB. Q. E. D. 

[177] 

Another rather interesting problem may be solved as a con- 
sequence of this theorem, namely, 

Given the maximum weight which a cylinder or prism can 
support at its middle-point where the resistance is a mini- 
mum, and given also a larger weight, find that point in 
the cylinder for which this larger weight is the maximum 
load that can be supported. 

Let that one of the given weights which is larger than the 
maximum weight supported at the middle of the cylinder AB 
bear to this maximum weight the same ratio which the length 
E bears to the length F. The problem is to find that point 
in the cylinder at which this larger weight becomes the max- 
imum that can be supported. Let G be a mean proportional 
between the lengths E and F. Draw AD and S so that they 
bear to each other the same ratio as E to G; accordingly S will 
be less than AD. 

Let AD be the diameter of a semicircle AHD, in which take 
AH equal to S; join the points H and D and lay off DR equal to 
HD. Then, I say, R is the point sought, namely, the point at 
which the given weight, greater than the maximum supported 
at the middle of the cylinder D, would become the maximum 
load. 

On AB as diameter draw the semicircle ANB: erect the per- 
pendicular RN and join the points N and D. Now since the 
sum of the squares on NR and RD is equal to the square of 
ND, that is, to the square of AD, or to the sum of the squares of 
AH and HD; and, since the square of HD is equal to the square 
of DR, it follows that the square of NR, that is, the rectangle 
AR.RB, is equal to the square of AH, also therefore to the 
square of S; but the square of S is to the square of AD as the 
length F is to the length E, that is, as the maximum weight 

supported 




140 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

supported at D is to the larger of the two given weights. Hence 
the latter will be the maximum load which can be carried at the 
point R; which is the solution sought. 

SAGR. Now I understand thoroughly; and I am thinking that, 
since the prism AB grows constantly stronger and more resistant 

to the pressure of its load at 
points which are more and more 
removed from the middle, we 
could in the case of large heavy 
beams cut away a considerable 
portion near the ends which 
would notably lessen the weight, 
1 and which, in the beam work of 
large rooms, would prove to be 
of great utility and convenience. 
32 [178] 

It would be a fine thing if one could discover the proper shape 
to give a solid in order to make it equally resistant at every 
point, in which case a load placed at the middle would not 
produce fracture more easily than if placed at any other 
point.* 

SALV. I was just on the point of mentioning an interesting 
and remarkable fact connected with this very question. My 
meaning will be clearer if I draw a figure. Let DB represent 
a prism; then, as we have already shown, its resistance to frac- 
ture [bending strength] at the end AD, owing to a load placed at 
the end B, will be less than the resistance at CI in the ratio of the 
length CB to AB. Now imagine this same prism to be cut 
through diagonally along the line FB so that the opposite faces 
will be triangular; the side facing us will be FAB. Such a solid 

* The reader will notice that two different problems are here involved. 
That which is suggested in the last remark of Sagredo is the fol- 
lowing: 

To find a beam whose maximum stress has the same value when 
a constant load moves from one end of the beam to the other. 
The second problem the one which Salviati proceeds to solve is the 
following: 

To find a beam in all cross-sections of which the maximum stress 
is the same for a constant load in a fixed position. [Trans.] 



SECOND DAY 



141 




will have properties different from those of the prism; for, if 
the load remain at B, the resistance against fracture [bending 
strength] at C will be less than that at A in the ratio of the 
length CB to the length AB. This is easily proved: for if CNO 
represents a cross-section parallel to AFD, then the length FA 
bears to the length CN, in the triangle FAB, the same ratio 

which the length AB bears to D I 

the length CB. Therefore, 
we imagine A and C to be the 
points at which the fulcrum is 
placed, the lever arms in the 
two cases BA, AF and BC, CN A fc 

will be proportional [simili]^ Fig. 33 

Hence the moment of any force applied at B and acting through 
the arm BA, against a resistance placed at a distance AF will 
be equal to that of the same force at B acting through the arm 
BC against the same resistance located at a distance CN. But 
now, if the force still be applied at B, the resistance to be over- 
come when the fulcrum is at C, acting through the arm CN, is 
less than the resistance with the fulcrum at A in the same pro- 
portion as the rectangular cross-section CO is less than the 
rectangular cross-section AD, that is, as the length CN is less 
than AF, or CB than BA. 

Consequently the resistance to fracture at C, offered by the 
portion OBC, is less than the resistance to fracture at A, offered 
by the entire block DAB, in the same proportion as the length 
CB is smaller than the length AB. 

By this diagonal saw-cut we have now removed from the 
beam, or prism DB, a portion, i. e., a half, and have left the 
wedge, or triangular prism, FBA. We thus have two solids 

.[179] 

possessing opposite properties; one body grows stronger as 
it is shortened while the other grows weaker. This being so 
it would seem not merely reasonable, but inevitable, that there 
exists a line of section such that, when the superfluous material 
has been removed, there will remain a solid of such figure that 
it will offer the same resistance [strength] at all points. 

Simp. 






H2 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

SIMP. Evidently one must, in passing from greater to less, 
encounter equality. 

SAGR. But now the question is what path the saw should 
follow in making the cut. 

SIMP. It seems to me that this ought not to be a difficult task: 
for if by sawing the prism along the diagonal line and removing 
half of the material, the remainder acquires a property just the 
opposite to that of the entire prism, so that at every point where 
the latter gains strength the former becomes weaker, then it 
seems to me that by taking a middle path, i. e., by removing half 
the former half, or one-quarter of the whole, the strength of the 
remaining figure will be constant at all those points where, in the 
two previous figures, the gain in one was equal to the loss in the 
other. 

SALV. You have missed the mark, Simplicio. For, as I shall 
presently show you, the amount which you can remove from the 
prism without weakening it is not a quarter but a third. It 
now remains, as suggested by Sagredo, to discover the path 
along which the saw must travel: this, as I shall prove, must be a 
parabola. But it is first necessary to demonstrate the following 
lemma : 

If the fulcrums are so placed under two levers or balances 
that the arms through which the forces act are to each other 
in the same ratio as the squares of the arms through which 
the resistances act, and if these resistances are to each other 
in the same ratio as the arms through which they act, then 
the forces will be equal. 
Let AB and CD represent two levers whose lengths are 

A * 1 , , ^ divided by their fulcrums in 

Er M such a way as to make the dis- 

f , .1 tance EB bear to the distance 

C F D FD a ratio which is equal to the 

Fig- 34 square of the ratio between the 

distances EA and FC. Let the resistances located at A and C 

[180] 

be to each other as EA is to FC. Then, I say, the forces which 
must be applied at B and D in order to hold in equilibrium the 

resistances 









SECOND DAY 143 

resistances at A and C are equal. Let EG be a mean propor- 
tional between EB and FD. Then we shall have BE:EG = 
EG:FD=AE:CF. But this last ratio is precisely that which 
we have assumed to exist between the resistances at A and C. 
And since EG:FD=AE:CF, it follows, permutando, that EG: 
AE = FD :CF. Seeing that the distances DC and GA are divided 
in the same ratio by the points F and E, it follows that the same 
force which, when applied at D, will equilibrate the resistance 
at C, would if applied at G equilibrate at A a resistance equal to 
that found at C. 

But one datum of the problem is that the resistance at A is to 
the resistance at C as the distance AE is to the distance CF, or as 
BE is to EG. Therefore the force applied at G, or rather at D, 
will, when applied at B, just balance the resistance located at A. 

Q. E. D. 

This being clear draw the parabola FNB in the face FB of the 
prism DB. Let the prism be sawed along this parabola whose 
vertex is at B. The portion of the solid which remains will be 
included between the base AD, the rectangular plane AG, the 
straight line BG and the surface DGBF, whose curvature is 
identical with that of the parabola FNB. This solid will have, 
I say, the same strength at every point. Let the solid be cut 
by a plane CO parallel to 
the plane AD. Imagine p 
the points A and C to be 
the fulcrums of two levers 
of which one will have the _ 
arms BA and AF ; the other A"" c 

BCandCN. Then since in Fig. 35 

the parabola FBA, we have BA:BC=AF 2 : CN 2 , it is clear that 
the arm BA of one lever is to the arm BC of the other lever as the 
square of the arm AF is to the square of the other arm CN. 
Since the resistance to be balanced by the lever BA is to the 
resistance to be balanced by the lever BC in the same ratio as 
the rectangle DA is to the rectangle OC, that is as the length 
AF is to the length CN, which two lengths are the other arms of 
the levers, it follows, by the lemma just demonstrated, that 

the 




144 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the same force which, when applied at BG will equilibrate the 
resistance at DA, will also balance the resistance at CO. The 

[181] 

same is true for any other section. Therefore this parabolic 
solid is equally strong throughout. 

It can now be shown that, if the prism be sawed along the 
line of the parabola FNB, one-third part of it will be removed; 
because the rectangle FB and the surface FNBA bounded by 
the parabola are the bases of two solids included between two 
parallel planes, i. e., between the rectangles FB and DG; con- 
sequently the volumes of these two solids bear to each other 
the same ratio as their bases. But the area of the rectangle 
is one and a half times as large as the area FNBA under the 
parabola; hence by cutting the prism along the parabola we re- 
move one-third of the volume. It is thus seen how one can 
diminish the weight of a beam by as much as thirty-three per 
cent without diminishing its strength; a fact of no small utility 
in the construction of large vessels, and especially in supporting 
the decks, since in such structures lightness is of prime im- 
portance. 

SAGR. The advantages derived from this fact are so numerous 
that it would be both wearisome and impossible to mention 
them all; but leaving this matter to one side, I should like to 
learn just how it happens that diminution of weight is possible 
in the ratio above stated. I can readily understand that, when 
a section is made along the diagonal, one-half the weight is 
removed; but, as for the parabolic section removing one-third 
of the prism, this I can only accept on the word of Salviati who 
is always reliable; however I prefer first-hand knowledge to the 
word of another. 

SALV. You would like then a demonstration of the fact that 
the excess of the volume of a prism over the volume of what 
we have called the parabolic solid is one-third of the entire 
prism. This I have already given you on a previous occasion; 
however I shall now try to recall the demonstration in which 
I remember having used a certain lemma from Archimedes ' book 
On Spirals* namely, Given any number of lines, differing in 

* For demonstration of the theorem here cited, see " Works of Arch- 



SECOND DAY 

length one from another by a common difference which is equal 
to the shortest of these lines; and given also an equal number 
of lines each of which has the same length as the longest of 
the first-mentioned series; then the sum of the squares of the 
lines of this second group will be less than three times the sum 
of the squares of the lines in the first group. But the sum of the 
squares of the second group will be greater than three times the 
sum of the squares of all excepting the longest of the first group. 

[182] 

Assuming this, inscribe in the rectangle ACBP the parabola 
AB. We have now to prove that the mixed triangle BAP whose 
sides are BP and PA, and whose base is the parabola BA, is a 
third part of the entire rectangle CP. If this is not true it will 
be either greater or less than a third. Suppose it to be less by an 
area which is represented by X. By drawing lines parallel to the 
sides BP and CA, we can divide the rectangle CP into equal 
parts; and if the process be continued we shall finally reach a 
division into parts so small that each of them will be smaller 
than the area X; let the rec- & V 

tangle OB represent one of these 
parts and, through the points 
where the other parallels cut the 
parabola, draw lines parallel to 
AP. Let us now ^describe about 
our "mixed triangle" a figure 
made up of rectangles such as 
BO, IN, HM, FL, EK, and GA; 
this figure will also be less than 



~--^^ 




T 






I 


^-^^ > 




| 






n 


^\ 




R 






F 


x 


O 








E 


N 










C \ 


C D*, 



Fig. 36 



a third part of the rectangle CP because the excess of this figure 
above the area of the "mixed triangle" is much smaller than the 
rectangle BO which we have already made smaller than X. 

SAGR. More slowly, please; for I do not see how the excess of 
this figure described about the "mixed triangle" is much smaller 
than the rectangle BO. 

SALV. Does not the rectangle BO have an area which is equal 
to the sum of the areas of all the little rectangles through which 

imedes" translated by T. L. Heath (Camb. Univ. Press 1897) p. 107 and 
p. 162. [Trans.] 



146 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the parabola passes? I mean the rectangles BI, IH, HF, FE, 
EG, and GA of which only a part lies outside the "mixed tri- 
angle." Have we not taken the rectangle BO smaller than the 
area X? Therefore if, as our opponent might say, the triangle 
plus X is equal to a third part of this rectangle CP, the cir- 
cumscribed figure, which adds to the triangle an area less than 
X, will still remain smaller than a third part of the rectangle, 
CP. But this cannot be, because this circumscribed figure is 
larger than a third of the area. Hence it is not true that our 
"mixed triangle" is less than a third of the rectangle. 

[183] . 

SAGR. You have cleared up my difficulty; but it still remains 
to be shown that the circumscribed figure is larger than a third 
part of the rectangle CP, a task which will not, I believe, prove 
so easy. 

SALV. There is nothing very difficult about it. Since in the 
parabola DE 2 :ZG 2 =DA:AZ= rectangle KE: rectangle AG, 
seeing that the altitudes of these two rectangles, AK and KL, are 
equal, it follows that ED 2 :ZG 2 = LA 2 :AK 2 == rectangle KE: 
rectangle KZ. In precisely the same manner it may be shown 
that the other rectangles LF, MH, NI, OB, stand to one another 
in the same ratio as the squares of the lines MA, NA, OA, PA. 

Let us now consider the circumscribed figure, composed of 
areas which bear to each other the same ratio as the squares of a 
series of lines whose common difference in length is equal to the 
shortest one in the series; note also that the rectangle CP is 
made up of an equal number of areas each equal to the largest 
and each equal to the rectangle OB. Consequently, according to 
the lemma of Archimedes, the circumscribed figure is larger than 
a third part of the rectangle CP; but it was also smaller, which is 
impossible. Hence the "mixed triangle" is not less than a 
third part of the rectangle CP. 

Likewise, I say, it cannot be greater. For, let us suppose that 
it is greater than a third part of the rectangle CP and let the area 
X represent the excess of the triangle over the third part of the 
rectangle CP; subdivide the rectangle into equal rectangles and 
continue the process until one of these subdivisions is smaller 

than 



SECOND DAY 147 

than the area X. Let BO represent such a rectangle smaller than 
X. Using the above figure, we have in the "mixed triangle" an 
inscribed figure, made up of the rectangles VO, TN, SM, RL, 
and QK, which will not be less than a third part of the large 
rectangle CP. 

For the "mixed triangle" exceeds the inscribed figure by a 
quantity less than that by which it exceeds the third part of 
the rectangle CP; to see that this is true we have only to re- 
member that the excess of the triangle over the third part of the 
rectangle CP is equal to the area X, which is less than the 
rectangle BO, which in turn is much less than the excess of the 
triangle over the inscribed figure. For the rectangle BO is 

[184] 

made up of the small rectangles AG, GE, EF, FH, HI, and IB; 
and the excess of the triangle over the inscribed figure is less 
than half the sum of these little rectangles. Thus since the 
triangle exceeds the third part of the rectangle CP by an amount 
X, which is more than that by which it exceeds the inscribed 
figure, the latter will also exceed the third part of the rectangle, 
CP. But, by the lemma which we have assumed, it is smaller. 
For the rectangle CP, being the sum of the largest rectangles, 
bears to the component rectangles of the inscribed figure the 
same ratio which the sum of all the squares of the lines equal 
to the longest bears to the squares of the lines which have a 
common difference, after the square of the longest has been 
subtracted. 

Therefore, as in the case of squares, the sum total of the 
largest rectangles, i. e., the rectangle CP, is greater than three 
times the sum total of those having a common difference minus 
the largest; but these last make up the inscribed figure. Hence 
the "mixed triangle" is neither greater nor less than the third 
part of rectangle CP; it is therefore equal to it. 

SAGR. A fine, clever demonstration; and all the more so be- 
cause it gives us the quadrature of the parabola, proving it to be 
four-thirds of the inscribed * triangle, a fact which Archimedes 
demonstrates by means of two different, but admirable, series of 

* Distinguish carefully between this triangle and the "mixed tri- 
angle" above mentioned. [Trans.] 



148 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

many propositions. This same theorem has also been recently 
established by Luca Valerio,* the Archimedes of our age; his 
demonstration is to be found in his book dealing with the centers 
of gravity of solids. 

SALV. A book which, indeed, is not to be placed second to any 
produced by the most eminent geometers either of the present 
or of the past; a book which, as soon as it fell into the hands of 
our Academician, led him to abandon his own researches along 
these lines; for he saw how happily everything had been treated 
and demonstrated by Valerio. 



. 

SAGR. When I was informed of this event by the Academician 
himself, I begged of him to show the demonstrations which he 
had discovered before seeing Valerio's book; but in this I did 
not succeed. 

SALV. I have a copy of them and will show them to you; for 
you will enjoy the diversity of method employed by these two 
authors in reaching and proving the same conclusions; you will 
also find that some of these conclusions are explained in different 
ways, although both are in fact equally correct. 

SAGR. I shall be much pleased to see them and will consider 
it a great favor if you will bring them to our regular meeting. 
But in the meantime, considering the strength of a solid formed 
from a prism by means of a parabolic section, would it not, in 
view of the fact that this result promises to be both interesting 
and useful in many mechanical operations, be a fine thing if you 
were to give some quick and easy rule by which a mechanician 
might draw a parabola upon a plane surface? 

SALV. There are many ways of tracing these curves; I will 
mention merely the two which are the quickest of all. One of 
these is really remarkable; because by it I can trace thirty 
or forty parabolic curves with no less neatness and precision, 
and in a shorter time than another man can, by the aid of a 
compass, neatly draw four or six circles of different sizes upon 
paper. I take a perfectly round brass ball about the size of a 
walnut and project it along the surface of a metallic mirror held 

* An eminent Italian mathematician, contemporary with Galileo. 

[Trans.] 



SECOND DAY 149 

in a nearly upright position, so that the ball in its motion will 
press slightly upon the mirror and trace out a fine sharp para- 
bolic line; this parabola will grow longer and narrower as the 
angle of elevation increases. The above experiment furnishes 
clear and tangible evidence that the path of a projectile is a 
parabola; a fact first observed by our friend and demonstrated 
by him in his book on motion which we shall take up at our next 
meeting. In the execution of this method, it is advisable to 
slightly heat and moisten the ball by rolling in the hand in order 
that its trace upon the mirror may be more distinct. 

[I86J 

The other method of drawing the desired curve upon the face 
of the prism is the following: Drive two nails into a wall at 
a convenient height and at the same level; make the distance 
between these nails twice the width of the rectangle upon which 
it is desired to trace the semiparabola. Over these two nails 
hang a light chain of such a length that the depth of its sag 
is equal to the length of the prism. This chain will assume the 
form of a parabola,* so that if this form be marked by points 
on the wall we shall have described a complete parabola which 
can be divided into two equal parts by drawing a vertical line 
through a point midway between the two nails. The transfer 
of this curve to the two opposing faces of the prism is a matter 
of no difficulty; any ordinary mechanic will know how to do it. 

By use of the geometrical lines drawn upon our friend's 
compass,t one may easily lay off those points which will locate 
this same curve upon the same face of the prism. 

Hitherto we have demonstrated numerous conclusions per- 
taining to the resistance which solids offer to fracture. As 
a starting point for this science, we assumed that the resistance 
offered by the solid to a straight-away pull was known; from 
this base one might proceed to the discovery of many other 
results and their demonstrations; of these results the number to 

* It is now well known that this curve is not a parabola but a catenary 
the equation of which was first given, 49 years after Galileo's death, by 
James Bernoulli. [Trans.] 

t The geometrical and military compass of Galileo, described in Nat. 
Ed. Vol. 2. [Trans.] 



ISO THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

be found in nature is infinite. But, in order to bring our daily 
conference to an end, I wish to discuss the strength of hollow 
solids, which are employed in art and still oftener in nature 
in a thousand operations for the purpose of greatly increasing 
strength without adding to weight; examples of these are seen 
in the bones of birds and in many kinds of reeds which are light 
and highly resistant both to bending and breaking. For if a 
stem of straw which carries a head of wheat heavier than the 
entire stalk were made up of the same amount of material in 



solid form it would offer less resistance to bending and breaking. 
This is an experience which has been verified and confirmed in 
practice where it is found that a hollow lance or a tube of wood 
or metal is much stronger than would be a solid one of the same 
length and weight, one which would necessarily be thinner; men 
have discovered, therefore, that in order to make lances strong 
as well as light they must make them hollow. We shall now 
show that: 

In the case of two cylinders, one hollow the other solid 
but having equal volumes and equal lengths, their resist- 
ances [bending strengths] are to each other in the ratio of 
their diameters. 

Let AE denote a hollow cylinder and IN a solid one of the 

same weight and length; 
then, I say, that the resist- 
ance against fradlure ex- 
hibited by the tube AE bears 
to that of the solid cylinder 
IN the same ratio as the di- 
ameter AB to the diameter 
tf IL. This is very evident ; for 
Fig. 37 since the tube and the solid 

cylinder IN have the same volume and length, the area of the cir- 
cular base IL will be equal to that of the annulus AB which is the 
base of the tube AE. (By annulus is here meant the area which 
lies between two concentric circles of different radii.) Hence 
their resistances to a straight-away pull are equal; but in produc- 

ing 




SECOND DAY 151 

ing fracfture by a transverse pull we employ, in the case of the 
cylinder IN, the length LN as one lever arm, the point L as a 
fulcrum, and the diameter LI, or its half, as the opposing lever 
arm : while in the case of the tube, the length BE which plays 
the part of the first lever arm is equal to LN, the opposing lever 
arm beyond the fulcrum, B, is the diameter AB, or its half. 
Manifestly then the resistance [bending strength] of the tube 
exceeds that of the solid cylinder in the proportion in which the 
diameter AB exceeds the diameter IL' which is the desired result. 

[188] 

Thus the strength of a hollow tube exceeds that of a solid 
cylinder in the ratio of their diameters whenever the two are 
made of the same material and have the same weight and length. 
It may be well next to investigate the general case of tubes 
and solid cylinders of constant length, but with the weight and 
the hollow portion variable. First we shall show that : 

Given a hollow tube, a solid cylinder may be determined 

which will be equal [eguale] to it. 

The method is very simple. Let AB denote the external and 
CD the internal diameter of the tube. In the larger circle lay 
off the line AE equal in length to the di- 
ameter CD; join the points E and B. 
Now since the angle at E inscribed in a 
semicircle, AEB, is a right-angle, the area 
of the circle whose diameter is AB is equal 
to the sum of the areas of the two circles 
whose respective diameters are AE and 
EB. But AE is the diameter of the hollow 
portion of the tube. Therefore the area 
of the circle whose diameter is EB is the 
same as the area of the annulus ACBD. Fl S- 3 8 

Hence a solid cylinder of circular base having a diameter EB 
will have the same volume as the walls of the tube of equal 
length. 
By use of this theorem, it is easy: 

To find the ratio between the resistance [bending strength] 

of any tube and that of any cylinder of equal length. 

Let 




152 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

Let ABE denote a tube and RSM a cylinder of equal length : it 
is required to find the ratio between their resistances. Using 
the preceding proposition, determine a cylinder ILN which shall 

have the same volume and 
length as the tube. Draw a 
line V of such a length that 
it will be related to IL and 
RS (diameters of the bases 
of the cylinders IN and RM), 
as follows: V:RS=RS:IL. 
Then, I say, the resistance of 
the tube AE is to that of the 
cylinder RM as the length 
)-j of the line AB is to the length 




V. For, since the tube AE is 
Fl &- 39 equal both in volume and 

length, to the cylinder IN, the resistance of the tube will bear to 
the resistance of the cylinder the same ratio as the line AB to IL; 
but the resistance of the cylinder IN is to that of the cylinder 
RM as the cube of IL is to the cube of RS, that is, as the length 
IL is to length V: therefore, ex czquali, the resistance [bending 
strength] of the tube AE bears to the resistance of the cylinder 
RM the same ratio as the length AB to V. Q. E. D. 



END OF SECOND DAY. 




THIRD DAY 

[190] 

CHANGE OF POSITION. [De Motu Locali] 




Y purpose is to set forth a very new science 
dealing with a very ancient subject. There 
is, in nature, perhaps nothing older than 
motion, concerning which the books written 
by philosophers are neither few nor small; 
nevertheless I have discovered by experi- 
ment some properties of it which are worth 
knowing and which have not hitherto been 
cither observed or demonstrated. Some superficial observations 
have been made, as, for instance, that the free motion [naturalem 
molum] of a heavy falling body is continuously accelerated;* 
but to just what extent this acceleration occurs has not yet been 
announced; for so far as I know, no one has yet pointed out that 
the distances traversed, during equal intervals of time, by a 
body falling from rest, stand to one another in the same ratio as 
the odd numbers beginning with unity.f 

It has been observed that missiles and projectiles describe 
a curved path of some sort; however no one has pointed out the 
fact that this path is a parabola. But this and other facts, not 
few in number or less worth knowing, I have succeeded in 
proving; and what I consider more important, there have been 
opened up to this vast and most excellent science, of which my 

* "Natural motion" of the author has here been translated into "free 
motion" since this is the term used to-day to distinguish the "natural" 
from the "violent" motions of the Renaissance. [Trans.] 

t A theorem demonstrated on p. 175 below. [Trans.] 



154 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

work is merely the beginning, ways and means by which other 
minds more acute than mine will explore its remote corners. 
This discussion is divided into three parts; the first part 
deals with motion which is steady or uniform; the second treats 
of motion as we find it accelerated in nature; the third deals with 
the so-called violent motions and with projectiles. 



[I9 
UNIFORM MOTION 

In dealing with steady or uniform motion, we need a single 
definition which I give as follows : 

DEFINITION 

By steady or uniform motion, I mean one in which the dis- 
tances traversed by the moving particle during any equal 
intervals of time, are themselves equal. 

CAUTION 

We must add to the old definition (which defined steady mo- 
tion simply as one in which equal distances are traversed in 
equal times) the word "any," meaning by this, all equal inter- 
vals of time; for it may happen that the moving body will 
traverse equal distances during some equal intervals of time 
and yet the distances traversed during some small portion of 
these time-intervals may not be equal, even though the time- 
intervals be equal. 

From the above definition, four axioms follow, namely: 

AXIOM I 

In the case of one and the same uniform motion, the distance 
traversed during a longer interval of time is greater than the 
distance traversed during a shorter interval of time. 

AXIOM II 

In the case of one and the same uniform motion, the time 
required to traverse a greater distance is longer than the time 
required for a less distance. 



THIRD DAY 155 

AXIOM III 

In one and the same interval of time, the distance traversed 
at a greater speed is larger than the distance traversed at a 
less speed. 

[192] 
AXIOM IV 

The speed required to traverse a longer distance is greater 
than that required to traverse a shorter distance during the 
same time-interval. 

THEOREM I, PROPOSITION I 

If a moving particle, carried uniformly at a constant speed, 

traverses two distances the time-intervals required are to 

each other in the ratio of these distances. 

Let a particle move uniformly with constant speed through 

two distances AB, BC, and let the time required to traverse AB 

be represented by DE; the time required to traverse BC, by EF; 

i. ...... I p f L y j . . .* 

i ..... I A I B f .. , ** 

Fig. 40 

then I say that the distance AB is to the distance BC as the 
time DE is to the time EF. 

Let the distances and times be extended on both sides towards 
G, H and I, K; let AG be divided into any number whatever of 
spaces each equal to AB, and in like manner lay off in DI 
exactly the same number of time-intervals each equal to DE. 
Again lay off in CH any number whatever of distances each 
equal to BC; and in FK exactly the same number of time- 
intervals each equal to EF; then will the distance BG and the 
time El be equal and arbitrary multiples of the distance BA 
and the time ED; and likewise the distance HB and the time 
KE are equal and arbitrary multiples of the distance CB and 
the time FE. 

And since DE is the time required to traverse AB, the whole 

time 



156 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

time El will be required for the whole distance BG, and when 
the motion is uniform there will be in El as many time-intervals 
each equal to DE as there are distances in BG each equal to BA; 
and likewise it follows that KE represents the time required to 
traverse HB. 

Since, however, the motion is uniform, it follows that if the 
distance GB is equal to the distance BH, then must also the 
time IE be equal to the time EK; and if GB is greater than BH, 
then also IE will be greater than EK; and if less, less.* There 

[193] . 

are then four quantities, the first AB, the second BC, the third 
DE, and the fourth EF; the time IE and the distance GB are 
arbitrary multiples of the first and the third, namely of the 
distance AB and the time DE. 

But it has been proved that both of these latter quantities 
are either equal to, greater than, or less than the time EK and 
the space BH, which are arbitrary multiples of the second and 
the fourth. Therefore the first is to the second, namely the 
distance AB is to the distance BC, as the third is to the fourth, 
namely the time DE is to the time EF. Q. E. D. 

THEOREM II, PROPOSITION II 

If a moving particle traverses two distances in equal in- 
tervals of time, these distances will bear to each other the 
same ratio as the speeds. And conversely if the distances 
are as the speeds then the times are equal. 
Referring to Fig. 40, let AB and BC represent the two distances 
traversed in equal time-intervals, the distance AB for instance 
with the velocity DE, and the distance BC with the velocity 
EF. Then, I say, the distance AB is to the distance BC as the 
velocity DE is to the velocity EF. For if equal multiples of 
both distances and speeds be taken, as above, namely, GB and 
IE of AB and DE respectively, and in like manner HB and KE 
of BC and EF, then one may infer, in the same manner as 
above, that the multiples GB and IE are either less than, equal 

* The method here employed by Galileo is that of Euclid as set forth 
in the famous 5th Definition of the Fifth Book of his Elements, for which 
see art. Geometry Ency. Brit, nth Ed. p. 683. [Trans.} 



THIRD DAY 157 

to, or greater than equal multiples of BH and EK. Hence the 
theorem is established. 

THEOREM III, PROPOSITION III 

In the case of unequal speeds, the time-intervals required 
to traverse a given space are to each other inversely as 
the speeds. 

Let the larger of the two unequal speeds be indicated by A; 
the smaller, by B; and let the motion corresponding to both 
traverse the given space CD. Then I say the time required to 
traverse the distance CD at speed A i < . i 
A is to the time required to trav- 
erse the same distance at speed ^ f . f 

B, as the speed B is to the speed C 1> 

A. For let CD be to CE as A 

is to B ; then, from the preced- ^ *""" 

ing, it follows that the time re- Fig- 4 1 

quired to complete the distance CD at speed A is the same as 

[194] 

the time necessary to complete CE at speed B; but the time 
needed to traverse the distance CE at speed B is to the time re- 
quired to traverse the distance CD at the same speed as CE 
is to CD; therefore the time in which CD is covered at speed 
A is to the time in which CD is covered at speed B as CE is to 
CD, that is, as speed B is to speed A. Q. E. D. 

THEOREM IV, PROPOSITION IV 

If two particles are carried with uniform motion, but each 
with a different speed, the distances covered by them dur- 
ing unequal intervals of time bear to each other the com- 
pound ratio of the speeds and time intervals. 
Let the two particles which are carried with uniform motion 
be E and F and let the ratio of the speed of the body E be to that 
of the body F as A is to B ; but let the ratio of the time consumed 
by the motion of E be to the time consumed by the motion of 
F as C is to D. Then, I say, that the distance covered by E, with 
speed A in time C, bears to the space traversed by F with speed 

B 




158 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

B in time D a ratio which is the product of the ratio of the speed 
A to the speed B by the ratio of the time C to the time D. For 
if G is the distance traversed by E at speed A during the time- 

A ' ' ' ' - ---t i nterva l Q and if G is to I as 

the speed A is to the speed B; 
1 and if also the time-interval 
C is to the time-interval D 
as I is to L, then it follows 
Fig. 42 that I is the distance trav- 

ersed by F in the same time that G is traversed by E since G 
is to I in the same ratio as the speed A to the speed B. And 
since I is to L in the same ratio as the time-intervals C and D, 
if I is the distance traversed by F during the interval C, then 
L will be the distance traversed by F during the interval D at the 
speed B. 

But the ratio of G to L is the product of the ratios G to I 
and I to L, that is, of the ratios of the speed A to the speed B 
and of the time-interval C to the time-interval D. Q. E. D. 

[195] 

THEOREM V, PROPOSITION V 

If two particles are moved at a uniform rate, but with un- 
equal speeds, through unequal distances, then the ratio of 
the time-intervals occupied will be the product of the ratio 
of the distances by the inverse ratio of the speeds. 
Let the two moving particles be denoted by A and B, and let 

the speed of A be 

to the speed of B in 

the ratio of V to T; 

in like manner let 

the distances trav- JU 

ersed be in the ratio Fig- 43 

of S to R; then I say that the ratio of the time-interval during 

which the motion of A occurs to the time-interval occupied by 

the motion of B is the product of the ratio of the speed T to the 

speed V by the ratio of the distance S to the distance R. 
Let C be the time-interval occupied by the motion of A, and 

let 




THIRD DAY 159 

let the time-interval C bear to a time-interval E the same ratio 
as the speed T to the speed V. 

And since C is the time-interval during which A, with speed 
V, traverses the distance S and since T, the speed of B, is to the 
speed V, as the time-interval C is to the time-interval E, then 
E will be the time required by the particle B to traverse the 
distance S. If now we let the time-interval E be to the time- 
interval G as the distance S is to the distance R, then it follows 
that G is the time required by B to traverse the space R. Since 
the ratio of C to G is the product of the ratios C to E and E to 
G (while also the ratio of C to E is the inverse ratio of the speeds 
of A and B respectively, i. e., the ratio of T to V) ; and since the 
ratio of E to G is the same as that of the distances S and R 
respectively, the proposition is proved. 

[196] 

THEOREM VI, PROPOSITION VI 

If two particles are carried at a uniform rate, the ratio of 

their speeds will be the product of the ratio of the distances 

traversed by the inverse ratio of the time-intervals occupied. 

Let A and B be the two particles which move at a uniform 

rate; and let the respective distances traversed by them have 

the ratio of V V" C 

to T, but let the J * 

time-intervals be ^* "E 

as S to R. Then T 

I say the speed B _______ G 

of A will bear R 

to the speed of Fl S- 44 

B a ratio which is the product of the ratio of the distance V to 

the distance T and the time-interval R to the time-interval S. 

Let C be the speed at which A traverses the distance V during 
the time-interval S; and let the speed C bear the same ratio to 
another speed E as V bears to T; then E will be the speed at 
which B traverses the distance T during the time-interval S. 
If now the speed E is to another speed G as the time-interval R 
is to the time-interval S, then G will be the speed at which the 

particle 



160 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

particle B traverses the distance T during the time-interval R. 
Thus we have the speed C at which the particle A covers the 
distance V during the time S and also the speed G at which the 
particle B traverses the distance T during the time R. The 
ratio of C to G is the product of the ratio C to E and E to G; 
the ratio of C to E is by definition the same as the ratio of the 
distance V to distance T; and the ratio of E to G is the same as 
the ratio of R to S. Hence follows the proposition. 

SALV. The preceding is what our Author has written concern- 
ing uniform motion. We pass now to a new and more discrim- 
inating consideration of naturally accelerated motion, such as 
that generally experienced by heavy falling bodies; following is 
the title and introduction. 

[197] 
NATURALLY ACCELERATED MOTION 

The properties belonging to uniform motion have been dis- 
cussed in the preceding section; but accelerated motion remains 
to be considered. 

And first of all it seems desirable to find and explain a defini- 
tion best fitting natural phenomena. For anyone may invent an 
arbitrary type of motion and discuss its properties; thus, for 
instance, some have imagined helices and conchoids as described 
by certain motions which are not met with in nature, and have 
very commendably established the properties which these curves 
possess in virtue of their definitions; but we have decided to con- 
sider the phenomena of bodies falling with an acceleration such 
as actually occurs in nature and to make this definition of 
accelerated motion exhibit the essential features of observed 
accelerated motions. And this, at last, after repeated efforts we 
trust we have succeeded in doing. In this belief we are confirmed 
mainly by the consideration that experimental results are seen 
to agree with and exactly correspond with those properties 
which have been, one after another, demonstrated by us. 
Finally, in the investigation of naturally accelerated motion we 
were led, by hand as it were, in following the habit and custom of 

nature 



THIRD DAY 161 

nature herself, in all her various other processes, to employ 
only those means which are most common, simple and easy. 

For I think no one believes that swimming or flying can be 
accomplished in a manner simpler or easier than that instinc- 
tively employed by fishes and birds. 

When, therefore, I observe a stone initially at rest falling 
from an elevated position and continually acquiring new in- 
crements of speed, why should I not believe that such increases 
take place in a manner which is exceedingly simple and rather 
obvious to everybody? If now we examine the matter carefully 
we find no addition or increment more simple than that which 
repeats itself always in the same manner. This we readily 
understand when we consider the intimate relationship between 
time and motion; for just as uniformity of motion is defined by 
and conceived through equal times and equal spaces (thus we 
call a motion uniform when equal distances are traversed during 
equal time-intervals), so also we may, in a similar manner, 
through equal time-intervals, conceive additions of speed as 
taking place without complication; thus we may picfture to our 



mind a motion as uniformly and continuously accelerated when, 
during any equal intervals of time whatever, equal increments 
of speed are given to it. Thus if any equal intervals of time 
whatever have elapsed, counting from the time at which the 
moving body left its position of rest and began to descend, the 
amount of speed acquired during the first two time-intervals 
will be double that acquired during the first time-interval 
alone; so the amount added during three of these time-intervals 
will be treble; and that in four, quadruple that of the first time- 
interval. To put the matter more clearly, if a body were to 
continue its motion with the same speed which it had acquired 
during the first time-interval and were to retain this same uni- 
form speed, then its motion would be twice as slow as that which 
it would have if its velocity had been acquired during two time- 
intervals. 

And thus, it seems, we shall not be far wrong if we put the 
increment of speed as proportional to the increment of time; 

hence 



162 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

hence the definition of motion which we are about to discuss may 
be stated as follows : A motion is said to be uniformly accelerated, 
when starting from rest, it acquires, during equal time-intervals, 
equal increments of speed. 

SAGR. Although I can offer no rational objection to this or 
indeed to any other definition, devised by any author whomso- 
ever, since all definitions are arbitrary, I may nevertheless 
without offense be allowed to doubt whether such a definition as 
the above, established in an abstract manner, corresponds to and 
describes that kind of accelerated motion which we meet in 
nature in the case of freely falling bodies. And since the Author 
apparently maintains that the motion described in his defini- 
tion is that of freely falling bodies, I would like to clear my 
mind of certain difficulties in order that I may later apply 
myself more earnestly to the propositions and their demon- 
strations. 

SALV. It is well that you and Simplicio raise these difficulties. 
They are, I imagine, the same which occurred to me when I 
first saw this treatise, and which were removed either by discus- 
sion with the Author himself, or by turning the matter over in 
my own mind. 

SAGR. When I think of a heavy body falling from rest, that is, 
starting with zero speed and gaining speed in proportion to the 

[199] . 

time from the beginning of the motion; such a motion as would, 
for instance, in eight beats of the pulse acquire eight degrees of 
speed; having at the end of the fourth beat acquired four de- 
grees; at the end of the second, two; at the end of the first, one: 
and since time is divisible without limit, it follows from all these 
considerations that if the earlier speed of a body is less than its 
present speed in a constant ratio, then there is no degree of 
speed however small (or, one may say, no degree of slowness 
however great) with which we may not find this body travelling 
after starting from infinite slowness, i. e., from rest. So that if 
that speed which it had at the end of the fourth beat was such 
that, if kept uniform, the body would traverse two miles in an 
hour, and if keeping the speed which it had at the end of the 

second 



THIRD DAY 163 

second beat, it would traverse one mile an hour, we must infer 
that, as the instant of starting is more and more nearly ap- 
proached, the body moves so slowly that, if it kept on moving at 
this rate, it would not traverse a mile in an hour, or in a day, or 
in a year or in a thousand years; indeed, it would not traverse a 
span in an even greater time; a phenomenon which baffles the 
imagination, while our senses show us that a heavy falling body 
suddenly acquires great speed. 

SALV. This is one of the difficulties which I also at the begin- 
ning, experienced, but which I shortly afterwards removed; and 
the removal was effected by the very experiment which creates 
the difficulty for you. You say the experiment appears to show 
that immediately after a heavy body starts from rest it acquires 
a very considerable speed: and I say that the same experiment 
makes clear the fact that the initial motions of a falling body, no 
matter how heavy, are very slow and gentle. Place a heavy 
body upon a yielding material, and leave it there without any 
pressure except that owing to its own weight; it is clear that if 
one lifts this body a cubit or two and allows it to fall upon the 
same material, it will, with this impulse, exert a new and greater 
pressure than that caused by its mere weight; and this effect is 
brought about by the [weight of the] falling body together with 
the velocity acquired during the fall, an effect which will be 
greater and greater according to the height of the fall, that is 
according as the velocity of the falling body becomes greater. 
From the quality and intensity of the blow we are thus enabled 
to accurately estimate the speed of a falling body. But tell me, 
gentlemen, is it not true that if a block be allowed to fall upon a 
stake from a height of four cubits and drives it into the earth, 

[200] 

say, four finger-breadths, that coming from a height of two 
cubits it will drive the stake a much less distance, and from the 
height of one cubit a still less distance; and finally if the block be 
lifted only one finger-breadth how much more will it accomplish 
than if merely laid on top of the stake without percussion? 
Certainly very little. If it be lifted only the thickness of a 
leaf, the effect will be altogether imperceptible. And since the 

effect 



164 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

effect of the blow depends upon the velocity of this striking 
body, can any one doubt the motion is very slow and the speed 
more than small whenever the effect [of the blow] is impercepti- 
ble ? See now the power of truth; the same experiment which at 
first glance seemed to show one thing, when more carefully 
examined, assures us of the contrary. 

But without depending upon the above experiment, which is 
doubtless very conclusive, it seems to me that it ought not to 
be difficult to establish such a fact by reasoning alone. Imagine 
a heavy stone held in the air at rest; the support is removed and 
the stone set free; then since it is heavier than the air it begins to 
fall, and not with uniform motion but slowly at the beginning 
and with a continuously accelerated motion. Now since velocity 
can be increased and diminished without limit, what reason is 
there to believe that such a moving body starting with infinite 
slowness, that is, from rest, immediately acquires a speed of ten 
degrees rather than one of four, or of two, or of one, or of a 
half, or of a hundredth; or, indeed, of any of the infinite number 
of small values [of speed] ? Pray listen. I hardly think you will 
refuse to grant that the gain of speed of the stone falling from 
rest follows the same sequence as the diminution and loss of this 
same speed when, by some impelling force, the stone is thrown to 
its former elevation : but even if you do not grant this, I do not 
see how you can doubt that the ascending stone, diminishing in 
speed, must before coming to rest pass through every possible 
degree of slowness. 

SIMP. But if the number of degrees of greater and greater 
slowness is limitless, they will never be all exhausted, therefore 
such an ascending heavy body will never reach rest, but will 
continue to move without limit always at a slower rate; but this 
is not the observed fact. 

SALV. This would happen, Simplicio, if the moving body 
were to maintain its speed for any length of time at each degree 
of velocity; but it merely passes each point without delaying 
more than an instant: and since each time-interval however 

[201] 

small may be divided into an infinite number of instants, these 

will 



THIRD DAY 165 

will always be sufficient [in number] to correspond to the infinite 
degrees of diminished velocity. 

That such a heavy rising body does not remain for any length 
of time at any given degree of velocity is evident from the fol- 
lowing: because if, some time-interval having been assigned, the 
body moves with the same speed in the last as in the first in- 
stant of that time-interval, it could from this second degree of 
elevation be in like manner raised through an equal height, 
just as it was transferred from the first elevation to the second, 
and by the same reasoning would pass from the second to the 
third and would finally continue in uniform motion forever. 

SAGR. From these considerations it appears to me that we 
may obtain a proper solution of the problem discussed by 
philosophers, namely, what causes the acceleration in the 
natural motion of heavy bodies ? Since, as it seems to me, the 
force [virtu] impressed by the agent projecting the body upwards 
diminishes continuously, this force, so long as it was greater than 
the contrary force of gravitation, impelled the body upwards; 
when the two are in equilibrium the body ceases to rise and 
passes through the state of rest in which the impressed impetus 
[impeto] is not destroyed, but only its excess over the weight of 
the body has been consumed the excess which caused the body 
to rise. Then as the diminution of the outside impetus [impeto] 
continues, and gravitation gains the upper hand, the fall begins, 
but slowly at first on account of the opposing impetus [virtu 
impressa], a large portion of which still remains in the body; but 
as this continues to diminish it also continues to be more and 
more overcome by gravity, hence the continuous acceleration of 
motion. 

SIMP. The idea is clever, yet more subtle than sound; for even 
if the argument were conclusive, it would explain only the case 
in which a natural motion is preceded by a violent motion, in 
which there still remains active a portion of the external force 
[virtu esterna] ; but where there is no such remaining portion and 
the body starts from an antecedent state of rest, the cogency of 
the whole argument fails. 

SAGR. I believe that you are mistaken and that this distinc- 
tion 



166 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

tion between cases which you make is superfluous or rather non- 
existent. But, tell me, cannot a projectile receive from the 
projector either a large or a small force [virtu] such as will throw 
it to a height of a hundred cubits, and even twenty or four or 



one? 



[202] 

SIMP. Undoubtedly, yes. 

SAGR. So therefore this impressed force [virtu impressa] may 
exceed the resistance of gravity so slightly as to raise it only 
a finger-breadth; and finally the force [virtu] of the projector 
may be just large enough to exadlly balance the resistance of 
gravity so that the body is not lifted at all but merely sus- 
tained. When one holds a stone in his hand does he do anything 
but give it a force impelling [virtu impellente] it upwards equal 
to the power [facolta] of gravity drawing it downwards ? And do 
you not continuously impress this force [virtu] upon the stone 
as long as you hold it in the hand? Does it perhaps diminish 
with the time during which one holds the stone? 

And what does it matter whether this support which prevents 
the stone from falling is furnished by one's hand or by a table 
or by a rope from which it hangs? Certainly nothing at all. 
You must conclude, therefore, Simplicio, that it makes no 
difference whatever whether the fall of the stone is preceded by a 
period of rest which is long, short, or instantaneous provided 
only the fall does not take place so long as the stone is adled 
upon by a force [virtu] opposed to its weight and sufficient to 
hold it at rest. 

SALV. The present does not seem to be the proper time to 
investigate the cause of the acceleration of natural motion con- 
cerning which various opinions have been expressed by various 
philosophers, some explaining it by attraction to the center, 
others to repulsion between the very small parts of the body, 
while still others attribute it to a certain stress in the surrounding 
medium which closes in behind the falling body and drives it 
from one of its positions to another. Now, all these fantasies, 
and others too, ought to be examined; but it is not really worth 
while. At present it is the purpose of our Author merely to 

investigate 



THIRD DAY 167 

investigate and to demonstrate some of the properties of ac- 
celerated motion (whatever the cause of this acceleration may 
be) meaning thereby a motion, such that the momentum of its 
velocity [i momenti delta sua velocita] goes on increasing after 
departure from rest, in simple proportionality to the time, which 
is the same as saying that in equal time-intervals the body 
receives equal increments of velocity; and if we find the proper- 
ties [of accelerated motion] which will be demonstrated later are 
realized in freely falling and accelerated bodies, we may conclude 
that the assumed definition includes such a motion of falling 
bodies and that their speed [accelerazione] goes on increasing as 
the time and the duration of the motion. 

[203] 

SAGR. So far as I see at present, the definition might have 
been put a little more clearly perhaps without changing the 
fundamental idea, namely, uniformly accelerated motion is such 
that its speed increases in proportion to the space traversed; so 
that, for example, the speed acquired by a body in falling four 
cubits would be double that acquired in falling two cubits and 
this latter speed would be double that acquired in the first cubit. 
Because there is no doubt but that a heavy body falling from 
the height of six cubits has, and strikes with, a momentum 
[impeto] double that it had at the end of three cubits, triple that 
which it had at the end of one. 

SALV. It is very comforting to me to have had such a com- 
panion in error; and moreover let me tell you that your proposi- 
tion seems so highly probable that our Author himself admitted, 
when I advanced this opinion to him, that he had for some time 
shared the same fallacy. But what most surprised me was to 
see two propositions so inherently probable that they com- 
manded the assent of everyone to whom they were presented, 
proven in a few simple words to be not only false, but im- 
possible. 

SIMP. I am one of those who accept the proposition, and 
believe that a falling body acquires force [vires] in its descent, its 
velocity increasing in proportion to the space, and that the 
momentum [momenta] of the falling body is doubled when it falls 

from 



168 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

from a doubled height; these propositions, it appears to me, 
ought to be conceded without hesitation or controversy. 

SALV. And yet they are as false and impossible as that motion 
should be completed instantaneously; and here is a very clear 
demonstration of it. If the velocities are in proportion to the 
spaces traversed, or to be traversed, then these spaces are 
traversed in equal intervals of time; if, therefore, the velocity 
with which the falling body traverses a space of eight feet were 
double that with which it covered the first four feet (just as the 
one distance is double the other) then the time-intervals re- 
quired for these passages would be equal. But for one and the 
same body to fall eight feet and four feet in the same time is 
possible only in the case of instantaneous [discontinuous] motion; 

[204] 

but observation shows us that the motion of a falling body oc- 
cupies time, and less of it in covering a distance of four feet than 
of eight feet; therefore it is not true that its velocity increases in 
proportion to the space. 

The falsity of the other proposition may be shown with equal 
clearness. For if we consider a single striking body the difference 
of momentum in its blows can depend only upon difference of 
velocity; for if the striking body falling from a double height 
were to deliver a blow of double momentum, it would be neces- 
sary for this body to strike with a doubled velocity; but with 
this doubled speed it would traverse a doubled space in the 
same time-interval; observation however shows that the time 
required for fall from the greater height is longer. 

SAGR. You present these recondite matters with too much 
evidence and ease; this great facility makes them less appre- 
ciated than they would be had they been presented in a more 
abstruse manner. For, in my opinion, people esteem more 
lightly that knowledge which they acquire with so little labor 
than that acquired through long and obscure discussion. 

SALV. If those who demonstrate with brevity and clearness 
the fallacy of many popular beliefs were treated with contempt 
instead of gratitude the injury would be quite bearable; but on 
the other hand it is very unpleasant and annoying to see men, 

who 



THIRD DAY 169 

who claim to be peers of anyone in a certain field of study, take 
for granted certain conclusions which later are quickly and 
easily shown by another to be false. I do not describe such a 
feeling as one of envy, which usually degenerates into hatred 
and anger against those who discover such fallacies; I would call 
it a strong desire to maintain old errors, rather than accept 
newly discovered truths. This desire at times induces them to 
unite against these truths, although at heart believing in them, 
merely for the purpose of lowering the esteem in which certain 
others are held by the unthinking crowd. Indeed, I have heard 
from our Academician many such fallacies held as true but 
easily refutable; some of these I have in mind. 

SAGR. You must not withhold them from us, but, at the 
proper time, tell us about them even though an extra session be 
necessary. But now, continuing the thread of our talk, it would 

[205] 

seem that up to the present we have established the definition of 
uniformly accelerated motion which is expressed as follows: 
A motion is said to be equally or uniformly accelerated 
when, starting from rest, its momentum (celeritatis momenta) 
receives equal increments in equal times. 
SALV. This definition established, the Author makes a single 
assumption, namely, 

The speeds acquired by one and the same body moving 
down planes of different inclinations are equal when the 
heights of these planes are equal. 

By the height of an inclined plane we mean the perpendicular 

let fall from the upper end of the plane upon the horizontal line 

drawn through the lower end of the same plane. Thus, to 

illustrate, let the line AB be horizontal, and let the planes CA 

and CD be inclined to it; then the Author calls the perpendicular 

CB the "height" of the planes CA and CD; he supposes that 

he speeds acquired by one and the same body, descending 

ilong the planes CA and CD to the terminal points A and D are 

equal since the heights of these planes are the same, CB; and 

Iso it must be understood that this speed is that which would 

be acquired by the same body falling from C to B. 

Sagr. 




1 70 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

SAGR. Your assumption appears to me so reasonable that it 
ought to be conceded without question, provided of course there 
are no chance or outside resistances, and that the planes are 

chard and smooth, and that the 
figure of the moving body is per- 
fedtly round, so that neither plane 
nor moving body is rough. All re? 
sistance and opposition having 
been removed, my reason tells 
me at once that a heavy and per- 
45 fedtly round ball descending along 

the lines CA, CD, CB would reach the terminal points A, D, 
B, with equal momenta [impeti eguali\. 

SALV. Your words are very plausible; but I hope by experi- 
ment to increase the probability to an extent which shall be little 
short of a rigid demonstration. 

[206] 

Imagine this page to represent a vertical wall, with a nail 
driven into it; and from the nail let there be suspended a lead 
bullet of one or two ounces by means of a fine vertical thread, 
AB, say from four to six feet long, on this wall draw a horizontal 
line DC, at right angles to the vertical thread AB, which hangs 
about two finger-breadths in front of the wall. Now bring the 
thread AB with the attached ball into the position AC and set it 
free; first it will be observed to descend along the arc CBD, to 
pass the point B, and to travel along the arc BD, till it almost 
reaches the horizontal CD, a slight shortage being caused by the 
resistance of the air and the string; from this we may rightly 
infer that the ball in its descent through the arc CB acquired a 
momentum [impeto] on reaching B, which was just sufficient to 
carry it through a similar arc BD to the same height. Having 
repeated this experiment many times, let us now drive a nail into 
the wall close to the perpendicular AB, say at E or F, so that 
it projects out some five or six finger-breadths in order that the 
thread, again carrying the bullet through the arc CB, may strike 
upon the nail E when the bullet reaches B, and thus compel it to 
traverse the arc BG, described about E as center. From this 

we 



THIRD DAY 171 

we can see what can be done by the same momentum [impeto] 
which previously starting at the same point B carried the same 
body through the arc BD to the horizontal CD. Now, gentle- 
men, you will observe with pleasure that the ball swings to the 
point G in the horizontal, and you would see the same thing 
happen if the obstacle were placed at some lower point, say at 
F, about which the ball would describe the arc BI, the rise of the 




Fig. 46 

ball always terminating exactly on the line CD. But when the 
nail is placed so low that the remainder of the thread below it 
will not reach to the height CD (which would happen if the nail 
were placed nearer B than to the intersection of AB with the 

[207] 

horizontal CD) then the thread leaps over the nail and twists 
itself about it. 

This experiment leaves no room for doubt as to the truth of 
our supposition; for since the two arcs CB and DB are equal and 
similarly placed, the momentum [momenta] acquired by the fall 
through the arc CB is the same as that gained by fall through the 
arc DB; but the momentum [momenta] acquired at B, owing to 
fall through CB, is able to lift the same body [mobile] through the 
arc BD; therefore, the momentum acquired in the fall BD is 
equal to that which lifts the same body through the same arc 
from B to D; so, in general, every momentum acquired by fall 

through 



172 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

through an arc is equal to that which can lift the same body 
through the same arc. But all these momenta [momenti\ which 
cause a rise through the arcs BD, BG, and BI are equal, since 
they are produced by the same momentum, gained by fall 
through CB, as experiment shows. Therefore all the momenta 
gained by fall through the arcs DB, GB, IB are equal. 

SAGR. The argument seems to me so conclusive and the ex- 
periment so well adapted to establish the hypothesis that we 
may, indeed, consider it as demonstrated. 

SALV. I do not wish, Sagredo, that we trouble ourselves too 
much about this matter, since we are going to apply this principle 
mainly in motions which occur on plane surfaces, and not upon 
curved, along which acceleration varies in a manner greatly 
different from that which we have assumed for planes. 

So that, although the above experiment shows us that the 
descent of the moving body through the arc CB confers upon it 
momentum [momenta] just sufficient to carry it to the same 
height through any of the arcs BD, BG, BI, we are not able, by 
similar means, to show that the event would be identical in 
the case of a perfectly round ball descending along planes whose 
inclinations are respectively the same as the chords of these 
arcs. It seems likely, on the other hand, that, since these planes 
form angles at the point B, they will present an obstacle to the 
ball which has descended along the chord CB, and starts to rise 
along the chord BD, BG, BI. 

In striking these planes some of its momentum [impeto] will 
be lost and it will not be able to rise to the height of the line CD; 
but this obstacle, which interferes with the experiment, once 
removed, it is clear that the momentum [impeto] (which gains 

[208] 

in strength with descent) will be able to carry the body to the 
same height. Let us then, for the present, take this as a pos- 
tulate, the absolute truth of which will be established when we 
find that the inferences from it correspond to and agree per- 
fectly with experiment. The author having assumed this single 
principle passes next to the propositions which he clearly dem- 
onstrates; the first of these is as follows : 



THIRD DAY 
THEOREM I, PROPOSITION I 



173 



The time in which any space is traversed by a body start- 
ing from rest and uniformly accelerated is equal to the time 
in which that same space would be traversed by the same 
body moving at a uniform speed whose value is the mean 
of the highest speed and the speed just before acceleration 
began. 

Let us represent by the line AB the time in which the space 
CD is traversed by a body which starts from rest at C and is 
uniformly accelerated; let the final and highest value of the 
speed gained during the interval AB be represented by the line 
EB drawn at right angles to AB; draw the line AE, then all 
lines drawn from equidistant points on AB and parallel to BE 
will represent the increasing values of the speed, C 

beginning with the instant A. Let the point F 
bisect the line EB; draw FG parallel to BA, 
and GA parallel to FB, thus forming a parallel- 
ogram AGFB which will be equal in area to the 
triangle AEB, since the side GF bisects the side 
AE at the point I; for if the parallel lines in the 
triangle AEB are extended to GI, then the sum 
of all the parallels contained in the quadrilateral 
is equal to the sum of those contained in the tri- 
angle AEB; for those in the triangle IEF are 
equal to those contained in the triangle GIA, 
while those included in the trapezium AIFB are 
common. Since each and every instant of time 
in the time-interval AB has its corresponding 
point on the line AB, from which points par- 
allels drawn in and limited by the triangle AEB ** 
represent the increasing values of the growing Fig. 47 
velocity, and since parallels contained within the rectangle rep- 
resent the values of a speed which is not increasing, but constant, 
it appears, in like manner, that the momenta [momenta] assumed 
by the moving body may also be represented, in the case of the 
accelerated motion, by the increasing parallels of the triangle 

AEB, 




174 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

[209] 

AEB, and, in the case of the uniform motion, by the parallels of 
the redlangle GB. For, what the momenta may lack in the first 
part of the accelerated motion (the deficiency of the momenta 
being represented by the parallels of the triangle AGI) is made 
up by the momenta represented by the parallels of the triangle 
IEF. 

Hence it is clear that equal spaces will be traversed in equal 
times by two bodies, one of which, starting from rest, moves with 
A H a uniform acceleration, while the momentum of 
the other, moving with uniform speed, is one-half 
its maximum momentum under accelerated mo- 
tion. Q. E. D. 

THEOREM II, PROPOSITION II 

The spaces described by a body falling from rest 
with a uniformly accelerated motion are to each 
other as the squares of the time-intervals em- 
ployed in traversing these distances. 
Let the time beginning with any instant A be rep- 
resented by the straight line AB in which are taken 
any two time-intervals AD and AE. Let HI repre- 
sent the distance through which the body, starting 
from rest at H, falls with uniform acceleration. If 
HL represents the space traversed during the time- 
interval AD, and HM that covered during the in- 
terval AE, then the space MH stands to the space 
LH in a ratio which is the square of the ratio of the 
time AE to the time AD; or we may say simply that 
the distances HM and HL are related as the squares 
Fig. 48' of AE and AD. 
Draw the line AC making any angle whatever with the line 
AB; and from the points D and E, draw the parallel lines DO 
and EP; of these two lines, DO represents the greatest velocity 
attained during the interval AD, while EP represents the max- 
imum velocity acquired during the interval AE. But it has 
just been proved that so far as distances traversed are con- 
cerned 



THIRD DAY 175 

cerned it is precisely the same whether a body falls from rest 
with a uniform acceleration or whether it falls during an equal 
time-interval with a constant speed which is one-half the max- 
imum speed attained during the accelerated motion. It follows 
therefore that the distances HM and HL are the same as would 
be traversed, during the time-intervals AE and AD, by uniform 
velocities equal to one-half those represented by DO and EP 
respectively. If, therefore, one can show that the distances 
HM and HL are in the same ratio as the squares of the time- 
intervals AE and AD, our proposition will be proven. 

[210] 

But in the fourth proposition of the first book [p. 157 above] 
it has been shown that the spaces traversed by two particles in 
uniform motion bear to one another a ratio which is equal to the 
product of the ratio of the velocities by the ratio of the times. 
But in this case the ratio of the velocities is the same as the ratio 
of the time-intervals (for the ratio of AE to AD is the same as 
that of y 2 EP to K DO or of EP to DO) . Hence the ratio of the 
spaces traversed is the same as the squared ratio of the time- 
intervals. Q. E. D. 

Evidently then the ratio of the distances is the square of the 
ratio of the final velocities, that is, of the lines EP and DO, since 
these are to each other as AE to AD. 

COROLLARY I 

Hence it is clear that if we take any equal intervals of time 
whatever, counting from the beginning of the motion, such as 
AD, DE, EF, FG, in which the spaces HL, LM, MN, NI are 
traversed, these spaces will bear to one another the same ratio 
as the series of odd numbers, I, 3, 5, 7; for this is the ratio of the 
differences of the squares of the lines [which represent time], 
differences which exceed one another by equal amounts, this 
excess being equal to the smallest line [viz. the one representing a 
single time-interval] : or we may say [that this is the ratio] of the 
differences of the squares of the natural numbers beginning with 
unity. 

While, 



I 



~7 

/ 



176 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

While, therefore, during equal intervals of time the velocities 
increase as the natural numbers, the increments in the distances 
traversed during these equal time-intervals are to one another as 
the odd numbers beginning with unity. 

SAGR. Please suspend the discussion for a moment since there 
just occurs to me an idea which I want to illustrate by means 
of a diagram in order that it may be clearer both to you and 
tome. 

Let the line AI represent the lapse of time measured from the 
initial instant A; through A draw the straight line AF making 
A any angle whatever; join the terminal 
points I and F; divide the time AI in half 
at C; draw CB parallel to IF. Let us 
consider CB as the maximum value of 
the velocity which increases from zero 
C at the beginning, in simple proportion- 
ality to the intercepts on the triangle 
ABC of lines drawn parallel to BC; or 
what is the same thing, let us suppose the 
velocity to increase in proportion to the 
r time; then I admit without question, in 
view of the preceding argument, that the 
space described by a body falling in the 
aforesaid manner will be equal to the 
space traversed by the same body during 
the same length of time travelling with a 
uniform speed equal to EC, the half of 
BC. Further let us imagine that the 
Fi g- 49 [211] 

body has fallen with accelerated motion so that, at the in- 
stant C, it has the velocity BC. It is clear that if the body 
continued to descend with the same speed BC, without ac- 
celeration, it would in the next time-interval CI traverse 
double the distance covered during the interval AC, with the 
uniform speed EC which is half of BC; but since the falling body 
acquires equal increments of speed during equal increments of 
time, it follows that the velocity BC, during the next time- 

interval 



THIRD DAY 17? 

interval CI will be increased by an amount represented by the 
parallels of the triangle BFG which is equal to the triangle ABC. 
If, then, one adds to the velocity GI half of the velocity FG, the 
highest speed acquired by the accelerated motion and deter- 
mined by the parallels of the triangle BFG, he will have the 
uniform velocity with which the same space would have been 
described in the time CI; and since this speed IN is three times 
as great as EC it follows that the space described during the in- 
terval CI is three times as great as that described during the inter- 
val AC. Let us imagine the motion extended over another equal 
time-interval IO, and the triangle extended to APO; it is then 
evident that if the motion continues during the interval IO, at 
the constant rate IF acquired by acceleration during the time AI, 
the space traversed during the interval IO will be four times that 
traversed during the first interval AC, because the speed IF is 
four times the speed EC. But if we enlarge our triangle so as to 
include FPQ which is equal to ABC, still assuming the accelera- 
tion to be constant, we shall add to the uniform speed an incre- 
ment RQ, equal to EC; then the value of the equivalent uniform 
speed during the time-interval IO will be five times that during 
the first time-interval AC; therefore the space traversed will be 
quintuple that during the first interval AC. It is thus evident 
by simple computation that a moving body starting from rest 
and acquiring velocity at a rate proportional to the time, will, 
during equal intervals of time, traverse distances which are 
related to each other as the odd numbers beginning with unity, 
J > 3> 5; * or considering the total space traversed, that covered 

[2I2[ 

in double time will be quadruple that covered during unit time; 
in triple time, the space is nine times as great as in unit time. 

* As illustrating the greater elegance and brevity of modern analytical 
methods, one may obtain the result of Prop. II directly from the fun- 
damental equation 

S = l /2 g (t\ " * 2 l) = g/2 (*2 + tl) (*2 - *l) 

where g is the acceleration of gravity and j, the space traversed between 
the instants t\ and t- 2 . If now ^ - 1\ = I , say one second, then s = g/ 2 (% + *i) 
where *2+*i, must always be an odd number, seeing that it is the sum of 
two consecutive terms in the series of natural numbers. [Trans.] 



178 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

And in general the spaces traversed are in the duplicate ratio of 
the times, i. e., in the ratio of the squares of the times. 

SIMP. In truth, I find more pleasure in this simple and clear 
argument of Sagredo than in the Author's demonstration which 
to me appears rather obscure; so that I am convinced that 
matters are as described, once having accepted the definition of 
uniformly accelerated motion. But as to whether this accelera- 
tion is that which one meets in nature in the case of falling 
bodies, I am still doubtful; and it seems to me, not only for my 
own sake but also for all those who think as I do, that this 
would be the proper moment to introduce one of those experi- 
ments and there are many of them, I understand which 
illustrate in several ways the conclusions reached. 

SALV. The request which you, as a man of science, make, is a 
very reasonable one; for this is the custom and properly so 
in those sciences where mathematical demonstrations are applied 
to natural phenomena, as is seen in the case of perspective, 
astronomy, mechanics, music, and others where the principles, 
once established by well-chosen experiments, become the founda- 
tions of the entire superstructure. I hope therefore it will not 
appear to be a waste of time if we discuss at considerable length 
this first and most fundamental question upon which hinge 
numerous consequences of which we have in this book only a 
small number, placed there by the Author, who has done so 
much to open a pathway hitherto closed to minds of speculative 
turn. So far as experiments go they have not been neglected 
by the Author; and often, in his company, I have attempted in 
the following manner to assure myself that the acceleration 
actually experienced by falling bodies is that above described. 

A piece of wooden moulding or scantling, about 12 cubits 
long, half a cubit wide, and three finger-breadths thick, was 
taken; on its edge was cut a channel a little more than one 
finger in breadth; having made this groove very straight, smooth, 
and polished, and having lined it with parchment, also as 
smooth and polished as possible, we rolled along it a hard, 
smooth, and very round bronze ball. Having placed this 

board 



THIRD DAY 179 

board in a sloping position, by lifting one end some one or two 
cubits above the other, we rolled the ball, as I was just saying, 
along the channel, noting, in a manner presently to be described, 
the time required to make the descent. We repeated this ex- 
periment more than once in order to measure the time with an 
accuracy such that the deviation between two observations 
never exceeded one-tenth of a pulse-beat. Having performed 
this operation and having assured ourselves of its reliability, we 
now rolled the ball only one-quarter the length of the channel; 
and having measured the time of its descent, we found it pre- 
cisely one-half of the former. Next we tried other distances, com- 
paring the time for, the whole length with that for the half, or with 
that for two-thirds, or three-fourths, or indeed for any fraction; 
in such experiments, repeated a full hundred times, we always 
found that the spaces traversed were to each other as the squares 
of the times, and this was true for all inclinations of the plane, 
i. e., of the channel, along which we rolled the ball. We also 
observed that the times of descent, for various inclinations of the 
plane, bore to one another precisely that ratio which, as we shall 
see later, the Author had predicted and demonstrated for them. 

For the measurement of time, we employed a large vessel of 
water placed in an elevated position; to the bottom of this 
vessel was soldered a pipe of small diameter giving a thin jet of 
water, which we collected in a small glass during the time of each 
descent, whether for the whole length of the channel or for a part 
of its length; the water thus collected was weighed, after each 
descent, on a very accurate balance; the differences and ratios of 
these weights gave us the differences and ratios of the times, and 
this with such accuracy that although the operation was re- 
peated many, many times, there was no appreciable discrepancy 
in the results. 

SIMP. I would like to have been present at these experiments; 
but feeling confidence in the care with which you performed 
them, and in the fidelity with which you relate them, I am 
satisfied and accept them as true and valid 

SALV. Then we can proceed without discussion. 



i8o THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

COROLLARY II 

Secondly, it follows that, starting from any initial point, if we 
take any two distances, traversed in any time-intervals whatso- 
ever, these time-intervals bear to one another the same 
ratio as one of the distances to the mean proportional of 
the two distances. 

For if we take two distances ST and SY measured from 
the initial point S, the mean proportional of which is SX, 
the time of fall through ST is to the time of fall through 
X SY as ST is to SX; or one may say the time of fall through 
SY is to the time of fall through ST as SY is to SX. Now 
since it has been shown that the spaces traversed are in 
LT the same ratio as the squares of the times ; and since, more- 
Fig. 5 over, the ratio of the space SY to the space ST is the 
square of the ratio SY to SX, it follows that the ratio of the 
times of fall through SY and ST is the ratio of the respective 
distances SY and SX. 

SCHOLIUM 

The above corollary has been proven for the case of vertical 
fall; but it holds also for planes inclined at any angle; for it is to 
be assumed that along these planes the velocity increases in the 
same ratio, that is, in proportion to the time, or, if you prefer, as 
the series of natural numbers.* 

SALV. Here, Sagredo, I should like, if it be not too tedious to 
Simplicio, to interrupt for a moment the present discussion in 
order to make some additions on the basis of what has already 
been proved and of what mechanical principles we have already 
learned from our Academician. This addition I make for the 
better establishment on logical and experimental grounds, of the 
principle which we have above considered; and what is more 
important, for the purpose of deriving it geometrically, after first 
demonstrating a single lemma which is fundamental in the science 
of motion [impeti]. 

* The dialogue which intervenes between this Scholium and the follow- 
ing theorem was elaborated by Viviani, at the suggestion of Galileo. 
See National Edition, viii, 23. [Trans.} 



THIRD DAY 181 

SAGR. If the advance which you propose to make is such as 
will confirm and fully establish these sciences of motion, I will 
gladly devote to it any length of time. Indeed, I shall not only 

[215] 

be glad to have you proceed, but I beg of you at once to satisfy 
the curiosity which you have awakened in me concerning your 
proposition; and I think that Simplicio is of the same mind. 

SIMP. Quite right. 

SALV. Since then I have your permission, let us first of all con- 
sider this notable fact, that the momenta or speeds [i momenti o le 
velocita] of one and the same moving body vary with the inclina- 
tion of the plane. 

The speed reaches a maximum along a vertical direction, and 
for other directions diminishes as the plane diverges from the 
vertical. Therefore the impetus, ability, energy, [I'impeto, il 
talento, I'energia] or, one might say, the momentum [il momenta] 
of descent of the moving body is diminished by the plane upon 
which it is supported and along which it rolls. 

For the sake of greater clearness erect the line AB perpendicular 
to the horizontal AC; next draw AD, AE, AF, etc., at different 
inclinations to the horizontal. Then I say that all the momentum 
of the falling body is along the vertical and is a maximum when it 
falls in that direction; the momentum is less along DA and still 
less along EA, and even less yet along the more inclined plane FA. 
Finally on the horizontal plane the mo- 
mentum vanishes altogether; the body 
finds itself in a condition of indifference 
as to motion or rest; has no inherent tend- 
ency to move in any direction, and offers 
no resistance to being set in motion. For 
just as a heavy body or system of bodies 
cannot of itself move upwards, or recede 
from the common center [comun centra] HO} 

toward which all heavy things tend, so it j 

is impossible for any body of its own ac- O 

cord to assume any motion other than Fig. 51 

one which carries it nearer to the aforesaid common center. 

Hence, along the horizontal, by which we understand a surface, 

every point of which is equidistant from this same common center, 

the body will have no momentum whatever. 

This 




182 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

[216] 

This change of momentum being clear, it is here necessary for 
me to explain something which our Academician wrote when in 
Padua, embodying it in a treatise on mechanics prepared solely 
for the use of his students, and proving it at length and conclu- 
sively when considering the origin and nature of that marvellous 
machine, the screw. What he proved is the manner in which the 
momentum [impeto] varies with the inclination of the plane, as for 
instance that of the plane FA, one end of which is elevated through 
a vertical distance FC. This direction FC is that along which the 
momentum of a heavy body becomes a maximum; let us discover 
what ratio this momentum bears to that of the same body moving 
along the inclined plane FA. This ratio, I say, is the inverse of 
that of the aforesaid lengths. Such is the lemma preceding the 
theorem which I hope to demonstrate a little later. 

It is clear that the impelling force [impeto] acting on a body in 
descent is equal to the resistance or least force [resistenza o forza 
minima] sufficient to hold it at rest. In order to measure this force 
and resistance [forza e resistenza] I propose to use the weight of 
another body. Let us place upon the plane FA a body G con- 
nected to the weight H by means of a cord passing over the 
point F; then the body H will ascend or descend, along the 
perpendicular, the same distance which the body G ascends or 
descends along the inclined plane FA; but this distance will not 
be equal to the rise or fall of G along the vertical in which direction 
alone G, as other bodies, exerts its force [resistenza]. This is clear. 
For if we consider the motion of the body G, from A to F, in the 
triangle AFC to be made up of a horizontal component AC and a 
vertical component CF, and remember that this body experiences 
no resistance to motion along the horizontal (because by such a 

[217] 

motion the body neither gains nor loses distance from the common 
center of heavy things) it follows that resistance is met only in 
consequence of the body rising through the vertical distance CF. 
Since then the body G in moving from A to F offers resistance only 
in so far as it rises through the vertical distance CF, while the 
other body H must fall vertically through the entire distance FA, 
and since this ratio is maintained whether the motion be large or 
small, the two bodies being inextensibly connected, we are able 
to assert positively that, in case of equilibrium (bodies at rest) the 

momenta, 



THIRD DAY 183 

momenta, the velocities, or their tendency to motion [propensioni 
al moto], i. e., the spaces which would be traversed by them in 
equal times, must be in the inverse ratio to their weights. This is 
what has been demonstrated in every case of mechanical motion.* 
So that, in order to hold the weight G at rest, one must give H a 
weight smaller in the same ratio as the distance CF is smaller than 
FA. If we do this, FA:FC = weight G: weight H; then equilibrium 
will occur, that is, the weights H and G will have the same impell- 
ing forces [momenti eguali], and the two bodies will come to 
rest. 

And since we are agreed that the impetus, energy, momentum 
or tendency to motion of a moving body is as great as the force or 
least resistance [forza o resistenza minima] sufficient to stop it, and 
since we have found that the weight H is capable of preventing 
motion in the weight G, it follows that the less weight H whose en- 
tire force [momenta totale] is along the perpendicular, FC, will be an 
exact measure of the component of force [momenta parziale] which 
the larger weight G exerts along the plane FA. But the measure 
of the total force [total momento] on the body G is its own weight, 
since to prevent its fall it is only necessary to balance it with an 
equal weight, provided this second weight be free to move verti- 
cally; therefore the component of the force [momento parziale] on 
G along the inclined plane FA will bear to the maximum and total 
force on this same body G along the perpendicular FC the same 
ratio as the weight H to the weight G. This ratio is, by con- 
struction, the same which the height, FC, of the inclined plane 
bears to the length FA. We have here the lemma which I pro- 
posed to demonstrate and which, as you will see, has been as- 
sumed by our Author in the second part of the sixth proposition 
of the present treatise. 

SAGR. From what you have shown thus far, it appears to me 
that one might infer, arguing ex aequali con la proportione per- 
turbata, that the tendencies [momenti] of one and the same body to 
move along planes differently inclined, but having the same verti- 
cal height, as FA and FI, are to each other inversely as the 
lengths of the planes. 

[218] 

SALV. Perfectly right. This point established, I pass to the 
demonstration of the following theorem: 

* A near approach to the principle of virtual work enunciated by 
John Bernoulli in 1717. [Trans.] 



184 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

If a body falls freely along smooth planes inclined at any angle 
whatsoever, but of the same height, the speeds with which it 
reaches the bottom are the same. 

First we must recall the fact that on a plane of any inclination 
whatever a body starting from rest gains speed or momentum 
[la quantita dell'impeto] in direct proportion to the time, in agree- 
ment with the definition of naturally accelerated motion given by 
the Author. Hence, as he has shown in the preceding proposition, 
the distances traversed are proportional to the squares of the 
times and therefore to the squares of the speeds. The speed 
relations are here the same as in the motion first studied [i. e., 
vertical motion], since in each case the gain of speed is proportional 
to the time. 

Let AB be an inclined plane whose height above the level BC is 
AC. As we have seen above the force impelling [I'impeto] a body 

to fall along the vertical AC is to the force 
which drives the same body along the in- 
clined plane AB as AB is to AC. On the 
incline AB, lay off AD a third propor- 
tional to AB and AC; then the force pro- 
ducing motion along AC is to that along 
AB (i. e., along AD) as the length AC is to 
the length AD. And therefore the body 
will traverse the space AD, along the in- 
cline AB, in the same time which it would occupy in falling the ver- 
tical distance AC, (since the forces [momenti] are in the same ratio 
as these distances) ; also the speed at C is to the speed at D as the 
distance AC is to the distance AD. But, according to the defini- 
tion of accelerated motion, the speed at B is to the speed of the 
same body at D as the time required to traverse AB is to the time 
required for AD; and, according to the last corollary of the second 
proposition, the time of passing through the distance AB bears to 
the time of passing through AD the same ratio as the distance 
AC (a mean proportional between AB and AD) to AD. Accord- 
ingly the two speeds at B and C each bear to the speed at D the 
same ratio, namely, that of the distances AC and AD; hence they 
are equal. This is the theorem which I set out to prove. 

From the above we are better able to demonstrate the following 
third proposition of the Author in which he employs the following 
principle, namely, the time required to traverse an inclined plane 

is 




THIRD DAY 185 

is to that required to fall through the vertical height of the plane 
in the same ratio as the length of the plane to its height. 

[219] 

For, according to the second corollary of the second proposition, 
if BA represents the time required to pass over the distance BA, 
the time required to pass the distance AD will be a mean propor- 
tional between these two distances and will be represented by 
the line AC; but if AC represents the time needed to traverse AD 
it will also represent the time required to fall through the distance 
AC, since the distances AC and AD are traversed in equal times; 
consequently if AB represents the time required for AB then AC 
will represent the time required for AC. Hence the times required 
to traverse AB and AC are to each other as the distances AB and 
AC. 

In like manner it can be shown that the time required to fall 
through AC is to the time required for any other incline AE as 
the length AC is to the length AE; therefore, ex aequali, the time of 
fall along the incline AB is to that along AE as the distance AB is 
to the distance AE, etc.* 

One might by application of this same theorem, as Sagredo will 
readily see, immediately demonstrate the sixth proposition of the 
Author; but let us here end this digression which Sagredo has 
perhaps found rather tedious, though I consider it quite important 
for the theory of motion. 

SAGR. On the contrary it has given me great satisfaction, and 
indeed I find it necessary for a complete grasp of this principle. 

SALV. I will now resume the reading of the text. 

[215] 

THEOREM III, PROPOSITION III 

If one and the same body, starting from rest, falls along 

an inclined plane and also along a vertical, each having the 

same height, the times of descent will be to each other as 

the lengths of the inclined plane and the vertical. 

Let AC be the inclined plane and AB the perpendicular, each 

having the same vertical height above the horizontal, namely, 

BA; then I say, the time of descent of one and the same body 

* Putting this argument in a modern and evident notation, one has 

AC = 1/2 rt and AD = 1/2 si ^ If now AC 2 = AB - *&> h follows at 
once that t d = k. [Trans.] Q. D. E. 



186 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

[216] 

along the plane AC bears a ratio to the time of fall along the 
perpendicular AB, which is the same as the ratio of the length 
AC to the length AB. Let DG, El and LF be any lines parallel 
y^to the horizontal CB; then it follows from 
what has preceded that a body starting from 
A will acquire the same speed at the point G 
as at D, since in each case the vertical fall is 
the same; in like manner the speeds at I and 
E will be the same; so also those at L and F. 
And in general the speeds at the two extremi- 
ties of any parallel drawn from any point on 
AB to the corresponding point on AC will be 




C M. B equal. 

Fig- 53 Thus the two distances AC and AB are 

traversed at the same speed. But it has already been proved 

[217] 

that if two distances are traversed by a body moving with equal 
speeds, then the ratio of the times of descent will be the ratio of 
the distances themselves; therefore, the time of descent along 
AC is to that along AB as the length of the plane AC is to the 
vertical distance AB. Q. E. D. 

[218] 

SAGR. It seems to me that the above could have been proved 
clearly and briefly on the basis of a proposition already demon- 
strated, namely, that the distance traversed in the case of 
accelerated motion along AC or AB is the same as that covered 

[219] 

by a uniform speed whose value is one-half the maximum speed, 
CB; the two distances AC and AB having been traversed at the 
same uniform speed it is evident, from Proposition I, that the 
times of descent will be to each other as the distances. 

COROLLARY 

Hence we may infer that the times of descent along planes 
having different inclinations, but the same vertical height stand 

to 



THIRD DAY 187 

to one another in the same ratio as the lengths of the planes. 
For consider any plane AM extending from A to the horizontal 
CB; then it may be demonstrated in the same manner that the 
time of descent along AM is to the time along AB as the dis- 
tance AM is to AB ; but since the time along AB is to that along 
AC as the length AB is to the length AC, it follows, ex (zquali y that 
as AM is to AC so is the time along AM to the time along AC. 

THEOREM IV, PROPOSITION IV 

The times of descent along planes of the same length but 

of different inclinations are to each other in the inverse 

ratio of the square roots of their heights 

From a single point B draw the planes BA and BC, having 

the same length but different inclinations; let AE and CD be 

horizontal lines drawn to meet the perpendicular BD; and 

[220] 

let BE represent the height of the plane AB, and BD the height 
of BC; also let BI be a mean proportional to BD and BE; then 
the ratio of BD to BI is equal to the B 

square root of the ratio of BD to BE. 
Now, I say, the ratio of the times of de- 
scent along BA and BC is the ratio of BD 
to BI; so that the time of descent along 
BA is related to the height of the other 
plane BC, namely BD as the time along 
BC is related to the height BI. Now it 




must be proved that the time of descent A ^ / 

along BA is to that along BC as the length / 

BD is to the length BI. C L 

Draw IS parallel to DC; and since it Fig. 54 

has been shown that the time of fall along BA is to that along 
the vertical BE as BA is to BE; and also that the time along 
BE is to that along BD as BE is to BI; and likewise that the 
time along BD is to that along BC as BD is to BC, or as BI to 
BS; it follows, ex czquali, that the time along BA is to that along 
BC as BA to BS, or BC to BS. However, BC is to BS as BD 
is to BI ; hence follows our proposition. 



1 88 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

THEOREM V, PROPOSITION V 

The times of descent along planes of different length, slope 
and height bear to one another a ratio which is equal to 
the product of the ratio of the lengths by the square root 
of the inverse ratio of their heights. 

Draw the planes AB and AC, having different inclinations, 
lengths, and heights. My theorem then is that the ratio of the 
time of descent along AC to that along AB is 
equal to the product of the ratio of AC to AB 
by the square root of the inverse ratio of their 
heights. 

For let AD be a perpendicular to which are 
drawn the horizontal lines BG and CD; also 
let AL be a mean proportional to the heights 
AG and AD; from the point L draw a hori- 
zontal line meeting AC in F; accordingly AF 
will be a mean proportional between AC and 
AE. Now since the time of descent along AC 
is to that along AE as the length AF is to 
Fig. 55 AE; and since the time along AE is to that 

along AB as AE is to AB, it is clear that the time along AC is to 
that along AB as AF is to AB. 

[221] 

Thus it remains to be shown that the ratio of AF to AB is equal 
to the product of the ratio of AC to AB by the ratio of AG to 
AL, which is the inverse ratio of the square roots of the heights 
DA and GA. Now it is evident that, if we consider the line 
AC in connection with AF and AB, the ratio of AF to AC is the 
same as that of AL to AD, or AG to AL which is the square root 
of the ratio of the heights AG and AD; but the ratio of AC to 
AB is the ratio of the lengths themselves. Hence follows the 
theorem. 

THEOREM VI, PROPOSITION VI 

If from the highest or lowest point in a vertical circle there 
be drawn any inclined planes meeting the circumference the 

times 




B 




THIRD DAY 189 

times of descent along these chords are each equal to the 

other. 

On the horizontal line GH construct a vertical circle. From its 
lowest point the point of tangency with the horizontal draw 
the diameter FA and from the highest point, A, draw inclined 
planes to B and C, any points 
whatever on the circumference; 
then the times of descent along 
these are equal. Draw BD and 
CE perpendicular to the diame- 
ter; make AI a mean propor- 
tional between the heights of the 
planes, AE and AD; and since 
the rectangles FAAE and FA. 
AD are respectively equal to the 
squares of AC and AB, while the 
rectangle FA.AE is to the rect- 
angle FAAD as AE is to AD, 
it follows that the square of AC Fi &- 5 6 

is to the square of AB as the length AE is to the length AD. 
But since the length AE is to AD as the square of AI is to the 
square of AD, it follows that the squares on the lines AC and 
AB are to each other as the squares on the lines AI and AD, and 
hence also the length AC is to the length AB as AI is to AD. 
But it has previously been demonstrated that the ratio of the 
time of descent along AC to that along AB is equal to the 
product of the two ratios AC to AB and AD to AI; but this 
last ratio is the same as that of AB to AC. Therefore the ratio of 
the time of descent along AC to that along AB is the product 
of the two ratios, AC to AB and AB to AC. The ratio of these 
times is therefore unity. Hence follows our proposition. 

By use of the principles of mechanics [ex mechanicis] one may 
obtain the same result, namely, that a falling body will require 
equal times to traverse the distances CA and DA, indicated in 
the following figure. Lay off BA equal to DA, and let fall the 

^ [222] 

perpendiculars BE and DF; it follows from the principles of 

mechanics 




190 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

mechanics that the component of the momentum [momentum 
ponderis] acting along the inclined plane ABC is to the total 
momentum [i. e., the momentum of the body falling freely] as 

BE is to BA; in like manner 
the momentum along the 
plane AD is to its total mo- 
mentum [i. e., the momentum 
of the body falling freely] as 
DFistoDA,ortoBA. There- 
fore the momentum of this 
same weight along the plane 
DA is to that along the plane 
ABC as the length DF is to 
the length BE; for this reason, 
this same weight will in equal 
times according to the second 
proposition of the first book, 
traverse spaces along the planes CA and DA which are to each 
other as the lengths BE and DF. But it can be shown that CA 
is to DA as BE is to DF. Hence the falling body will traverse 
the two paths CA and DA in equal times. 

Moreover the fadl that CA is to DA as BE is to DF may be 
demonstrated as follows: Join C and D; through D, draw the 
line DGL parallel to AF and cutting the line AC in I; through 
B draw the line BH, also parallel to AF. Then the angle ADI 
will be equal to the angle DCA, since they subtend equal arcs 
LA and DA, and since the angle DAC is common, the sides of 
the triangles, CAD and DAI, about the common angle will be 
proportional to each other; accordingly as CA is to DA so is 
DA to LA, that is as BA is to IA, or as HA is to GA, that is 
as BE is to DF. E. D. 

The same proposition may be more easily demonstrated as 
follows : On the horizontal line AB draw a circle whose diameter 
DC is vertical. From the upper end of this diameter draw any 
inclined plane, DF, extending to meet the circumference; then, I 
say, a body will occupy the same time in falling along the 
plane DF as along the diameter DC. For draw FG parallel 

to 



THIRD DAY 



191 



to AB and perpendicular to DC; join FC; and since the time of 
fall along DC is to that along DG as the mean proportional 

[223] 

between CD and GD is to GD itself; and since also DF is a 
mean proportional between DC and DG, the angle DFC in- 
scribed in a semicircle being a right- 
angle, and FG being perpendicular 
to DC, it follows that the time of 
fall along DC is to that along DG as 
the length FD is to GD. But it has 
already been demonstrated that thep 
time of descent along DF is to that 
along DG as the length DF is to DG; 
hence the times of descent along DF 
and DC each bear to the time of fall 
along DG the same ratio; conse- 
quently they are equal. 

In like manner it may be shown 
that if one draws the chord CE from 
the lower end of the diameter, also the line EH parallel to the 
horizon, and joins the points E and D, the time of descent along 
EQwill be the same as that along the diameter, DC. 

COROLLARY I 

From this it follows that the times of descent along all chords 
drawn through either C or D are equal one to another. 

COROLLARY II 

It also follows that, if from any one point there be drawn a 
vertical line and an inclined one along which the time of descent 
is the same, the inclined line will be a chord of a semicircle of 
which the vertical line is the diameter. 

COROLLARY III 

Moreover the times of descent along inclined planes will be 
equal when the vertical heights of equal lengths of these planes 

are 




192 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

are to each other as the lengths of the planes themselves; thus it 
is clear that the times of descent along CA and DA, in the 
figure just before the last, are equal, provided the vertical 
height of AB (AB being equal to AD), namely, BE, is to the 
vertical height DF as CA is to DA. 

SAGR. Please allow me to interrupt the ledlure for a moment 
in order that I may clear up an idea which just occurs to me; one 
which, if it involve no fallacy, suggests at least a freakish and 

[224] 

interesting circumstance, such as often occurs in nature and in 
the realm of necessary consequences. 

If, from any point fixed in a horizontal plane, straight lines 
be drawn extending indefinitely in all directions, and if we 
imagine a point to move along each of these lines with constant 
speed, all starting from the fixed point at the same instant and 
moving with equal speeds, then it is clear that all of these mov- 
ing points will lie upon the circumference of a circle which 
grows larger and larger, always having the aforesaid fixed point 
as its center; this circle spreads out in precisely the same manner 
as the little waves do in the case of a pebble allowed to drop 
into quiet water, where the impact of the stone starts the motion 
in all directions, while the point of impact remains the center 
of these ever-expanding circular waves. But imagine a vertical 
plane from the highest point of which are drawn lines inclined 
at every angle and extending indefinitely; imagine also that 
heavy particles descend along these lines each with a naturally 
accelerated motion and each with a speed appropriate to the 
inclination of its line. If these moving particles are always 
visible, what will be the locus of their positions at any instant? 
Now the answer to this question surprises me, for I am led by the 
preceding theorems to believe that these particles will always 
lie upon the circumference of a single circle, ever increasing in 
size as the particles recede farther and farther from the point at 
which their motion began. To be more definite, let A be the 
fixed point from which are drawn the lines AF and AH inclined 
at any angle whatsoever. On the perpendicular AB take any 
two points C and D about which, as centers, circles are described 

passing 



THIRD DAY 



193 




passing through the point A, and cutting the inclined lines 
at the points F, H, B, E, G, I. From the preceding theorems it 
is clear that, if particles start, at the same instant, from A and 
descend along these lines, when one is at E another will be at 
G and another at I ; at a later instant A 

they will be found simultaneously at 
F, H and B; these, and indeed an 
infinite number of other particles 

[225] 

travelling along an infinite number 

of different slopes will at successive 

instants always lie upon a single 

ever-expanding circle. The two kinds 

of motion occurring in nature give 

rise therefore to two infinite series 

of circles, at once resembling and Fig. 59 

differing from each other; the one takes its rise in the center of 

an infinite number of concentric circles; the other has its origin 

in the contact, at their highest points, of an infinite number of 

eccentric circles; the former are produced by motions which are 

equal and uniform; the latter by motions which are neither 

uniform nor equal among themselves, but which vary from one 

to another according to the slope. 

Further, if from the two points chosen as origins of motion, 
we draw lines not only along horizontal and vertical planes 
but in all directions then just as in the former cases, beginning 
at a single point ever-expanding circles are produced, so in the 
latter case an infinite number of spheres are produced about a 
single point, or rather a single sphere which expands in size 
without limit; and this in two ways, one with the origin at the 
center, the other on the surface of the spheres. 

SALV. The idea is really beautiful and worthy of the clever 
mind of Sagredo. 

SIMP. As for me, I understand in a general way how the two 
kinds of natural motions give rise to the circles and spheres; 
and yet as to the production of circles by accelerated motion and 
its proof, I am not entirely clear; but the fact that one can take 

the 



194 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the origin of motion either at the inmost center or at the very top 
of the sphere leads one to think that there may be some great 
mystery hidden in these true and wonderful results, a mystery 
related to the creation of the universe (which is said to be 
spherical in shape), and related also to the seat of the first 
cause \prima causa]. 

SALV. I have no hesitation in agreeing with you. But pro- 
found considerations of this kind belong to a higher science than 
ours [a piu alte dottrine che le nostre]. We must be satisfied to 
belong to that class of less worthy workmen who procure from 
the quarry the marble out of which, later, the gifted sculptor 
produces those masterpieces which lay hidden in this rough and 
shapeless exterior. Now, if you please, let us proceed. 

[226] 
THEOREM VII, PROPOSITION VII 

If the heights of two inclined planes are to each other in the 

same ratio as the squares of their lengths, bodies starting 

from rest will traverse these planes in equal times. 

Take two planes of different lengths and different inclinations, 

AE and AB, whose heights are AF and AD: let AF be to AD as 

A the square of AE is to the square of 
AB; then, I say, that a body, starting 
from rest at A, will traverse the planes 
AE and AB in equal times. From the 
vertical line, draw the horizontal par- 
allel lines EF and DB, the latter cut- 
' ting AE at G. Since FA : DA = EA 2 : 
BA 2 , and since FA:DA=EA:GA, it 
follows that EA:GA = EA 2 :BA 2 . 
Hence BA is a mean proportional be- 
. 60 tween A an j GA. Now since the 

time of descent along AB bears to the time along AG the same 
ratio which AB bears to AG and since also the time of descent 
along AG is to the time along AE as AG is to a mean propor- 
tional between AG and AE, that is, to AB, it follows, ex aquali, 

that 




THIRD DAY 195 

that the time along AB is to the time along AE as AB is to itself. 
Therefore the times are equal. 



Q. E. D. 



THEOREM VIII, PROPOSITION VIII 



The times of descent along all inclined planes which intersedl 
one and the same vertical circle, either at its highest or 
lowest point, are equal to the time of fall along the vertical 
diameter; for those planes which fall short of this diameter 
the times are shorter; for planes which cut this diameter, the 
times are longer. 

Let AB be the vertical diameter of a circle which touches the 
horizontal plane. It has already 
been proven that the times of de- 
scent along planes drawn from 
either end, A or B, to the cir- 
cumference are equal. In order 
to show that the time of descent 

[227] 

along the plane DF which falls 
short of the diameter is shorter 
we may draw the plane DB which 
is both longer and less steeply in- 
clined than DF; whence it follows 
that the time along DF is less than 
that along DB and consequently 
along AB. In like manner, it is shown that the time of de- 
scent along CO which cuts the diameter is greater: for it is both 
longer and less steeply inclined than CB. Hence follows the 
theorem. 

THEOREM IX, PROPOSITION IX 

If from any point on a horizontal line two planes, inclined 
at any angle, are drawn, and if they are cut by a line which 
makes with them angles alternately equal to the angles be- 
tween these planes and the horizontal, then the times re- 
quired to traverse those portions of the plane cut off by 
the aforesaid line are equal. 

Through 





Fig. 62 



196 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

Through the point C on the horizontal line X, draw two 
planes CD and CE inclined at any angle whatever: at any 
point in the line CD lay off the angle CDF equal to the angle 
XCE; let the line DF cut CE at F so that the angles CDF and 
CFD are alternately equal to XCE and LCD; then, I say, the 

times of descent over CD 
and CF are equal. Now 
since the angle CDF is 
equal to the angle XCE by 
construction, it is evident 
that the angle CFD must 
be equal to the angle DCL. 
For if the common angle 
DCF be subtracted from 
the three angles of the tri- 
angle CDF, together equal 
to two right angles, (to which are also equal all the angles which 
can be described about the point C on the lower side of the line 
LX) there remain in the triangle two angles, CDF and CFD, 
equal to the two angles XCE and LCD; but, by hypothesis, the 
angles CDF and XCE are equal; hence the remaining angle CFD 
is equal to the remainder DCL. Take CE equal to CD ; from the 
points D and E draw DA and EB perpendicular to the horizontal 
line XL; and from the point C draw CG perpendicular to DF. 
Now since the angle CDG is equal to the angle ECB and since 
DGC and CBE are right angles, it follows that the triangles CDG 
and CBE are equiangular ; consequently DC :CG = CE :EB . But 
DC is equal to CE, and therefore CG is equal to EB. Since also 
the angles at C and at A, in the triangle DAC, are equal to the 
angles at F and G in the triangle CGF, we have CD:DA = 
FC:CG and, permutando, DC:CF=DA:CG=DA:BE. Thus 
the ratio of the heights of the equal planes CD and CE is 
the same as the ratio of the lengths DC and CF. Therefore, by 

[228] 

Corollary I of Prop. VI, the times of descent along these planes 

will be equal. Q. E. D. 

An alternative proof is the following: Draw FS perpendicular 

to 




THIRD DAY 197 

to the horizontal line AS. Then, since the triangle CSF is 
similar to the triangle DGC, we have SF:FC=GC:CD; and 
since the triangle CFG is similar to the triangle DCA, we 

have FC:CG=CD:DA.L A c 

Hence, ex czquali, SF: 
CG=CG:DA. There- 
fore CG is a mean pro- 
portional between SF 
and DA, while DA :SF= 
DA 2 :CG 2 . Again since 
the triangle ACD is sim- 
ilar to the triangle CGF, 
we have DADC=GC: 
C F and, permutando, 
DA:CG = DC:CF:also Fig. 63 

DA 2 :CG 2 =DC 2 :CF 2 ._J3utjt has been shown that DA 2 :CG 2 = 
DA:SF. Therefore DC 2 :CF 2 =DA:FS. Hence from the above 
Prop. VII, since the heights DA and FS of the planes CD and 
CF are to each other as the squares of the lengths of the planes, 
it follows that the times of descent along these planes will be 
equal. 

THEOREM X, PROPOSITION X 

The times of descent along inclined planes of the same 
height, but of different slope, are to each other as the lengths 
of these planes; and this is true whether the motion starts 
from rest or whether it is preceded by a fall from a 
constant height. 

Let the paths of descent be along ABC and ABD to the horizon- 
tal plane DC so that the falls along BD and BC are preceded by 
the fall along AB; then, I say, that the time of descent along BD 
is to the time of descent along BC as the length BD is to BC. 
Draw the horizontal line AF and extend DB until it cuts this 

[229] 

line at F; let FE be a mean proportional between DF and FB; 
draw EO parallel to DC; then AO will be a mean proportional 
between CA and AB. If now we represent the time of fall along 

AB 



198 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

AB by the length AB, then the time of descent along FB will be 
represented by the distance FB; so also the time of fall through 
the entire distance AC will be represented by the mean pro- 
portional AO: and for the entire distance FD by FE. Hence 
the time of fall along the remainder, BC, will be represented by 
jfL "F BO, and that along the remainder, BD, 

by BE; but since BE:BO=BD:BC, it 
follows, if we allow the bodies to fall 
first along AB and FB, or, what is the 
same thing, along the common stretch 
AB, that the times of descent along BD 
and BC will be to each other as the 
lengths BD and BC. 

But we have previously proven that 
the time of descent, from rest at B, along 
Fig- 64 BD is to the time along BC in the ratio 

which the length BD bears to BC. Hence the times of descent 
along different planes of constant height are to each other as the 
lengths of these planes, whether the motion starts from rest or is 
preceded by a fall from a constant height. Q. E. D. 

THEOREM XI, PROPOSITION XI 

If a plane be divided into any two parts and if motion along 
it starts from rest, then the time of descent along the first 




part is to the time of descent along the remainder 



as the length of this first part is to the excess of a 
mean proportional between this first part and the en- 
tire length over this first part. 

Let the fall take place, from rest at A, through the 
entire distance AB which is divided at any point C; also 
let AF be a mean proportional between the entire length 
BA and the first part AC; then CF will denote the excess 
of the mean proportional FA over the first part AC. Now, 
I say, the time of descent along AC will be to the time of 
subsequent fall through CB as the length AC is to CF. Fig. 65 
This is evident, because the time along AC is to the time along 
the entire distance AB as AC is to the mean proportional AF. 

Therefore, 



A 




THIRD DAY 199 

Therefore, dividendo, the time along AC will be to the time 
along the remainder CB as AC is to CF. If we agree to repre- 
sent the time along AC by the length AC then the time along 
CB will be represented by CF. Q. E. D. 

[230] 

In case the motion is not along the straight line ACB but along 
the broken line ACD to the horizon- 
tal line BD, and if from F we draw 
the horizontal line FE, it may in like 
manner be proved that the time 
along AC is to the time along the in- 
clined line CD as AC is to CE. For 
the time along AC is to the time 
along CB as AC is to CF; but it 
has already been shown that the - 
time along CB, after the fall through 

the distance AC, is to the time along CD, after descent through 
the same distance AC, as CB is to CD, or, as CF is to CE; there- 
fore, ex <zquali, the time along AC will be to the time along CD 
as the length AC is to the length CE. 

THEOREM XII, PROPOSITION XII 

If a vertical plane and any inclined plane are limited by 
two horizontals, and if we take mean proportionals between 
the lengths of these planes and those portions of them 
which lie between their point of intersection and the upper 
horizontal, then the time of fall along the perpendicular 
bears to the time required to traverse the upper part of the 
perpendicular plus the time required to traverse the lower 
part of the intersecting plane the same ratio which the 
entire length of the vertical bears to a length which is the 
sum of the mean proportional on the vertical plus the 
excess of the entire length of the inclined plane over its 
mean proportional. 

Let AF and CD be two horizontal planes limiting the vertical 
plane AC and the inclined plane DF; let the two last-mentioned 
planes intersect at B. Let AR be a mean proportional between 

the 




200 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the entire vertical AC and its upper part AB; and let FS be a 
mean proportional between FD and its upper part FB. Then, 
I say, the time of fall along the entire vertical path AC bears to 
the time of fall along its upper portion AB plus the time of fall 

along the lower part of the inclined 
plane, namely, BD, the same ratio 
which the length AC bears to the 
mean proportional on the vertical, 
namely, AR, plus the length SD which 
is the excess of the entire plane DF 
over its mean proportional FS. 

Join the points R and S giving a 
horizontal line RS. Now since the 
time of fall through the entire dis- 
6? tance AC is to the time along the 

portion AB as CA is to the mean proportional AR it follows 
that, if we agree to represent the time of fall through AC by 
the distance AC, the time of fall through the distance AB will 
be represented by AR; and the time of descent through the re- 
mainder, BC, will be represented by RC. But, if the time along 
AC is taken to be equal to the length AC, then the time along 
FD will be equal to the distance FD ; and we may likewise infer 
that the time of descent along BD, when preceded by a fall along 
FB or AB, is numerically equal to the distance DS. Therefore 

[231] 

the time required to fall along the path AC is equal to AR plus 
RC; while the time of descent along the broken line ABD will be 
equal to AR plus SD. Q. E. D. 

The same thing is true if, in place of a vertical plane, one 
takes any other plane, as for instance NO; the method of proof 
is also the same. 

PROBLEM I, PROPOSITION XIII 

Given a perpendicular line of limited length, it is required 
to find a plane having a vertical height equal to the given 
perpendicular and so inclined that a body, having fallen 
from rest along the perpendicular, will make its descent 

along 



THIRD DAY 



201 



along the inclined plane in the same time which it occu- 
pied in falling through the given perpendicular. 
Let AB denote the given perpendicular: prolong this line to 
C making BC equal to AB, and draw the horizontal lines CE 
and AG. It is required to draw a plane from B to the horizontal 
line CE such that after a body starting from rest at A has 
fallen through the distance AB, it will complete its path along 
this plane in an equal time. - Lay off CD equal to BC, and draw 
the line BD. Construe!: the line BE equal to the sum of BD and 
DC; then, I say, BE is the required plane. Prolong EB till it 
intersects the horizontal AG at G. Let GF be a mean pro- 
portional between GE and GB; 
then EF:FB=EG:GF, and EF 2 : 
FB 2 =EG 2 :GF 2 =EG:GB. But 
EG is twice GB; hence the square 
of EF is twice the square of FB ; 
so also is the square of DB twice 
the square of BC. Consequently 




et permutando, EBJDB + BC= D 
BF:BC. But EB=DB + BC; Fi g- 68 

hence BF =BC=BA. If we agree that the length AB shall rep- 
resent the time of fall along the line AB, then GB will represent 
the time of descent along GB, and GF the time along the entire 
distance GE; therefore BF will represent the time of descent 
along the difference of these paths, namely, BE, after fall from 
G or from A. Q. E. F. 

[232] 
PROBLEM II, PROPOSITION XIV 

Given an inclined plane and a perpendicular passing 
through it, to find a length on the upper part of the per- 
pendicular through which a body will fall from rest in the 
same time which is required to traverse the inclined plane 
after fall through the vertical distance just determined. 
Let AC be the inclined plane and DB the perpendicular. It is 
required to find on the vertical AD a length which will be 

traversed 



202 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

traversed by a body, falling from rest, in the same time which is 
needed by the same body to traverse the plane AC after the 
aforesaid fall. Draw the horizontal CB; lay off AE such that 
BA + 2AC:AC=AC:AE, and lay off AR such that BA:AC= 
EAiAR. From R draw RX perpendicular to DB; then, I say, 
X is the point sought. For since BA + 2AC:AC=AC:AE, it 
follows, dividendo, that BA -f AC:AC=CE:AE. And since 
BA:AC=EA:AR, we have, componendo, BA+AC:AC=ER: 
RA. But BA + AC:AC=CE:AE, hence CE:EA=ER:RA= 
sum of the antecedents: sum of the consequents =CRJRE. 

Thus RE is seen to be a mean propor- 
tional between CR and RA. Moreover 
since it has been assumed that BA: 
.JfcAC=EA:AR, and since by similar tri- 
angles we have BA:AC=XA:AR, it 
follows that EA iAR =XA :AR. Hence 
EA and XA are equal. But if we agree 
that the time of fall through RA shall 
be represented by the length RA, then 
the time of fall along RC will be repre- 
sented by the length RE which is a 




^ mean proportional between RA and RC ; 

Fig- 69 likewise AE will represent the time of 

descent along AC after descent along RA or along AX. But 
the time of fall through XA is represented by the length XA, 
while RA represents the time through RA. But it has been 
shown that XA and AE are equal. Q. E. F. 

PROBLEM III, PROPOSITION XV 

Given a vertical line and a plane inclined to it, it is re- 
quired to find a length on the vertical line below its point 
of intersection which will be traversed in the same time as 
the inclined plane, each of these motions having been pre- 
ceded by a fall through the given vertical line. 
Let AB represent the vertical line and BC the inclined plane; it 
is required to find a length on the perpendicular below its point 
of intersection, which after a fall from A will be traversed in the 

same 



THIRD DAY 



203 



same time which is needed for BC after an identical fall from A. 
Draw the horizontal AD, intersecting the prolongation of CB at 
D; let DE be a mean proportional between CD and DB; lay 

[233] 

off BF equal to BE; also let AG be a third proportional to BA 
and AF. Then, I say, BG is the distance which a body, after 
falling through AB, will traverse in the A D 

same time which is needed for the plane 
BC after the same preliminary fall. 
For if we assume that the time of fall 
along AB is represented by AB, then 
the time for DB will be represented by 
DB. And since DE is a mean propor- 
tional between BD and DC, this same 
DE will represent the time of descent 
along the entire distance DC while BE 
will represent the time required for the 
difference of these paths, namely, BC, 
provided in each case the fall is from 
rest at D or at A. In like manner we 
may infer that BF represents the time Fl S- ? 

of descent through the distance BG after the same preliminary 
fall; but BF is equal to BE. Hence the problem is solved. 

THEOREM XIII, PROPOSITION XVI 

If a limited inclined plane and a limited vertical line are 
drawn from the same point, and if the time required for a 
body, starting from rest, to traverse each of these is the 
same, then a body falling from any higher altitude will trav- 
erse the inclined plane in less time than is required for the 
vertical line. 

Let EB be the vertical line and CE the inclined plane, both 
starting from the common point E, and both traversed in equal 
times by a body starting from rest at E; extend the vertical 
line upwards to any point A, from which falling bodies are 
allowed to start. Then, I say that, after the fall through AE, the 
inclined plane EC will be traversed in less time than the per- 
pendicular 






204 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

pendicular EB. Join CB, draw the horizontal AD, and prolong 
CE backwards until it meets the latter in D; let DF be a mean 
proportional between CD and DE while AG is made a mean 
proportional between BA and AE. Draw FG and DG; then 

[234] 

since the times of descent along EC and EB, starting from rest 
at E, are equal, it follows, according to Corollary II of Proposi- 
tion VI that the angle at C is a 
right angle; but the angle at A 
is also a right angle and the 
angles at the vertex E are 
equal; hence the triangles AED 
and CEB are equiangular and 
the sides about the equal angles 
are proportional; hence BE: 
EC = DE : EA. Consequently 
the rectangle BE.EA is equal 
to the rectangle CE.ED; and 
since the rectangle CD.DE ex- 
ceeds the rectangle CE.ED by 
the square of ED, and since the 
rectangle BA.AE exceeds the 
rectangle BE.EA by the square 
of EA, it follows that the excess 
of the rectangle CD.DE over 
the rectangle BAAE, or what 
is the same thing, the excess of 
the square of FD over the 
Flg - 7I square of AG, will be equal to 

the excess of the square of DE over the square of AE, which ex- 
cess is_equal to the square of AD. Therefore FD 2 =GA 2 + 
AD 2 =GD 2 . Hence DF is equal to DG, and the angle DGF 
is equal to the angle DFG while the angle EGF is less than the 
angle EFG, and the opposite side EF is less than the opposite 
side EG. If now we agree to represent the time of fall through 
AE by the length AE, then the time along DE will be represented 
by DE. And since AG is a mean proportional between BA and 

AE, 




THIRD DAY 205 

AE, it follows that AG will represent the time of fall through the 
total distance AB, and the difference EG will represent the time 
of fall, from rest at A, through the difference of path EB. 

In like manner EF represents the time of descent along EC, 
starting from rest at D or falling from rest at A. But it has been 
shown that EF is less than EG; hence follows the theorem. 

COROLLARY 

From this and the preceding proposition, it is clear that the 
vertical distance covered by a freely falling body, after a pre- 
liminary fall, and during the time-interval required to traverse 
an inclined plane, is greater than the length of the inclined 
plane, but less than the distance traversed on the inclined 
plane during an equal time, without any preliminary fall. For 
since we have just shown that bodies falling from an elevated 
point A will traverse the plane EC in Fig. 71 in a shorter time 
than the vertical EB, it is evident that the distance along EB 
which will be traversed during a time equal to that of descent 
along EC will be less than the whole of EB. But now in order 
to show that this vertical distance is greater than the length of 
the inclined plane EC, we reproduce 
Fig. 70 of the preceding theorem in 
which the vertical length BG is trav- 
ersed in the same time as BC after a 
preliminary fall through AB. That 
BG is greater than BC is shown as 
follows: since BE and FB are equal 

[235] 

while BA is less than BD, it follows 
that FB will bear to BA a greater ratio 
than EB bears to BD; and, compon- 
endo, FA will bear to BA a greater 
ratio than ED to DB; but FA 'AB = Or 

GF:FB (since AF is a mean propor- Fig. 72 

tional between BA and AG) and in like manner ED:BD = CE: 
EB. Hence GB bears to BF a greater ratio than CB bears to 
BE; therefore GB is greater than BC. 




B 



206 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

PROBLEM IV, PROPOSITION XVII 

Given a vertical line and an inclined plane, it is required 
to lay off a distance along the given plane which will be trav- 
ersed by a body, after fall along the perpendicular, in the 
same time-interval which is needed for this body to fall 
from rest through the given perpendicular. 
Let AB be the vertical line and BE the inclined plane. The 
problem is to determine on BE a distance such that a body, 
A. p after falling through AB, will traverse it 
in a time equal to that required to traverse 
the perpendicular AB itself, starting from 
rest. 

Draw the horizontal AD and extend the 
plane until it meets this line in D. Lay 
off FB equal to BA; and choose the point 
E such that BD:FD=DF:DE. Then, I 
say, the time of descent along BE, after 
fall through AB, is equal to the time of fall, 
Fig. 73 from rest at A, through AB. For, if we 

assume that the length AB represents the time of fall through 
AB, then the time of fall through DB will be represented by the 
time DB; and since BD:FD =DF:DE, it follows that DF will 
represent the time of descent along the entire plane DE while 
BF represents the time through the portion BE starting from 
rest at D; but the time of descent along BE after the prelimi- 
nary descent along DB is the same as that after a preliminary 
fall through AB. Hence the time of descent along BE after AB 
will be BF which of course is equal to the time of fall through 
AB from rest at A/ Q. E. F. 

[236] 

PROBLEM V, PROPOSITION XVIII 

Given the distance through which a body will fall vertically 
from rest during a given time-interval, and given also a 
smaller time-interval, it is required to locate another [equal] 

vertical 




THIRD DAY 



207 




vertical distance which the body will traverse during this 

given smaller time-interval. 

Let the vertical line be drawn through A, and on this line lay 
off the distance AB which is traversed by a body falling from 
rest at A, during a time which may also be 
represented by AB. Draw the horizontal 
line CBE, and on it lay off BC to represent 
the given interval of time which is shorter 
than AB. It is required to locate, in the 
perpendicular above mentioned, a distance 
which is equal to AB and which will be de- 
scribed in a time equal to BC. Join the points 
A and C; then, since BC<BA, it follows that 
the angle BAC<angle BCA. Construct the 
angle CAE equal to BCA and let E be the 
point where AE intersects the horizontal line; 
draw ED at right angles to AE, cutting the 
vertical at D ; lay off DF equal to BA. Then, 
I say, that FD is that portion of the vertical 



Fig. 74 



which a body starting from rest at A will traverse during the as- 
signed time-interval BC. For, if in the right-angled triangle 
AED a perpendicular be drawn from the right-angle at E to the 
opposite side AD, then AE will be a mean proportional between 
DA and AB while BE will be a mean proportional between BD 
and BA, or between FA and AB (seeing that FA is equal to 
DB) ; and since it has been agreed to represent the time of fall 
through AB by the distance AB, it follows that AE, or EC, will 
represent the time of fall through the entire distance AD, while 
EB will represent the time through AF. Consequently the re- 
mainder BC will represent the time of fall through the remain- 
ing distance FD. Q. E. F. 

[237] 
PROBLEM VI, PROPOSITION XIX 

Given the distance through which a body falls in a vertical 
line from rest and given also the time of fall, it is required 
to find the time in which the same body will, later, traverse 

an 



208 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

an equal distance chosen anywhere in the same vertical 

line. 

On the vertical line AB, lay off AC equal to the distance fallen 
from rest at A, also locate at random an equal distance DB. 

Let the time of fall through AC be 
represented by the length AC. It is 
required to find the time necessary 
to traverse DB after fall from rest 
at A. About the entire length AB 
describe the semicircle AEB; from 
C draw CE perpendicular to AB; 
join the points A and E; the line 
AE will be longer than EC; lay off 
EF equal to EC. Then, I say, the 
difference FA will represent the time 
required for fall through DB. For 
since AE is a mean proportional be- 
tween BA and AC and since AC rep- 
resents the time of fall through AC, 
it follows that AE will represent 
the time through the entire distance 
AB. And since CE is a mean pro- 
portional between DA and AC (see- 
ing that DA=BC) it follows that 
CE, that is, EF, will represent the 
Hence the difference AF will represent 

Q. E. D. 




Fig. 75 

time of fall through AD. 
the time of fall through the difference DB. 



COROLLARY 

Hence it is inferred that if the time of fall from rest through 
any given distance is represented by that distance itself, then 
the time of fall, after the given distance has been increased by a 
certain amount, will be represented by the excess of the mean 
proportional between the increased distance and the original 
distance over the mean proportional between the original dis- 
tance and the increment. Thus, for instance, if we agree that 

AB 



THIRD DAY 209 

AB represents the time of fall, from rest at A, through the dis- 
tance AB, and that AS is the increment, the time required to 
traverse AB, after fall through SA, will be the excess of the 
mean proportional between SB and BA over the mean 
proportional between BA and AS. 

[238] 
PROBLEM VII, PROPOSITION XX 

Given any distance whatever and a portion of it laid 
off from the point at which motion begins, it is re- 
quired to find another portion which lies at the other 
end of the distance and which is traversed in the same 
time as the first given portion. Fig. 76 

Let the given distance be CB and let CD be that part of it 
! which is laid off from the beginning of motion. It is 
required to find another part, at the end B, which is 
traversed in the same time as the assigned portion 
CD. Let BA be a mean proportional between BC 
and CD; also let CE be a third proportional to BC 
and CA. Then, I say, EB will be the distance which, 
B after fall from C, will be traversed in the same time 
as CD itself. For if we agree that CB shall repre- 
sent the time through the entire distance CB, then BA 
A (which, of course, is a mean proportional between BC 
and CD) will represent the time along CD; and since 
CA is a mean proportional between BC and CE, it fol- 
lows that CA will be the time through CE; but the 
total length CB represents the time through the total 
B distance CB. Therefore the difference BA will be the 
Fig- 77 time along the difference of distances, EB, after falling 
from C; but this same BA was the time of fall through CD. 
Consequently the distances CD and EB are traversed, from rest 
at A, in equal times. Q. E. F. 

THEOREM XIV, PROPOSITION XXI 

If, on the path of a body falling vertically from rest, one 
lays off a portion which is traversed in any time you please 

and 



210 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

and whose upper terminus coincides with the point where 
the motion begins, and if this fall is followed by a motion 
defledled along any inclined plane, then the space traversed 
along the inclined plane, during a time-interval equal to that 
occupied in the previous vertical fall, will be greater than 
twice, and less than three times, the length of the vertical 
fall. 

Let AB be a vertical line drawn downwards from the horizon- 
tal line AE, and let it represent the path of a body falling from 
rest at A; choose any portion AC of this path. Through C 
draw any inclined plane, CG, along which the motion is con- 
tinued after fall through AC. Then, I say, that the distance 

[239] 

traversed along this plane CG, during the time-interval equal 
to that of the fall through AC, is more than twice, but less 
A F than three times, this same 

distance AC. Let us lay off 
CF equal to AC, and ex- 
tend the plane GC until it 
meets the horizontal in E; 
choose G such that CE: 
EF=EF:EG. If now we 
assume that the time of 
fall along AC is represented 
by the length AC, then CE 
will represent the time of 
descent along CE, while 
CF, or CA, will represent 
the time of descent along 





lg ' 



CG. It now remains to be shown that the distance CG is more 
than twice, and less than three times, the distance CA itself. 
Since CE:EF=EF:EG, it follows that CE:EF=CF:FG; but 
EC<EF; therefore CF will be less than FG and GC will be 
more than twice FC, or AC. Again since FE<2EC (for EC is 
greater than CA, or CF), we have GF less than twice FC, and 
also GC less than three times CF, or CA. Q. E. D. 

This proposition may be stated in a more general form; since 

what 



THIRD DAY 211 

what has been proven for the case of a vertical and inclined 
plane holds equally well in the case of motion along a plane of 
any inclination followed by motion along any plane of less 
steepness, as can be seen from the adjoining figure. The method 
of proof is the same. 

[240] 
PROBLEM VIII, PROPOSITION XXII 

Given two unequal time-intervals, also the distance through 
which a body will fall along a vertical line, from rest, during 
the shorter of these intervals, it is required to pass through 
the highest point of this vertical line a plane so inclined 
that the time of descent along it will be equal to the longer 
of the given intervals. 

Let A represent the longer and B the shorter of the two un- 
equal time-intervals, also let CD represent the length of the 




Fig. 79 

vertical fall, from rest, during the time B. It is required to pass 
through the point C a plane of such a slope that it will be trav- 
ersed in the time A. 

Draw from the point C to the horizontal a line CX of such a 
length that B:A=CD:CX. It is clear that CX is the plane 
along which a body will descend in the given time A. For it 
has been shown that the time of descent along an inclined plane 
bears to the time of fall through its vertical height the same 
ratio which the length of the plane bears to its vertical height. 
Therefore the time along CX is to the time along CD as the 
length CX is to the length CD, that is, as the time-interval A is 

to 



212 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

to the time-interval B : but B is the time required to traverse the 
vertical distance, CD, starting from rest; therefore A is the time 
required for descent along the plane CX. 

PROBLEM IX, PROPOSITION XXIII 

Given the time employed by a body in falling through a cer- 
tain distance along a vertical line, it is required to pass 
through the lower terminus of this vertical fall, a plane so 
inclined that this body will, after its vertical fall, traverse 
on this plane, during a time-interval equal to that of the 
vertical fall, a distance equal to any assigned distance, pro- 




vided this assigned distance is more than twice and less than 
three times, the vertical fall. 

Let AS be any vertical line, and let AC denote both the 
length of the vertical fall, from rest at A, and also the time 
T K N ft required for this fall. Let 

IR be a distance more than 
twice and less than three 
times, AC. It is required 
to pass a plane through the 
point C so inclined that a 
body, after fall through AC, 
will, during the time AC, 
traverse a distance equal to 
S IR. Lay off RN and NM 

Fig. 80 each equal to AC. Through 

the point C, draw a plane CE meeting the horizontal, AE, at such 
a point that IMMN=AC:CE. Extend the plane to O, and 
lay off CF, FG and GO equal to RN, NM, and MI respectively. 
Then, I say, the time along the inclined plane CO, after fall 
through AC, is equal to the time of fall, from rest at A, through 
AC. For since OG:GF=FC:CE, it follows, componendo, 
that OF:FG=OF:FC=FE:EC, and since an antecedent is 
to its consequent as the sum of the antecedents is to the sum of 
the consequents, we have OE:EF=EF:EC. Thus EF is a 
mean proportional between OE and EC. Having agreed to 

represent 



THIRD DAY 213 

represent the time of fall through AC by the length AC it follows 
that EC will represent the time along EC, and EF the time along 
the entire distance EO, while the difference CF will represent the 
time along the difference CO; but CF=CA; therefore the 
problem is solved. For the time CA is the time of fall, from rest 
at A, through CA while CF (which is equal to CA) is the time 
required to traverse CO after descent along EC or after fall 
through AC. Q. E. F. 

It is to be remarked also that the same solution holds if the 
antecedent motion takes place, not along a vertical, but along an 
inclined plane. This case is illustrated in the following figure 
where the antecedent motion is along the inclined plane AS 

[242] 

underneath the horizontal AE. The proof is identical with the 
preceding. 

SCHOLIUM 

On careful attention, it will be clear that, the nearer the given 
line IR approaches to three times the length AC, the nearer the 

I M N K 




E 




inclined plane, CO, along which the second motion takes 
place, approaches the perpendicular along which the space 
traversed, during the time AC, will be three times the distance 
AC. For if IR be taken nearly equal to three times AC, then 
IM will be almost equal to MN; and since, by construction, 

IM: 



214 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

IMMN =AC:CE, it follows that CE is but little greater than 
CA : consequently the point E will lie near the point A, and the 
lines CO and CS, forming a very acute angle, will almost coin- 
cide. But, on the other hand, if the given line, IR, be only the 
least bit longer than twice AC, the line IM will be very short; 
from which it follows that AC will be very small in comparison 
with CE which is now so long that it almost coincides with the 
horizontal line drawn through C. Hence we can infer that, if, 
after descent along the inclined plane AC of the adjoining figure, 
the motion is continued along a horizontal line, such as CT, the 
distance traversed by a body, during a time equal to the time 
of fall through AC, will be exactly twice the distance AC. The 
argument here employed is the same as the preceding. For it is 
clear, since OE:EF=EF:EC, that FC measures the time of 
descent along CO. But, if the horizontal line TC which is twice 
as long as CA, be divided into two equal parts at V then this 
line must be extended indefinitely in the direction of X before 
it will intersect the line AE produced; and accordingly the 
ratio of the infinite length TX to the infinite length VX is the 
same as the ratio of the infinite distance VX to the infinite 
distance CX. 

The same result may be obtained by another method of ap- 
proach, namely, by returning to the same line of argument which 
was employed in the proof of the first proposition. Let us 

[243] 

consider the triangle ABC, which, by lines drawn parallel to its 
base, represents for us a velocity increasing in proportion to the 
time; if these lines are infinite in number, just as the points in 
the line AC are infinite or as the number of instants in any 
interval of time is infinite, they will form the area of the triangle. 
Let us now suppose that the maximum velocity attained that 
represented by the line BC to be continued, without accelera- 
tion and at constant value through another interval of time equal 
to the first. From these velocities will be built up, in a similar 
manner, the area of the parallelogram ADBC, which is twice 
that of the triangle ABC; accordingly the distance traversed 
with these velocities during any given interval of time will be 

twice 



THIRD DAY 215 

twice that traversed with the velocities represented by the 
triangle during an equal interval of time. But along a horizontal 
plane the motion is uniform since here it experiences neither 
acceleration nor retardation; therefore we con-j> 
elude that the distance CD traversed during a time- 
interval equal to AC is twice the distance AC; 
for the latter is covered by a motion, starting 
from rest and increasing in speed in proportion 4- 
to the parallel lines in the triangle, while the -4- 
former is traversed by a motion represented by *f- 
the parallel lines of the parallelogram which, 
being also infinite in number, yield an area twice 
that of the triangle. Fig. 82 

Furthermore we may remark that any velocity once imparted 
to a moving body will be rigidly maintained as long as the 
external causes of acceleration or retardation are removed, a 
condition which is found only on horizontal planes; for in the 
case of planes which slope downwards there is already present a 
cause of acceleration, while on planes sloping upward there is 
retardation; from this it follows that motion along a horizontal 
plane is perpetual; for, if the velocity be uniform, it cannot be 
diminished or slackened, much less destroyed. Further, al- 
though any velocity which a body may have acquired through 
natural fall is permanently maintained so far as its own nature 
[suapte natura] is concerned, yet it must be remembered that if, 
after descent along a plane inclined downwards, the body is 
deflected to a plane inclined upward, there is already existing in 
this latter plane a cause of retardation; for in any such plane 
this same body is subject to a natural acceleration downwards. 
Accordingly we have here the superposition of two different 
states, namely, the velocity acquired during the preceding fall 
which if acting alone would carry the body at a uniform rate to 
infinity, and the velocity which results from a natural accelera- 
tion downwards common to all bodies. It seems altogether 
reasonable, therefore, if we wish to trace the future history of a 
body which has descended along some inclined plane and has 
been deflected along some plane inclined upwards, for us to 

assume 



216 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

assume that the maximum speed acquired during descent is 
permanently maintained during the ascent. In the ascent, 
however, there supervenes a natural inclination downwards, 
namely, a motion which, starting from rest, is accelerated at the 

[244] 

usual rate. If perhaps this discussion is a little obscure, the 
following figure will help to make it clearer. 

Let us suppose that the descent has been made along the 
downward sloping plane AB, from which the body is deflecled 
so as to continue its motion along the upward sloping plane 
BC; and first let these planes be of equal length and placed so as 
to make equal angles with the horizontal line GH. Now it is 
well known that a body, starting from rest at A, and descending 
along AB, acquires a speed which is proportional to the time, 

j^ which is a maximum 
-at B, and which is 
maintained by the 
body so long as all 
causes of fresh ac- 
celeration or retarda- 
tion are removed; 

Fi - 8 3 the acceleration to 

which I refer is that to which the body would be subject 
if its motion were continued along the plane AB extended, 
while the retardation is that which the body would encounter 
if its motion were deflected along the plane BC inclined up- 
wards; but, upon the horizontal plane GH, the body would 
maintain a uniform velocity equal to that which it had ac- 
quired at B after fall from A; moreover this velocity is such 
that, during an interval of time equal to the time of descent 
through AB, the body will traverse a horizontal distance equal 
to twice AB. Now let us imagine this same body to move with 
the same uniform speed along the plane BC so that here also 
during a time-interval equal to that of descent along AB, it will 
traverse along BC extended a distance twice AB; but let us 
suppose that, at the very instant the body begins its ascent it is 
subjected, by its very nature, to the same influences which 

surrounded 




THIRD DAY 217 

surrounded it during its descent from A along AB, namely, it 
descends from rest under the same acceleration as that which was 
effective in AB, and it traverses, during an equal interval of 
time, the same distance along this second plane as it did along 
AB ; it is clear that, by thus superposing upon the body a uniform 
motion of ascent and an accelerated motion of descent, it will be 
carried along the plane BC as far as the point C where these two 
velocities become equal. 

If now we assume any two points D and E, equally distant 
from the vertex B, we may then infer that the descent along 
BD takes place in the same time as the ascent along BE. Draw 
DF parallel to BC; we know that, after descent along AD, the 
body will ascend along DF; or, if, on reaching D, the body is 
carried along the horizontal DE, it will reach E with the same 
momentum [impetus] with which it left D; hence from E the 
body will ascend as far as C, proving that the velocity at E is 
the same as that at D. 

From this we may logically infer that a body which descends 

[245] 

along any inclined plane and continues its motion along a plane 
inclined upwards will, on account of the momentum acquired, 
ascend to an -equal height above the horizontal; so that if the 
descent is along 1% rf x e 

AB the body will 

be carried up the 
plane BC as far as 
the horizontal line 
ACD: and this is 
true whether the B 

inclinations of the "* 8 4 

planes are the same or different, as in the case of the planes 
AB and BD. But by a previous postulate [p. 184] the speeds 
acquired by fall along variously inclined planes having the 
same vertical height are the same. If therefore the planes 
EB and BD have the same slope, the descent along EB will 
be able to drive the body along BD as far as D; and since 
this propulsion comes from the speed acquired on reaching 

the 








218 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the point B, it follows that this speed at B is the same whether 
the body has made its descent along AB or EB. Evidently then 
the body will be carried up BD whether the descent has been 
made along AB or along EB. The time of ascent along BD is 
however greater than that along BC, just as the descent along 
EB occupies more time than that along AB; moreover it has 
been demonstrated that the ratio between the lengths of these 
times is the same as that between the lengths of the planes. We 
must next discover what ratio exists between the distances 
traversed in equal times along planes of different slope, but of 
the same elevation, that is, along planes which are included 
between the same parallel horizontal lines. This is done as 
follows: 

THEOREM XV, PROPOSITION XXIV 

Given two parallel horizontal planes and a vertical line con- 
necting them; given also an inclined plane passing through 
the lower extremity of this vertical line; then, if a body fall 
freely along the vertical line and have its motion reflected 
along the inclined plane, the distance which it will traverse 
along this plane, during a time equal to that of the verti- 
cal fall, is greater than once but less than twice the vertical 
line. 

Let BC and HG be the two horizontal planes, connected by 
the perpendicular AE; also let EB represent the inclined plane 

E AC 




H EG 

Fig. 85 

along which the motion takes place after the body has fallen 
along AE and has been reflected from E towards B. Then, I 
say, that, during a time equal to that of fall along AE, the body 
will ascend the inclined plane through a distance which is 

greater 






THIRD DAY 219 

greater than AE but less than twice AE. Lay off ED equal to 
AE and choose F so that EB:BD=BD:BF. First we shall 

[246] 

show that F is the point to which the moving body will be 
carried after reflection from E towards B during a time equal to 
that of fall along AE; and next we shall show that the distance 
EF is greater than EA but less than twice that quantity. 

Let us agree to represent the time of fall along AE by the 
length AE, then the time of descent along BE, or what is the 
same thing, ascent along EB will be represented by the distance 
EB. 

Now, since DB is a mean proportional between EB and BF, 
and since BE is the time of descent for the entire distance BE, 
it follows that BD will be the time of descent through BF, while 
the remainder DE will be the time of descent along the remainder 
FE. But the time of descent along the fall from rest at B is the 
same as the time of ascent from E to F after reflection from E 
with the speed acquired during fall either through AE or BE. 
Therefore DE represents the time occupied by the body in 
passing from E to F, after fall from A to E and after reflection 
along EB. But by construction ED is equal to AE. This 
concludes the first part of our demonstration. 

Now since the whole of EB is to the whole of BD as the 
portion DB is to the portion BF, we have the whole of EB is 
to the whole of BD as the remainder ED is to the remainder 
DF; but EB>BD and hence ED>DF, and EF is less than 
twice DE or AE. Q. E. D. 

The same is true when the initial motion occurs, not along a 
perpendicular, but upon an inclined plane: the proof is also the 
same provided the upward sloping plane is less steep, i. e., longer, 
than the downward sloping plane. 

THEOREM XVI, PROPOSITION XXV 

If descent along any inclined plane is followed by motion 
along a horizontal plane, the time of descent along the in- 
clined plane bears to the time required to traverse any as- 
signed length of the horizontal plane the same ratio which 

twice 




220 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

twice the length of the inclined plane bears to the given 
horizontal length. 

Let CB be any horizontal line and AB an inclined plane; after 
descent along AB let the motion continue through the assigned 

horizontal distance BD. Then, 
I say, the time of descent along 
AB bears to the time spent in 
traversing BD the same ratio 
which twice AB bears to BD. 
Fig- 86 For, lay off BC equal to twice 

AB then it follows, from a previous proposition, that the time of 
descent along AB is equal to the time required to traverse BC; 
but the time along BC is to the time along DB as the length 
CB is to the length BD. Hence the time of descent along AB 

[247] 

is to the time along BD as twice the distance AB is to the dis- 
tance BD. Q. E. D. 

PROBLEM X, PROPOSITION XXVI 

Given a vertical height joining two horizontal parallel lines; 
given also a distance greater than once and less than twice 
this vertical height, it is required to pass through the foot 
of the given perpendicular an inclined plane such that, after 
fall through the given vertical height, a body whose mo- 
tion is deflected along the plane will traverse the assigned 
distance in a time equal to the time of vertical fall. 
Let AB be the vertical distance separating two parallel 
horizontal lines AO and BC; also let FE be greater than once and 
less than twice BA. The problem is to pass a plane through B, 
extending to the upper horizontal line, and such that a body, 
after having fallen from A to B, will, if its motion be deflected 
along the inclined plane, traverse a distance equal to EF in a 
time equal to that of fall along AB. Lay off ED equal to AB; 
then the remainder DF will be less than AB since the entire 
length EF is less than twice this quantity; also lay off DI equal 
to DF, and choose the point X such that EI:ID=DF:FX; 
from B, draw the plane BO equal in length to EX. Then, I say, 

that 



THIRD DAY 221 

that the plane BO is the one along which, after fall through AB, 
a body will traverse the assigned distance FE in a time equal to 
the time of fall through AB. Lay off BR and RS equal to ED 
and DF respectively; then since EI:ID=DFiFX, we have, 
component, ED:DI =DX:XF=ED:DF=EX:XD =BOOR = 

O A 



X F D IE 

Fig. 87 

ROrOS. If we represent the time of fall along AB by the 
length AB, then OB will represent the time of descent along 

[248] ^ 

OB, and RO will stand for the time along OS, while the re- 
mainder BR will represent the time required for a body starting 
from rest at O to traverse the remaining distance SB. But the 
time of descent along SB starting from rest at O is equal to the 
time of ascent from B to S after fall through AB. Hence BO is 
that plane, passing through B, along which a body, after fall 
through AB, will traverse the distance BS, equal to the assigned 
distance EF, in the time-interval BR or BA. Q. E. F. 

THEOREM XVII, PROPOSITION XXVII 

If a body descends along two inclined planes of different 
lengths but of the same vertical height, the distance which 
it will traverse, in the lower part of the longer plane, during 
a time-interval equal to that of descent over the shorter 
plane, is equal to the length of the shorter plane plus a 
portion of it to which the shorter plane bears the same 
ratio which the longer plane bears to the excess of the 
longer over the shorter plane. 

Let AC be the longer plane, AB, the shorter, and AD the 
common elevation; on the lower part of AC lay off CE equal 

to 



222 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

to AB. Choose F such that CA:AE=CA:CA-AB =CE:EF. 
Then, I say, that FC is that distance which will, after fall from 
A, be traversed during a time-interval equal to that required for 

descent along AB. For since 
CA:AE=CE:EF, it follows 
that the remainder EA: the 
remainder AF = CA : AE. 
Therefore AE is a mean pro- 
portional between AC and 
AF. Accordingly if the length 
DAB is employed to measure 




Fig- 88 the time of fall along AB, then 

the distance AC will measure the time of descent through AC; 
but the time of descent through AF is measured by the length 
AE, and that through FC by EC. Now EC =AB; and hence 
follows the proposition. 

[249] 
PROBLEM XI, PROPOSITION XXVIII 

Let AG be any horizontal line touching a circle; let AB be the 
diameter passing through the point of contact; and let AE and 
EB represent any two chords. The problem is to determine 
what ratio the time of fall through A G 

AB bears to the time of descent 
over both AE and EB. Extend BE 
till it meets the tangent at G, and 
draw AF so as to bisect the angle 
BAE. Then, I say, the time through 
AB is to the sum of the times along 
AE and EB as the length AE is to 
the sum of the lengths AE and EF. 
For since the angle FAB is equal 
to the angle FAE, while the angle 
EAG is equal to the angle ABF it 
follows that the entire angle GAF is equal to the sum of the angles 
FAB and ABF. But the angle GFA is also equal to the sum of 
these two angles. Hence the length GF is equal to the length 

GA 







THIRD DAY 223 

GA; and since the rectangle BG.GE is equal to the square of 
GA, it will also be equal to the square of GF, or BG:GF = 
GFiGE. If now we agree to represent the time of descent 
alpng AE by the length AE, then the length GE will represent 
the time of descent along GE, while GF will stand for the time 
of descent through the entire distance GB; so also EF will 
denote the time through EB after fall from G or from A along 
AE. Consequently the time along AE, or AB, is to the time 
along AE and EB as the length AE is to AE-f EF. Q. E. D. 

A shorter method is to lay off GF equal to GA, thus making 
GF a mean proportional between BG and GE. The rest of 
the proof is as above. 

THEOREM XVIII, PROPOSITION XXIX 

Given a limited horizontal line, at one end of which is 
erected a limited vertical line whose length is equal to one- 
half the given horizontal line; then a body, falling through 
this given height and having its motion deflected into a 
horizontal direction, will traverse the given horizontal dis- 
tance and vertical line 



in less time than it O 

will any other verti- - -A 

cal distance plus the 
given horizontal dis- 



tance. 



[250] 



N 



B 



Let BC be the given dis- * c 
tance in a horizontal 
plane; at the end B erect ___*___ J _______ 

a perpendicular, on which ~~*C ( D " 

lay off BA equal to half Fig. 90 

BC. Then, I say, that the time required for a body, starting 

from rest at A, to traverse the two distances, AB and BC, is 

the least of all possible times in which this same distance BC 

together with a vertical portion, whether greater or less than 

AB, can be traversed. 

Lay off EB greater than AB, as in the first figure, and less 

than 



224 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

than AB, as in the second. It must be shown that the time 
required to traverse the distance EB plus BC is greater than 
that required for AB plus BC. Let us agree that the length 
AB shall represent the time along AB, then the time occupied in 
traversing the horizontal portion BC will also be AB, seeing 
that BC=2AB; consequently the time required for both AB 
and BC will be twice AB. Choose the point O such that EB: 
BO=BO:BA, then BO will represent the time of fall through 
EB. Again lay off the horizontal distance BD equal to twice 
BE; whence it is plear that BO represents the time along BD 
after fall through EB. Seledt a point N such that DB:BC = 
EB:BA=OB:BN. Now since the horizontal motion is uni- 
form and since OB is the time occupied in traversing BD, after 
fall from E, it follows that NB will be the time along BC after 
fall through the same height EB. Hence it is clear that OB plus 
BN represents the time of traversing EB plus BC; and, since 
twice BA is the time along AB plus BC, it remains to be shown 
thatOB+BN>2BA. 

_But since EB:BO=BO:BA, it follows that EB:BA=OB 2 : 
BA 2 ._Moreover since EB :BA =OB :BN it follows that OB :BN = 
OB 2 :BA 2 . But OB:BN = (OB:BA)(BA:BN), and therefore 
AB:BN=OB:BA, that is, BA is a mean proportional between 
BO and BN. Consequently OB+BN>2BA. Q. E. D. 

[251] 
THEOREM XIX, PROPOSITION XXX 

A perpendicular is let fall from any point in a horizontal 
line; it is required to pass through any other point in this 
same horizontal line a plane which shall cut the perpendicu- 
lar and along which a body will descend to the perpendicular 
in the shortest possible time. Such a plane will cut from the 
perpendicular a portion equal to the distance of the as- 
sumed point in the horizontal from the upper end of the 
perpendicular. 

Let AC be any horizontal line and B any point in it from which 
is dropped the vertical line BD. Choose any point C in the 
horizontal line and lay off, on the vertical, the distance BE 

equal 



THIRD DAY 225 

equal to BC; join C and E. Then, I say, that of all inclined 
planes that can be passed through C, cutting the perpendicular, 
CE is that one along which the descent to the perpendicular is 
accomplished in the shortest time. For, draw the plane CF 
cutting the vertical above E, and 
the plane CG cutting the vertical 
below E; and draw IK, a parallel 
vertical line, touching at C a cir- 
cle described with BC as radius. 
Let EK be drawn parallel to CF, 
and extended to meet the tan- 
gent, after cutting the circle at L. 
Now it is clear that the time of 
fall along LE is equal to the time 
along CE; but the time along 
KE is greater than along LE; 
therefore the time along KE is 
greater than along CE. But the 
time along KE is equal to the 
time along CF, since they have 
the same length and the same 
slope; and, in like manner, it fol- 
lows that the planes CG and IE, 
having the same length and the 
same slope, will be traversed in equal times. Also, since HE< 
IE, the time along HE will be less than the time along IE. 
Therefore also the time along CE (equal to the time along HE), 
will be shorter than the time along IE. Q. E. D. 

THEOREM XX, PROPOSITION XXXI 

If a straight line is inclined at any angle to the horizontal 
and if, from any assigned point in the horizontal, a plane of 
quickest descent is to be drawn to the inclined line, that 
plane will be the one which bisects the angle contained 

[252] 

between two lines drawn from the given point, one per- 
pendicular 




226 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

pendicular to the horizontal line, the other perpendicular 
to the inclined line. 

Let CD be a line inclined at any angle to the horizontal AB; 
and from any assigned point A in the horizontal draw AC per- 
pendicular to AB, and AE perpendicular to CD; draw FA so 
as to bisect the angle CAE. Then, I say, that of all the planes 
which can be drawn through the point A, cutting the line CD 

at any points whatsoever 
AF is the one of quickest 
descent [in quo tempore 
omnium brevissimo fiat de- 
scensus]. Draw FG par- 
allel to AE; the alternate 
angles GFA and FAE will 
be equal; also the angle 
EAF is equal to the angle 
FAG. Therefore the sides 
GF and GA of the triangle 
FGA are equal. Accord- 
ingly if we describe a circle 
about G as center, with GA 
as radius, this circle will 




pass through the point F, 



p. 

and will touch the horizontal at the point A and the inclined 
line at F; for GFC is a right angle, since GF and AE are parallel. 
It is clear therefore that all lines drawn from A to the inclined 
line, with the single exception of FA, will extend beyond the 
circumference of the circle, thus requiring more time to traverse 
any of them than is needed for FA. Q. E. D. 

LEMMA 

If two circles one lying within the other are in contact, 
and if any straight line be drawn tangent to the inner 
circle, cutting the outer circle, and if three lines be drawn 
from the point at which the circles are in contact to three 
points on the tangential straight line, namely, the point of 
tangency on the inner circle and the two points where the 

straight 



THIRD DAY 



227 



straight line extended cuts the outer circle, then these three 
lines will contain equal angles at the point of contact. 
Let the two circles touch each other at the point A, the center 
of the smaller being at B, the center of the larger at C. Draw 

[253] 
the straight line FG touching the inner circle at H, and cutting 

the outer at the points F and G; also draw the three lines AF, 
AH, and AG. Then, I say, the angles contained by these lines, 
FAH and GAH, are equal. Pro- 
long AH to the circumference at 
I; from the centers of the circles, 
draw BH and CI; join the centers 
B and C and extend the line until 
it reaches the point of contact at 
A and cuts the circles at the 
points O and N. But now the 
lines BH and CI are parallel, be- 
cause the angles ICN and HBO 
are equal, each being twice the 
angle IAN. And since BH, drawn 
from the center to the point of 
contact is perpendicular to FG, it follows that CI will also be 
perpendicular to FG and that the arc FI is equal to the arc IG; 
consequently the angle FAI is equal to the angle IAG. Q. E. D. 

THEOREM XXI, PROPOSITION XXXII 

If in a horizontal line any two points are chosen and if 
through one of these points a line be drawn inclined towards 
the other, and if from this other point a straight line is 
drawn to the inclined line in such a direction that it cuts 
off from the inclined line a portion equal to the distance 
between the two chosen points on the horizontal line, then 
the time of descent along the line so drawn is less than along 
any other straight line drawn from the same point to the 
same inclined line. Along other lines which make equal 
angles on opposite sides of this line, the times of descent are 
the same. 

Let 




Fig. 93 



228 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

Let A and B be any two points on a horizontal line: through 
B draw an inclined straight line BC, and from B lay off a dis- 
tance BD equal to BA; join the points A and D. Then, I say, 
the time of descent along AD is less than along any other line 
drawn from A to the inclined line BC. From the point A draw 
AE perpendicular to BA; and from the point D draw DE per- 
pendicular to BD, intersecting AE at E. Since in the isosceles 
U j^ triangle ABD, we have the 

angles BAD and BDA equal, 

[254] 

their complements DAE and 
EDA are equal. Hence if, 
with E as center and EA as 
radius, we describe a circle it 
will pass through D and will 
touch the lines BA and BD 
at the points A and D. Now 
since A is the end of the verti- 
cal line AE, the descent along 
AD will occupy less time than 
along any other line drawn 
from the extremity A to the line BC and extending beyond the 
circumference of the circle; which concludes the first part of the 
proposition. 

If however, we prolong the perpendicular line AE, and choose 
any point F upon it, about which as center, we describe a circle 
of radius FA, this circle, AGC, will cut the tangent line in the 
points G and C. Draw the lines AG and AC which will accord- 
ing to the preceding lemma, deviate by equal angles from the 
median line AD. The time of descent along either of these 
lines is the same, since they start from the highest point A, and 
terminate on the circumference of the circle AGC. 

PROBLEM XII, PROPOSITION XXXIII 

Given a limited vertical line and an inclined plane of equal 
height, having a common upper terminal; it is required 
to find a point on the vertical line, extended upwards, from 

which 




94 



THIRD DAY 



229 



which a body will fall and, when deflected along the inclined 
plane, will traverse it in the same time-interval which is 
required for fall, from rest, through the given vertical height. 
Let AB be the given limited vertical line and AC an in- 
clined plane having the same altitude. It is required to find on 
the vertical BA, extended above A, a point from which a falling 
body will traverse the distance AC in the same time which is 
spent in falling, from rest at A, through the given vertical line 
AB. Draw the line DCE at right angles to AC, and lay off CD 
equal to AB; also join the points A and D; then the angle ADC 
will be greater than the angle CAD, since the side CA is greater 
than either AB or CD. Make the angle DAE equal to the angle 

[255] 

ADE, and draw EF perpendicular to AE; then EF will cut the 
inclined plane, ex- 
tended both ways, at 
F. Lay off AI and 
AG each equal to CF ; 
through G draw the 
horizontal line GH. 
Then, I say, H is the 
point sought. 

For, if we agree to 
let the length AB 
represent the time of 
fall along the verti- 
cal AB, then AC will 
likewise represent the 
time of descent from 
rest at A, along AC; Fig. 95 

and since, in the right-angled triangle AEF, the line EC has been 
drawn from the right angle at E perpendicular to the base AF, it 
follows that AE will be a mean proportional between FA and AC, 
while CE will be a mean proportional between AC and CF, that 
is between CA and AI. Now, since AC represents the time of 
descent from A along AC, it follows that AE will be the time 
along the entire distance AF, and EC the time along AI. But 

since 




230 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

since in the isosceles triangle AED the side EA is equal to the 
side ED it follows that ED will represent the time of fall along 
AF, while EC is the time of fall along AI. Therefore CD, that 
is AB, will represent the time of fall, from rest at A, along IF; 
which is the same as saying that AB is the time of fall, from G or 
from H, along AC. E. F. 

PROBLEM XIII, PROPOSITION XXXIV 

Given a limited inclined plane and a vertical line having 
their highest point in common, it is required to find a 
point in the vertical line extended such that a body will 
fall from it and then traverse the inclined plane in the same 
time which is required to traverse the inclined plane alone 
starting from rest at the top of said plane. 
Let AC and AB be an inclined plane and a vertical line 
respectively, having a common highest point at A. It is re- 
quired to find a point in the vertical line, above A, such that a 
body, falling from it and afterwards having its motion directed 
along AB, will traverse both the assigned part of the vertical 

[256] 

line and the plane AB in the same time which is required for 
the plane AB alone, starting from rest at A. Draw BC a hori- 
zontal line and lay off AN equal to AC; choose the point L so 
that AB:BN =AL:LC, and lay off AI equal to AL; choose the 
point E such that CE, laid off on the vertical AC produced, will 
be a third proportional to AC and BI. Then, I say, CE is the 
distance sought; so that, if the vertical line is extended above 
A and if a portion AX is laid off equal to CE, then a body falling 
from X will traverse both the distances, XA and AB, in the 
same time as that required, when starting from A, to traverse 
AB alone. 

Draw XR parallel to BC and intersecting BA produced in 
R; next draw ED parallel to BC and meeting BA produced in 
D; on AD as diameter describe a semicircle; from B draw BF 
perpendicular to AD, and prolong it till it meets the circum- 
ference of the circle; evidently FB is a mean proportional 
between AB and BD, while FA is a mean proportional between 

DA 



THIRD DAY 231 

DAandAB. Take BS equal to BI and FH equal to FB. Now 
since AB:BD=AC:CE and since BF is a mean proportional 

[257] 

between AB and BD, while BI is a mean proportional between 
AC and CE, it follows that BA:AC=FB:BS, and since BA: 
AC=BA:BN=FB:BS we shall have, convertendo, BF:FS = 
AB:BN =AL:LC. Consequently the rectangle formed by FB 




Fig. 96 

and CL is equal to the rectangle whose sides are AL and SF; 
moreover, this rectangle AL.SF is the excess of the rectangle 
AL.FB, or AI.BF, over the rectangle ALBS, or AI.IB. But the 
rectangle FB.LC is the excess of the rectangle AC.BF over the 
rectangle AL.BF; and moreover the rectangle AC.BF is equal to 
the rectangle AB.BI since BA:AC=FB:BI; hence the excess 
of the rectangle AB.BI over the rectangle AI.BF, or AI.FH, is 
equal to the excess of the rectangle AI.FH over the rectangle 
AI.IB; therefore twice the rectangle AI.FH is equal to the sum 

of 



232 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 
of_the rectangles AB.BI and AI.IB, or 2AI.FH=2AI.IB-f 
BI 2 . AddAI 2 to each side_,_then 2AI.IB+BI 2 +AI 2 =AB 2 = 
2AI.FH+AP. Again add_BF 2 to each side,jhen AE^+BF 2 = 
AF 2 = 2AI.FH + AI 2 + BF 2 = 2AI.FH + AI 2 + FH 2 . But 
AF 2 =2AH.HF+AH 2 +HF 2 ; an d hence 2ALFH+AP + 
FH 2 =2AH.HF+AH 2 +HF 2 . Subtracting HF 2 from each 
side we have 2AI.FH+AI 2 =2AH.HF+AH 2 . Since now FH 
is a fadlor common to both recftangles, it follows that AH is 
equal to AI; for if AH were either greater or smaller than AI, 
then the two redlangles AH.HF plus the square of HA would be 
either larger or smaller than the two recftangles AI.FH plus the 
square of LA, a result which is contrary to what we have just 
demonstrated. 

If now we agree to represent the time of descent along AB 
by the length AB, then the time through AC will likewise be 
measured by AC; and IB, which is a mean proportional between 
AC and CE, will represent the time through CE, or XA, from 
rest at X. Now, since AF is a mean proportional between DA 
and AB, or between RB and AB, and since BF, which is equal 
to FH, is a mean proportional between AB and BD, that is 
between AB and AR, it follows, from a preceding proposition 
[Proposition XIX, corollary], that the difference AH represents 
the time of descent along AB either from rest at R or after fall 
from X, while the time of descent along AB, from rest at A, is 
measured by the length AB. But as has just been shown, the 
time of fall through XA is measured by IB, while the time of 
descent along AB, after fall, through RA or through XA, is IA. 
Therefore the time of descent through XA plus AB is measured 
by the length AB, which, of course, also measures the time of 
descent, from rest at A, along AB alone. Q. E. F. 

[258] 
PROBLEM XIV, PROPOSITION XXXV 

Given an inclined plane and a limited vertical line, it is re- 
quired to find a distance on the inclined plane which a body, 
starting from rest, will traverse in the same time as that 
needed to traverse both the vertical and the inclined plane. 

Let 



THIRD DAY 233 

Let AB be the vertical line and BC the inclined plane. It is 
required to lay off on BC a distance which a body, starting from 
rest, will traverse in a time equal to that which is occupied by 
fall through the vertical AB and by descent of the plane. Draw 
the horizontal line AD, which intersects at E the prolongation of 
the inclined plane CB ; lay off BF equal to BA, and about E as 
center, with EF as radius describe the circle FIG. Prolong FE 
until it intersects the circumference at G. Choose a point H 
such that GB:BF =BH:HF. Draw the line HI tangent to the 




Fig. 97 

circle at I. At B draw the line BK perpendicular to FC, cutting 
the line EIL at L; also draw LM perpendicular to EL and cutting 
BC at M. Then, I say, BM is the distance which a body, start- 
ing from rest at B, will traverse in the same time which is re- 
quired to descend from rest at A through both distances, AB 
and BM. Lay off EN equal to EL; then since GB:BF = 
BH:HF, we shall have, permutando, GB:BH=BF:HF, and, 
dividendo, GH:BH=BH:HF. Consequently the redlangle 
GH.HF is equal to the square on BH; but this same redlangle 
is also equal to the square on HI; therefore BH is equal to HI. 
Since, in the quadrilateral ILBH, the sides HB and HI are 

equal 



234 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

equal and since the angles at B and I are right angles, it follows 
that the sides BL and LI are also equal: but El =EF; therefore 

[259] 

the total length LE, or NE, is equal to the sum of LB and EF. 
If we subtract the common part EF, the remainder FN will be 
equal to LB: but, by construction, FB=BA and, therefore, 
LB = AB -fBN. If again we agree to represent the time of fall 
through AB by the length AB, then the time of descent along 
EB will be measured by EB ; moreover since EN is a mean pro- 
portional between ME and EB it will represent the time of 
descent along the whole distance EM; therefore the difference 
of these distances, BM, will be traversed, after fall from EB, or 
AB, in a time which is represented by BN. But having already 
assumed the distance AB as a measure of the time of fall through 
AB, the time of descent along AB and BM is measured by AB + 
BN. Since EB measures the time of fall, from rest at E, along 
EB, the time from rest at B along BM will be the mean pro- 
portional between BE and BM, namely, BL. The time there- 
fore for the path AB + 
BM, starting from rest 
at A is AB+BN; but 
the time for BM alone, 
starting from rest at B, 
is BL; and since it has 
already been shown 
that BL = AB+BN, 
the proposition follows. 
Another and shorter 
proof is the following: 

Fig. 98 Let BC be the inclined 

plane and BA the vertical; at B draw a perpendicular to EC, 
extending it both ways; lay off BH equal to the excess of 
BE over BA; make the angle HEL equal to the angle BHE; 
prolong EL until it cuts BK in L; at L draw LM perpendicular to 
EL and extend it till it meets BC in M; then, I say, BM is the 
portion of BC sought. For, since the angle MLE is a right 
angle, BL will be a mean proportional between MB and BE, 

while 




THIRD DAY 



235 



while LE is a mean proportional between ME and BE; lay off 
EN equal to LE; then NE =EL =LH, and HB =NE-BL. But 
also HB=NE-(NB+BA); therefore BN+BA==BL. If now 
we assume the length EB as a measure of the time of descent 
along EB, the time of descent, from rest at B, along BM will be 
represented by BL; but, if the descent along BM is from rest at 
E or at A, then the time of descent will be measured by BN; and 
AB will measure the time along AB. Therefore the time re- 
quired to traverse AB and BM, namely, the sum of the distances 
AB and BN, is equal to the time of descent, from rest at B, 
along BM alone. Q. E. F. 

[260] 
LEMMA 

Let DC be drawn perpendicular to the diameter BA; from the 
extremity B draw the line BED at 
random; draw the line FB. Then, I 
say, FB is a mean proportional be- 
tween DB and BE. Join the points 
E and F. Through B, draw the 
tangent BG which will be parallel to 
CD. Now, since the angle DBG is 
equal to the angle FDB, and since the 
alternate angle of GBD is equal to 
EFB, it follows that the triangles 
FDB and FEB are similar and hence 
BD:BF=FB:BE. 

LEMMA 

Let AC be a line which is longer than DF, and let the ratio 

of AB to BC be greater than that of DE to EF. Then, I say, 

. AB is greater than DE. For, if AB 

* 5 S bears to BC a ratio greater than that of 

D B G P -^ to ^> t ^ ien ^^ w ^ kear to some 

1 ' length shorter than EF, the same ratio 

Fig. 100 which AB bears to BC. Call this length 

EG; then since AB:BC =DE:EG, it follows, componendo et con- 

vertendo, 




Fig. 99 



236 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

vertendo, that CArAB =GD:DE. But since CA is greater than 
GD, it follows that BA is greater than DE. 



LEMMA 

Let ACIB be the quadrant of a 
circle; from B draw BE parallel to 
AC; about any point in the line 
BE describe a circle BOES, touch- 
ing AB at B and intersecting the 
circumference of the quadrant at 
I. Join the points C and B; draw 
the line CI, prolonging it to S. 
Then, I say, the line CI is always 
less than CO. Draw the line AI 
touching the circle BOE. Then, 




if the line DI be drawn, it will be 
equal to DB; but, since DB 
touches the quadrant, DI will also 
be tangent to it and will be at right 
angles to AI; thus AI touches the 
circle BOE at I. And since the 
angle AIC is greater than the angle 
ABC, subtending as it does a 
larger arc, it follows that the angle 
SIN is also greater than the angle 
ABC. Wherefore the arc IES is 
greater than the arc BO, and the 
line CS, being nearer the center, 
is longer than CB. Consequently 
CO is greater than CI, since SC: 
CB=OC:CI. 

This result would be all the 
Fig. ioi more marked if, as in the second 

figure, the arc BIC were less than a quadrant. For the per- 
pendicular DB would then cut the circle CIB; and so also would 

DI 



THIRD DAY 237 

DI which is equal to BD; the angle DIA would be obtuse and 
therefore the line AIN would cut the circle BIE. Since the angle 
ABC is less than the angle AIC, which is equal to SIN, and still 
less than the angle which the tangent at I would make with the 
line SI, it follows that the arc SEI is far greater than the arc 
BO; whence, etc. Q. E. D. 

THEOREM XXII, PROPOSITION XXXVI 

If from the lowest point of a vertical circle, a chord is 
drawn subtending an arc not greater than a quadrant, 
and if from the two ends of this chord two other chords 
be drawn to any point on the arc, the time of descent along 
the two latter chords will be shorter than along the first, 
and shorter also, by the same amount, than along the lower 
of these two latter chords. 

[262] 

Let CBD be an arc, not exceeding a quadrant, taken from a 

vertical circle whose lowest point is C; let CD be the chord 

[planum elevatum] sub- 

tending this arc, and let | 

there be two other 

chords drawn from C 

and D to any point B 

on the arc. Then, I say, 

the time of descent along 

the two chords [plana] 

DB and BC is shorter 

than along DC alone, or 

along BC alone, starting 

fromrestatB. Through 

the point D, draw the 

horizontal line MDA 




cutting CB extended at 



T G S K P 

Fig. 102 

A: draw DN and MC at right angles to MD, and BN at right 
angles to BD; about the right-angled triangle DBN describe the 
semicircle DFBN, cutting DC at F. Choose the point O such 
that DO will be a mean proportional between CD and DF; in like 

manner 



238 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

manner select V so that AV is a mean proportional between CA 
and AB. Let the length PS represent the time of descent along 
the whole distance DC or BC, both of which require the same 
time. Lay off PR such that CD >O = timePS . timePR. Then 
PR will represent the time in which a body, starting from D, will 
traverse the distance DF, while RS will measure the time in which 
the remaining distance, FC, will be traversed. But since PS is 
also the time of descent, from rest at B, along BC, and if we 
choose T such that BC:CD =PS:PT then PT will measure the 
time of descent from A to C, for we have already shown [Lemma] 
that DC is a mean proportional between AC and CB. Finally 
choose the point G such that CA AV =PT:PG, then PG will be 
the time of descent from A to B, while GT will be the residual 
time of descent along BC following descent from A to B. But, 
since the diameter, DN, of the circle DFN is a vertical line, the 
chords DF and DB will be traversed in equal times; wherefore 
if one can prove that a body will traverse BC, after descent 
along DB, in a shorter time than it will FC after descent along 
DF he will have proved the theorem. But a body descending 
from D along DB will traverse BC in the same time as if it had 
come from A along AB, seeing that the body acquires the same 

[263] 

momentum in descending along DB as along AB. Hence it 
remains only to show that descent along BC after AB is quicker 
than along FC after DF. But we have already shown that GT 
represents the time along BC after AB; also that RS measures 
the time along FC after DF. Accordingly it must be shown 
that RS is greater than GT, which may be done as follows: 
Since SP:PR=CD:DO, it follows, invertendo et convertendo, 
that RS:SP=OC:CD; also we have SP:PT=DC:CA. And 
since TP:PG=CA:AV, it follows, invertendo, that PT:TG = 
AC:CV, therefore, ex czquali, RS:GT=OC:CV. But, as we 
shall presently show, OC is greater than CV; hence the time 
RS is greater than the time GT, which was to be shown. Now, 
since [Lemma] CF is greater than CB and FD smaller than BA, 
it follows that CD:DF>CA:AB. But CD:DF=CO:OF, 
seeing that CDOX) =DO:DF; and CA:AB =CV 2 :VB 2 . There- 
fore 



THIRD DAY 



239 



fore CO)F>CV:VB, and, according to the preceding lemma, 
CO>CV. Besides this it is clear that the time of descent along 
DC is to the time along DEC as DOC is to the sum of DO 

andCV. 

SCHOLIUM 

From the preceding it is possible to infer that the path of 
quickest descent [lationem omnium velocissimam] from one 
point to another is not the shortest path, namely, a straight 
line, but the arc of a circle.* In the quadrant BAEC, having 
the side BC vertical, divide the arc AC into any number of 
equal parts, AD, DE, EF, FG, GC, and from C draw straight 
lines to the points A, D, E, F, G; -g 
draw also the straight lines AD, 
DE, EF, FG, GC. Evidently de- 
scent along the path ADC is quicker 

[264] 

than along AC alone or along DC 
from rest at D. But a body, start- 
ing from rest at A, will traverse 
DC more quickly than the path 
ADC; while, if it starts from rest 
at A, it will traverse the path DEC 
in a shorter time than DC alone. 
Hence descent along the three Fig. 103 

chords, ADEC, will take less time than along the two chords 
ADC. Similarly, following descent along ADE, the time required 
to traverse EFC is less than that needed for EC alone. There- 
| fore descent is more rapid along the four chords ADEFC than 
I along the three ADEC. And finally a body, after descent along 
ADEF, will traverse the two chords, FGC, more quickly than 
FC alone. Therefore, along the five chords, ADEFGC, descent 
will be more rapid than along the four, ADEFC. Consequently 

* It is well known that the first correct solution for the problem of 
quickest descent, under the condition of a constant force was given by 
John Bernoulli (1667-1748). [Trans.] 







240 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the nearer the inscribed polygon approaches a circle the shorter 
is the time required for descent from A to C. 

What has been proven for the quadrant holds true also for 
smaller arcs; the reasoning is the same. 

PROBLEM XV, PROPOSITION XXXVII 

Given a limited vertical line and an inclined plane of equal 
altitude; it is required to find a distance on the inclined 
plane which is equal to the vertical line and which is 
traversed in an interval equal to the time of fall along the 
vertical line. 

Let AB be the vertical line and AC the inclined plane. We must 
locate, on the inclined plane, a distance equal to the vertical 

A. line AB and which will be 
traversed by a body starting 
from rest at A in the same 
time needed for fall along the 
vertical line. Lay off AD 
equal to AB, and bisect the 
remainder DC at I. Choose 
C^ B the point E such that AC:CI 

Fig. 104 =CI:AE and lay off DO 

equal to AE. Clearly EG is equal to AD, and also to AB. And 
further, I say that EG is that distance which will be traversed 
by a body, starting from rest at A, in the same time which is 
required for that body to fall through the distance AB. For 
since AC:CI =CI:AE =ID:DG, we have, convertendo, CA: 
AI =DI:IG. And since the whole of CA is to the whole of AI 
as the portion CI is to the portion IG, it follows that the re- 

[265] 

mainder IA is to the remainder AG as the whole of CA is to the 
w r hole of AI. Thus AI is seen to be a mean proportional be- 
tween CA and AG, while CI is a mean proportional between CA 
and AE. If therefore the time of fall along AB is represented by 
the length AB, the time along AC will be represented by AC, 
while CI, or ID, will measure the time along AE. Since AI is a 
mean proportional between CA and AG, and since CA is a 

measure 



THIRD DAY 241 

measure of the time along the entire distance AC, it follows that 
AI is the time along AG, and the difference 1C is the time along 
the difference GC; but DI was the time along AE. Conse- 
quently the lengths DI and 1C measure the times along AE and 
CG respectively. Therefore the remainder DA represents the 
time along EG, which of course is equal to the time along AB. 

Q. E. F. 

COROLLARY 

From this it is clear that the distance sought is bounded at 
each end by portions of the inclined plane which are traversed 
in equal times. 

PROBLEM XVI, PROPOSITION XXXVIII 

Given two horizontal planes cut by a vertical line, it is 
required to find a point on the upper part of the vertical 
line from which bodies may fall to the horizontal planes and 
there, having their motion deflected into a horizontal 
direction, will, during an interval equal to the time of fall, 
traverse distances which bear to each other any assigned 
ratio of a smaller quantity to a larger. 

Let CD and BE be the horizontal planes cut by the vertical 
\CB, and let the ratio of the smaller quantity to the larger 
be that of N to FG. It is required to find in the upper part 
Df the vertical line, AB, a point from which a body falling to 
the plane CD and there having its motion deflected along this 
plane, will traverse, during an interval equal to its time of fall a 
distance such that if another body, falling from this same point 
to the plane BE, there have its motion deflected along this 
plane and continued during an interval equal to its time of fall, 
will traverse a distance which bears to the former distance the 

J 2 66] 

ratio of FG to N. Lay off GH equal to N, and select the point 
L so that FHiHG =BC:CL. Then, I say, L is the point sought. 
For, if we lay off CM equal to twice CL, and draw the line 
LM cutting the plane BE at O, then BO will be equal to twice 

BL 



242 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

BL. And since FH:HG=BC:CL, we have, componendo et 
convertendo, HG:GF=N:GF=CL:LB =CM:BO. It is clear 
that, since CM is double the distance LC, the space CM is 
that which a body falling from L through LC will traverse in 
the plane CD; and, for the same reason, since BO is twice the 
distance BL, it is clear that BO is the distance which a body, 



B 



<N 



H 



Fig. 105 

after fall through LB, will traverse during an interval equal to 
the time of its fall through LB. Q. E. F. 

SAGR. Indeed, I think we may concede to our Academician, 
without flattery, his claim that in the principle [principio, i. e., 
accelerated motion] laid down in this treatise he has established 
a new science dealing with a very old subject. Observing with 
what ease and clearness he deduces from a single principle the 
proofs of so many theorems, I wonder not a little how such 
a question escaped the attention of Archimedes, Apollonius, 
Euclid and so many other mathematicians and illustrious 
philosophers, especially since so many ponderous tomes have 
been devoted to the subject of motion. 

[267] 

SALV. There is a fragment of Euclid which treats of motion, 

but 



THIRD DAY 243 

but in it there is no indication that he ever began to investigate 
the property of acceleration and the manner in which it varies 
with slope. So that we may say the door is now opened, for the 
first time, to a new method fraught with numerous and wonder- 
ful results which in future years will command the attention of 
other minds. 

SAGR. I really believe that just as, for instance, the few 
properties of the circle proven by Euclid in the Third Book of 
his Elements lead to many others more recondite, so the prin- 
ciples which are set forth in this little treatise will, when taken 
up by speculative minds, lead to many another more remarkable 
result; and it is to be believed that it will be so on account of the 
nobility of the subject, which is superior to any other in nature. 

During this long and laborious day, I have enjoyed these 
simple theorems more than their proofs, many of which, for 
their complete comprehension, would require more than an hour 
each; this study, if you will be good enough to leave the book 
in my hands, is one which I mean to take up at my leisure after 
we have read the remaining portion which deals with the motion 
of projectiles; and this if agreeable to you we shall take up to- 
morrow. 

SALV. I shall not fail to be with you. 



END OF THE THIRD DAY. 

[268] 




FOURTH DAY 

ALVIATT. Once more, Simplicio is here on 
time; so let us without delay take up the 
question of motion. The text of our Author 
is as follows : 

THE MOTION OF PROJECTILES 

In the preceding pages we have discussed the 
properties of uniform motion and of motion naturally accel- 
erated along planes of all inclinations. I now propose to set 
forth those properties which belong to a body whose motion is 
compounded of two other motions, namely, one uniform and one 
naturally accelerated; these properties, well worth knowing, I 
propose to demonstrate in a rigid manner. This is the kind of 
motion seen in a moving projectile; its origin I conceive to be as 
follows : 

Imagine any particle projected along a horizontal plane with- 
out friction; then we know, from what has been more fully 
explained in the preceding pages, that this particle will move 
along this same plane with a motion which is uniform and 
perpetual, provided the plane has no limits. But if the plane is 
limited and elevated, then the moving particle, which we imag- 
ine to be a heavy one, will on passing over the edge of the plane 
acquire, in addition to its previous uniform and perpetual 
motion, a downward propensity due to its own weight; so that 
the resulting motion which I call projection \projectio], is com- 
pounded of one which is uniform and horizontal and of another 
which is vertical and naturally accelerated. We now proceed to 

demonstrate 



FOURTH DAY 245 

demonstrate some of its properties, the first of which is as fol- 
lows: 

[269] 

THEOREM I, PROPOSITION I 

A projectile which is carried by a uniform horizontal motion 
compounded with a naturally accelerated vertical motion 
describes a path which is a semi-parabola. 

SAGR. Here, Salviati, it will be necessary to stop a little 
while for my sake and, I believe, also for the benefit of Sim- 
plicio; for it so happens that I have not gone very far in my 
study of Apollonius and am merely aware of the fact that he 
treats of the parabola and other conic sections, without an un- 
derstanding of which I hardly think one will be able to follow 
the proof of other propositions depending upon them. Since 
even in this first beautiful theorem the author finds it necessary 
to prove that the path of a projectile is a parabola, and since, as 
I imagine, we shall have to deal with only this kind of curves, 
it will be absolutely necessary to have a thorough acquaintance, 
if not with all the properties which Apollonius has demonstrated 
for these figures, at least with those which are needed for the 
present treatment. 

SALV. You are quite too modest, pretending ignorance of 
facts which not long ago you acknowledged as well known I 
mean at the time when we were discussing the strength of 
materials and needed to use a certain theorem of Apollonius 
which gave you no trouble. 

SAGR. I may have chanced to know it or may possibly have 
assumed it, so long as needed, for that discussion; but now when 
we have to follow all these demonstrations about such curves we 
ought not, as they say, to swallow it whole, and thus waste time 
and energy. 

SIMP. Now even though Sagredo is, as I believe, well equipped 
for all his needs, I do not understand even the elementary terms; 
for although our philosophers have treated the motion of pro- 
jectiles, I do not recall their having described the path of a 
projectile except to state in a general way that it is always a 

curved 



246 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

curved line, unless the projection be vertically upwards. But 

[270] 

if the little Euclid which I have learned since our previous dis- 
cussion does not enable me to understand the demonstrations 
which are to follow, then I shall be obliged to accept the the- 
orems on faith without fully comprehending them. 

SALV. On the contrary, I desire that you should understand 
them from the Author himself, who, when he allowed me to see 
this work of his, was good enough to prove for me two of the 
principal properties of the parabola because I did not happen to 
have at hand the books of Apollonius. These properties, which 
are the only ones we shall need in the present discussion, he 
proved in such a way that no prerequisite knowledge was re- 
quired. These theorems are, indeed, given by Apollonius, but 
after many preceding ones, to follow which would take a long 
while. I wish to shorten our task by deriving the first property 
purely and simply from the mode of gen- 
eration of the parabola and proving the 
second immediately from the first. 

Beginning now with the first, imagine 
a right cone, erected upon the circular 
base ibkc with apex at /. The section of 
this cone made by a plane drawn parallel 
to the side Ik is the curve which is called 
a parabola. The base of this parabola be 
cuts at right angles the diameter ik of the 
circle ibkc, and the axis ad is parallel to 
the side Ik; now having taken any point / 
in the curve bfa draw the straight line fe 
Fig. 1 06 parallel to bd; then, I say, the square 

of bd is to the square of fe in the same ratio as the axis ad 
is to the portion ae. Through the point e pass a plane parallel 
to the circle ibkc, producing in the cone a circular section whose 
diameter is the line geh. Since bd is at right angles to ik in the 
circle ibk, the square of bd is equal to the rectangle formed by id 
and dk; so also in the upper circle which passes through the 
points gfh the square of fe is equal to the rectangle formed by 

f 




FOURTH DAY 247 

ge and eh; hence the square of bd is to the square of fe as the 
rectangle id.dk is to the rectangle ge.eh. And since the line ed is 
parallel to hk, the line eh, being parallel to dk, is equal to it; 
therefore the rectangle idjdk is to the rectangle ge.eh as id is to 

[271] 

ge, that is, as da is to ae; whence also the rectangle id.dk is to the 
rectangle ge.eh, that is, the square of bd is to the square of fe, as 
the axis da is to the portion ae. Q. E. D. 

The other proposition necessary for this discussion we demon- 
strate as follows. Let us draw a parabola whose axis ca is pro- 
longed upwards to a point d; from any point b draw the line be 
parallel to the base of the parabola; if now the point d is chosen 
so that da = ca, then, I say, the 
straight line drawn through the 
points b and d will be tangent to 
the parabola at b. For imagine, if 
possible, that this line cuts the par- 
abola above or that its prolonga- 
tion cuts it below, and through any 
point g in it draw the straight line 
fge. And since the square of fe is 
greater than the square of ge, the 
square of fe will bear a greater ratio 
to the square of be than the square 
of ge to that of be; and since, by the 
preceding proposition, the square 
of fe is to that of be as the line ea is 
to ca, it follows that the line ea 
will bear to the line ca a greater jlL. 
ratio than the square of ge to that W 
of be, or, than the square of ed to /[ 
that of cd (the sides of the triangles 
deg and deb being proportional). Fl S- I0 7 

But the line ea is to ca, or da, in the same ratio as four times the 
rectangle ea.ad is to four times the square of ad, or, what is the 
same, the square of cd, since this is four times the square of ad; 
hence four times the rectangle ea.ad bears to the square of cd 

a 




248 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

a greater ratio than the square of ed to the square of c d; but 
that would make four times the rectangle ea.ad greater than 
the square of ed; which is false, the fact being just the oppo- 
site, because the two portions ea and ad of the line ed are not 
equal. Therefore the line db touches the parabola without 
cutting it. Q. E. D. 

SIMP. Your demonstration proceeds too rapidly and, it seems 
to me, you keep on assuming that all of Euclid's theorems are 

[272] 

as familiar and available to me as his first axioms, which is 
far from true. And now this fact which you spring upon us, 
that four times the redtangle ea.ad is less than the square of 
de because the two portions ea and ad of the line de are not 
equal brings me little composure of mind, but rather leaves me 
in suspense. 

SALV. Indeed, all real mathematicians assume on the part of 
the reader perfect familiarity with at least the elements of 
Euclid; and here it is necessary in your case only to recall a 
proposition of the Second Book in which he proves that when a 
line is cut into equal and also into two unequal parts, the rec- 
tangle formed on the unequal parts is less than that formed 
on the equal (i. e., less than the square on half the line), by an 
amount which is the square of the difference between the equal 
and unequal segments. From this it is clear that the square of 
the whole line which is equal to four times the square of the 
half is greater than four times the rectangle of the unequal 
parts. In order to understand the following portions of this 
treatise it will be necessary to keep in mind the two elemental 
theorems from conic sections which we have just demonstrated; 
and these two theorems are indeed the only ones which the 
Author uses. We can now resume the text and see how he 
demonstrates his first proposition in which he shows that a 
body falling with a motion compounded of a uniform horizontal 
and a naturally accelerated [naturale descendente] one describes 
a semi-parabola. 

Let us imagine an elevated horizontal line or plane ab along 
which a body moves with uniform speed from a to b. Suppose 

this 




TV 



io8 



FOURTH DAY 249 

this plane to end abruptly at b; then at this point the body will, 
on account of its weight, acquire also a natural motion down- 
wards along the perpendicular bn. Draw the line be along the 
plane ba to represent the flow, or measure, of time; divide this 
line into a number of segments, be, cd, de, representing equal 
intervals of time; from the points b, c, d, e, let fall lines which are 
parallel to the per- 
pendicular bn. On the 
first of these lay off 
any distance ci, on the 
second a distance four 
times as long, df; on 

. [273] 

the third, one nine 
times as long, eh; and 
so on, in proportion to 
the squares of cb, db, 
eb, or, we may say, in 
the squared ratio of these same lines. Accordingly we see that 
while the body moves from b to c with uniform speed, it also falls 
perpendicularly through the distance ci, and at the end of the 
time-interval be finds itself at the point i. In like manner at the 
end of the time-interval bd, which is the double of be, the vertical 
fall will be four times the first distance ci; for it has been shown 
in a previous discussion that the distance traversed by a freely 
falling body varies as the square of the time; in like manner the 
space eh traversed during the time be will be nine times ci; 
thus it is evident that the distances eh, df, ci will be to one 
another as the squares of the lines be, bd, be. Now from the 
points i, f, h draw the straight lines io, fg, hi parallel to be; these 
lines kl,fg, io are equal to eb, db and eb, respectively; so also are 
the lines bo, bg, bl respectively equal to ci, df, and eh. The square 
of hi is to that of fg as the line Ib is to bg; and the square of fg is 
to that of io as gb is to bo; therefore the points i,f, h, lie on one 
and the same parabola. In like manner it may be shown that, 
if we take equal time-intervals of any size whatever, and if we 
imagine the particle to be carried by a similar compound motion, 

the 



THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

the positions of this particle, at the ends of these time-intervals, 
will lie on one and the same parabola. Q. E. D. 

SALV. This conclusion follows from the converse of the first 
of the two propositions given above. For, having drawn a 
parabola through the points b and h, any other two points,/ and 
i, not falling on the parabola must lie either within or without; 
consequently the line/g is either longer or shorter than the line 
which terminates on the parabola. Therefore the square of hi 
will not bear to the square of fg the same ratio as the line Ib to 
bg, but a greater or smaller; the fact is, however, that the square 
of hi does bear this same ratio to the square of fg. Hence the 
point/ does lie on the parabola, and so do all the others. 

SAGR. One cannot deny that the argument is new, subtle and 
conclusive, resting as it does upon this hypothesis, namely, 
that the horizontal motion remains uniform, that the vertical 
motion continues to be accelerated downwards in proportion to 
the square of the time, and that such motions and velocities as 
these combine without altering, disturbing, or hindering each 
other,* so that as the motion proceeds the path of the projectile 
does not change into a different curve: but this, in my opinion, 

. [274] 

is impossible. For the axis of the parabola along which we 
imagine the natural motion of a falling body to take place stands 
perpendicular to a horizontal surface and ends at the center of 
the earth; and since the parabola deviates more and more from 
its axis no projectile can ever reach the center of the earth or, if 
it does, as seems necessary, then the path of the projectile must 
transform itself into some other curve very different from the 
parabola. 

SIMP. To these difficulties, I may add others. One of these is 
that we suppose the horizontal plane, which slopes neither up 
nor down, to be represented by a straight line as if each point on 
this line were equally distant from the center, which is not the 
case; for as one starts from the middle [of the line] and goes 
toward either end, he departs farther and farther from the 
center [of the earth] and is therefore constantly going uphill. 
Whence it follows that the motion cannot remain uniform 

* A very near approach to Newton's Second Law of Motion. [Trans.] 



FOURTH DAY 251 

through any distance whatever, but must continually diminish. 
Besides, I do not see how it is possible to avoid the resistance of 
the medium which must destroy the uniformity of the horizon- 
tal motion and change the law of acceleration of falling bodies. 
These various difficulties render it highly improbable that a 
result derived from such unreliable hypotheses should hold true 
in practice. 

SALV. All these difficulties and objections which you urge 
are so well founded that it is impossible to remove them; and, 
as for me, I am ready to admit them all, which indeed I think 
our Author would also do. I grant that these conclusions proved 
in the abstract will be different when applied in the concrete 
and will be fallacious to this extent, that neither will the horizon- 
tal motion be uniform nor the natural acceleration be in the 
ratio assumed, nor the path of the projectile a parabola, etc. 
But, on the other hand, I ask you not to begrudge our Author 
that which other eminent men have assumed even if not strictly 
true. The authority of Archimedes alone will satisfy everybody. 
In his Mechanics and in his first quadrature of the parabola he 
takes for granted that the beam of a balance or steelyard is a 
straight line, every point of which is equidistant from the 
common center of all heavy bodies, and that the cords by which 
heavy bodies are suspended are parallel to each other. 

Some consider this assumption permissible because, in prac- 
tice, our instruments and the distances involved are so small in 
comparison with the enormous distance from the center of the 
earth that we may consider a minute of arc on a great circle as a 
straight line, and may regard the perpendiculars let fall from its 
two extremities as parallel. For if in adlual practice one had to 



. 
consider such small quantities, it would be necessary first of all 

to criticise the architects who presume, by use of a plumbline, to 
erect high towers with parallel sides. I may add that, in all 
their discussions, Archimedes and the others considered them- 
selves as located at an infinite distance from the center of the 
earth, in which case their assumptions were not false, and 
therefore their conclusions were absolutely correct. When we 

wish 



252 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

wish to apply our proven conclusions to distances which, though 
finite, are very large, it is necessary for us to infer, on the basis of 
demonstrated truth, what correction is to be made for the fact 
that our distance from the center of the earth is not really 
infinite, but merely very great in comparison with the small 
dimensions of our apparatus. The largest of these will be the 
range of our projectiles and even here we need consider only 
the artillery which, however great, will never exceed four of 
those miles of which as many thousand separate us from the 
center of the earth; and since these paths terminate upon the 
surface of the earth only very slight changes can take place in 
their parabolic figure which, it is conceded, would be greatly 
altered if they terminated at the center of the earth. 

As to the perturbation arising from the resistance of the 
medium this is more considerable and does not, on account of its 
manifold forms, submit to fixed laws and exact description. 
Thus if we consider only the resistance which the air offers to the 
motions studied by us, we shall see that it disturbs them all and 
disturbs them in an infinite variety of ways corresponding to the 
infinite variety in the form, weight, and velocity of the pro- 
jectiles. For as to velocity, the greater this is, the greater will 
be the resistance offered by the air; a resistance which will be 
greater as the moving bodies become less dense [men gravi\. 
So that although the falling body ought to be displaced [andare 
accelerandosi\ in proportion to the square of the duration of its 
motion, yet no matter how heavy the body, if it falls from a 
very considerable height, the resistance of the air will be such as 
to prevent any increase in speed and will render the motion 

[276] 

uniform; and in proportion as the moving body is less dense 
[men grave} this uniformity will be so much the more quickly 
attained and after a shorter fall. Even horizontal motion which, 
if no impediment were offered, would be uniform and constant is 
altered by the resistance of the air and finally ceases; and here 
again the less dense \piu leggiero] the body the quicker the 
process. Of these properties [accuLenli\ of weight, of velocity, 
and also of form [figura], infinite in number, it is not possible to 

give 



FOURTH DAY 253 

give any exact description; hence, in order to handle this matter 
in a scientific way, it is necessary to cut loose from these difficul- 
ties; and having discovered and demonstrated the theorems, in 
the case of no resistance, to use them and apply them with such 
limitations as experience will teach. And the advantage of this 
method will not be small; for the material and shape of the 
projectile may be chosen, as dense and round as possible, so 
that it will encounter the least resistance in the medium. Nor 
will the spaces and velocities in general be so great but that we 
shall be easily able to correct them with precision. 

In the case of those projectiles which we use, made of dense 
[grave] material and round in shape, or of lighter material and 
cylindrical in shape, such as arrows, thrown from a sling or 
crossbow, the deviation from an exact parabolic path is quite 
insensible. Indeed, if you will allow me a little greater liberty, 
I can show you, by two experiments, that the dimensions of our 
apparatus are so small that these external and incidental re- 
sistances, among which that of the medium is the most con- 
siderable, are scarcely observable. 

I now proceed to the consideration of motions through the 
air, since it is with these that we are now especially concerned; 
the resistance of the air exhibits itself in two ways: first by 
offering greater impedance to less dense than to very dense 
bodies, and secondly by offering greater resistance to a body in 
rapid motion than to the same body in slow motion. 

Regarding the first of these, consider the case of two balls 
having the same dimensions, but one weighing ten or twelve 
times as much as the other; one, say, of lead, the other of oak, 
both allowed to fall from an elevation of 150 or 200 cubits. 

Experiment shows that they will reach the earth with slight 
difference in speed, showing us that in both cases the retardation 
caused by the air is small; for if both balls start at the same 
moment and at the same elevation, and if the leaden one be 
slightly retarded and the wooden one greatly retarded, then the 
former ought to reach the earth a considerable distance in 
advance of the latter, since it is ten times as heavy. But this 

[2771 

does 



254 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF^ GALILEO 

does not happen; indeed, the gain in distance of one over the 
other does not amount to the hundredth part of the entire fall. 
And in the case of a ball of stone weighing only a third or half as 
much as one of lead, the difference in their times of reaching the 
earth will be scarcely noticeable. Now since the speed [impeto] 
acquired by a leaden ball in falling from a height of 200 cubits is 
so great that if the motion remained uniform the ball would, in 
an interval of time equal to that of the fall, traverse 400 cubits, 
and since this speed is so considerable in comparison with those 
which, by use of bows or other machines except fire arms, we are 
able to give to our projectiles, it follows that we may, without 
sensible error, regard as absolutely true those propositions which 
we are about to prove without considering the resistance of the 
medium. 

Passing now to the second case, where we have to show that 
the resistance of the air for a rapidly moving body is not very 
much greater than for one moving slowly, ample proof is given 
by the following experiment. Attach to two threads of equal 
length say four or five yards two equal leaden balls and 
suspend them from the ceiling; now pull them aside from the 
perpendicular, the one through 80 or more degrees, the other 
through not more than four or five degrees; so that, when set 
free, the one falls, passes through the perpendicular, and de- 
scribes large but slowly decreasing arcs of 160, 150, 140 degrees, 
etc. ; the other swinging through small and also slowly diminish- 
ing arcs of 10, 8, 6, degrees, etc. 

In the first place it must be remarked that one pendulum 
passes through its arcs of 1 80, 160, etc., in the same time that 
the other swings through its 10, 8, etc., from which it follows 
that the speed of the first ball is 16 and 18 times greater than 
that of the second. Accordingly, if the air offers more resistance 
to the high speed than to the low, the frequency of vibration in 
the large arcs of 180 or 160, etc., ought to be less than in the 
small arcs of 10, 8, 4, etc., and even less than in arcs of 2, or 
i; but this prediction is not verified by experiment; because if 
two persons start to count the vibrations, the one the large, the 
other the small, they will discover that after counting tens 

and 



FOURTH DAY 255 

and even hundreds they will not differ by a single vibration, 
not even by a f raction of one. 

[278] 

This observation justifies the two following propositions, 
namely, that vibrations of very large and very small amplitude 
all occupy the same time and that the resistance of the air 
does not affect motions of high speed more than those of low 
speed, contrary to the opinion hitherto generally entertained. 

SAGR. On the contrary, since we cannot deny that the air 
hinders both of these motions, both becoming slower and finally 
vanishing, we have to admit that the retardation occurs in the 
same proportion in each case. But how? How, indeed, could 
the resistance offered to the one body be greater than that 
offered to the other except by the impartation of more momen- 
tum and speed [impeto e velocita] to the fast body than to the 
slow? And if this is so the speed with which a body moves is at 
once the cause and measure [cagione e misura] of the resistance 
which it meets. Therefore, all motions, fast or slow, are hin- 
dered and diminished in the same proportion; a result, it seems 
to me, of no small importance. 

SALV. We are able, therefore, in this second case to say that 
the errors, neglecting those which are accidental, in the results 
which we are about to demonstrate are small in the case of our 
machines where the velocities employed are mostly very great 
and the distances negligible in comparison with the semi- 
diameter of the earth or one of its great circles. 

SIMP. I would like to hear your reason for putting the pro- 
jectiles of fire arms, i. e., those using powder, in a different class 
from the projectiles employed in bows, slings, and crossbows, on 
the ground of their not being equally subject to change and 
resistance from the air. 

SALV. I am led to this view by the excessive and, so to speak, 
supernatural violence with which such projectiles are launched; 
for, indeed, it appears to me that without exaggeration one might 
say that the speed of a ball fired either from a musket or from 
a piece of ordnance is supernatural. For if such a ball be allowed 
to fall from some great elevation its speed will, owing to the 

resistance 



256 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

resistance of the air, not go on increasing indefinitely; that which 
happens to bodies of small density in falling through short 
distances I mean the reduction of their motion to uniformity- 
will also happen to a ball of iron or lead after it has fallen a few 
thousand cubits; this terminal or final speed [terminata velocita] 
is the maximum which such a heavy body can naturally acquire 

[279] 

in falling through the air. This speed I estimate to be much 
smaller than that impressed upon the ball by the burning pow- 
der. 

An appropriate experiment will serve to demonstrate this 
facft. From a height of one hundred or more cubits fire a gun 
[archibuso] loaded with a lead bullet, vertically downwards 
upon a stone pavement; with the same gun shoot against a 
similar stone from a distance of one or two cubits, and observe 
which of the two balls is the more flattened. Now if the ball 
which has come from the greater elevation is found to be the 
less flattened of the two, this will show that the air has hin- 
dered and diminished the speed initially imparted to the bullet 
by the powder, and that the air will not permit a bullet to ac- 
quire so great a speed, no matter from what height it falls; for if 
the speed impressed upon the ball by the fire does not exceed 
that acquired by it in falling freely [naturalmente] then its down- 
ward blow ought to be greater rather than less. 

This experiment I have not performed, but I am of the opinion 
that a musket-ball or cannon-shot, falling from a height as 
great as you please, will not deliver so strong a blow as it would 
if fired into a wall only a few cubits distant, i. e., at such a short 
range that the splitting or rending of the air will not be sufficient 
to rob the shot of that excess of supernatural violence given it by 
the powder. 

The enormous momentum [impeto] of these violent shots may 
cause some deformation of the trajectory, making the beginning 
of the parabola flatter and less curved than the end; but, so far as 
our Author is concerned, this is a matter of small consequence 
in practical operations, the main one of which is the preparation 
of a table of ranges for shots of high elevation, giving the dis- 
tance 



FOURTH DAY 257 

tance attained by the ball as a function of the angle of eleva- 
tion; and since shots of this kind are fired from mortars [mortari] 
using small charges and imparting no supernatural momentum 
[impeto sopranaturale] they follow their prescribed paths very 
exactly. 

But now let us proceed with the discussion in which the 
Author invites us to the study and investigation of the motion 
of a body [impeto del mobile] when that motion is compounded of 
two others; and first the case in which the two are uniform, the 
one horizontal, the other vertical. 

[280] 
THEOREM II, PROPOSITION II 

When the motion of a body is the resultant of two uniform 
motions, one horizontal, the other perpendicular, the square 
of the resultant momentum is equal to the sum of the 
squares of the two component momenta.* 
Let us imagine any body urged by two uniform motions and 
let ab represent the vertical displacement, while be represents 
the displacement which, in the same interval 
of time, takes place in a horizontal direc- 
tion. If then the distances ab and be are c 
traversed, during the same time-interval, ' 
iwith uniform motions the corresponding Fl S- I0 9 

'momenta will be to each other as the distances ab and be are to 
'each other; but the body which is urged by these two motions 
describes the diagonal ac; its momentum is proportional to ac. 
Also the square of ac is equal to the sum of the squares of ab 
and be. Hence the square of the resultant momentum is equal 
to the sum of the squares of the two momenta ab and be. Q. E. D. 
SIMP. At this point there is just one slight difficulty which 
needs to be cleared up; for it seems to me that the conclusion 

* In the original this theorem reads as follows: 

" Si aliquod mobile duplici motu esquabili moveatur, nempe orizontali et 
"perpendicularly impetus seu momentum lationis ex utroque motu com- 
posites erit potentia czqualis ambobus momentis priorum motuum" 

For the justification of this translation of the word "potentia" and 
of the use of the adjective "resultant" see p. 266 below. [Trans.] 




258 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

just reached contradicts a previous proposition * in which it is 
claimed that the speed [impeto] of a body coming from a to b is 
equal to that in coming from a to c; while now you conclude 
that the speed [impeto] at c is greater than that at b. 

SALV. Both propositions, Simplicio, are true, yet there is a 
great difference between them. Here we are speaking of a 
body urged by a single motion which is the resultant of two 
uniform motions, while there we were speaking of two bodies 
each urged with naturally accelerated motions, one along the 
vertical ab the other along the inclined plane ac. Besides the 
time-intervals were there not supposed to be equal, that along 
the incline ac being greater than that along the vertical ab; 
but the motions of which we now speak, those along ab, be, 
ac, are uniform and simultaneous. 

SIMP. Pardon me; I am satisfied; pray go on. 



SALV. Our Author next undertakes to explain what happens 
when a body is urged by a motion compounded of one which is 
horizontal and uniform and of another which is vertical but 
naturally accelerated; from these two components results the 
path of a projectile, which is a parabola. The problem is to 
determine the speed [impeto] of the projectile at each point. 
With this purpose in view our Author sets forth as follows the 
manner, or rather the method, of measuring such speed [impeto] 
along the path which is taken by a heavy body starting from 
rest and falling with a naturally accelerated motion. 

THEOREM III, PROPOSITION III 

Let the motion take place along the line ab, starting from 
rest at a, and in this line choose any point c. Let ac represent 
the time, or the measure of the time, required for the body to 
fall through the space ac; let ac also represent the velocity 
[impetus sen momentum] at c acquired by a fall through the 
distance ac. In the line ab select any other point b. The prob- 
lem now is to determine the velocity at b acquired by a body 
in falling through the distance ab and to express this in terms 
of the velocity at c, the measure of which is the length ac. Take 

* See p. 169 above. [Trans.] 



FOURTH DAY 259 

as a mean proportional between ac and ab. We shall prove 

that the velocity at b is to that at c as the length as is to the 

length ac. Draw the horizontal 

line cd, having twice the length 

of ac, and be, having twice the 

length of ba. It then follows, 

from the preceding theorems, 

that a body falling through the 

distance ac, and turned so as 



to move along the horizontal cd Fig. 1 10 

with a uniform speed equal to that acquired on reaching c 

[282] 

will traverse the distance cd in the same interval of time as 
that required to fall with accelerated motion from a to c. Like- 
wise be will be traversed in the same time as ba. But the time 
of descent through ab is as; hence the horizontal distance be 
is also traversed in the time as. Take a point / such that the 
time as is to the time ac as be is to bl; since the motion along 
be is uniform, the distance bl, if traversed with the speed [mo- 
mentum celeritatis] acquired at b, will occupy the time ac; but 
in this same time-interval, ac, the distance cd is traversed with 
the speed acquired in c. Now two speeds are to each other as 
the distances traversed in equal intervals of time. Hence the 
speed at c is to the speed at b as cd is to bl. But since dc is to 
be as their halves, namely, as ca is to ba, and since be is to bl 
as ba is to sa; it follows that dc is to bl as ca is to sa. In other 
words, the speed at c is to that at b as ca is to sa, that is, as the 
time of fall through ab. 

The method of measuring the speed of a body along the direc- 
tion of its fall is thus clear; the speed is assumed to increase 
direcflly as the time. 

But before we proceed further, since this discussion is to 
deal with the motion compounded of a uniform horizontal one 
and one accelerated vertically downwards the path of a pro- 
jecftile, namely, a parabola it is necessary that we define some 
common standard by which we may estimate the velocity, or 
momentum \velocitatem, impetum sen momentum] of both mo- 
tions 



2 6o THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

tions; and since from the innumerable uniform velocities one 
only, and that not selected at random, is to be compounded with 
a velocity acquired by naturally accelerated motion, I can 
think of no simpler way of selecting and measuring this than to 
assume another of the same kind.* For the sake of clearness, 
draw the vertical line ac to meet the horizontal line be. Ac is 
the height and be the amplitude of the semi-parabola ab, which 
is the resultant of the two motions, one that of a body falling 

[283] 

from rest at a, through the distance ac, with naturally ac- 
celerated motion, the other a uniform motion along the horizon- 
tal ad. The speed acquired at c by a fall 
/ through the distance ac is determined by 
the height ac; for the speed of a body fall- 
ing from the same elevation is always one 
and the same; but along the horizontal one 
may give a body an infinite number of uni- 
<k form speeds. However, in order that I may 
select one out of this multitude and sepa- 
rate it from the rest in a perfectly definite 
manner, I will extend the height ca upwards 
to e just as far as is necessary and will call 
this distance ae the "sublimity." Imagine 
a body to fall from rest at e; it is clear that 
we may make its terminal speed at a the 
same as that with which the same body- 
Fig, in travels along the horizontal line ad; this 
speed will be such that, in the time of descent along ea, it will 
describe a horizontal distance twice the length of ea. This 
preliminary remark seems necessary. 

The reader is reminded that above I have called the horizontal 
line cb the "amplitude" of the semi-parabola ab; the axis ac 
of this parabola, I have called its "altitude"; but the line ea the 
fall along which determines the horizontal speed I have called 
the "sublimity." These matters having been explained, I 
proceed with the demonstration. 

* Galileo here proposes to employ as a standard of velocity the terminal 
speed of a body falling freely from a given height. [ Trans.] 




FOURTH DAY 261 

SAGR. Allow me, please, to interrupt in order that I may 
point out the beautiful agreement between this thought of the 
Author and the views of Plato concerning the origin of the 
various uniform speeds with which the heavenly bodies revolve. 
The latter chanced upon the idea that a body could not pass 
from rest to any given speed and maintain it uniformly except 
by passing through all the degrees of speed intermediate between 
the given speed and rest. Plato thought that God, after having 
created the heavenly bodies, assigned them the proper and 
uniform speeds with which they were forever to revolve; and 
that He made them start from rest and move over definite dis- 
tances under a natural and rectilinear acceleration such as 
governs the motion of terrestrial bodies. He added that once 
these bodies had gained their proper and permanent speed, their 
rectilinear motion was converted into a circular one, the only 



. 

motion capable of maintaining uniformity, a motion in which 
the body revolves without either receding from or approaching 
its desired goal. This conception is truly worthy of Plato; and 
it is to be all the more highly prized since its underlying princi- 
ples remained hidden until discovered by our Author who re- 
moved from them the mask and poetical dress and set forth the 
idea in correct historical perspective. In view of the fact that 
astronomical science furnishes us such complete information 
concerning the size of the planetary orbits, the distances of 
these bodies from their centers of revolution, and their velocities, 
I cannot help thinking that our Author (to whom this idea of 
Plato was not unknown) had some curiosity to discover whether 
or not a definite "sublimity" might be assigned to each planet, 
such that, if it were to start from rest at this particular height 
and to fall with naturally accelerated motion along a straight line, 
and were later to change the speed thus acquired into uniform 
motion, the size of its orbit and its period of revolution would be 
those actually observed. 

SALV. I think I remember his having told me that he once 
made the computation and found a satisfactory correspondence 
with observation. But he did not wish to speak of it, lest in 

view 



262 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

view of the odium which his many new discoveries had already 
brought upon him, this might be adding fuel to the fire. But 
if any one desires such information he can obtain it for himself 
from the theory set forth in the present treatment. 
We now proceed with the matter in hand, which is to prove: 

PROBLEM I, PROPOSITION IV 

To determine the momentum of a projectile at each particular 
point in its given parabolic path. 

Let bee be the semi-parabola whose amplitude is cd and 
whose height is db, which latter extended upwards cuts the tan- 
gent of the parabola ca in a. Through the vertex draw the 
horizontal line bi parallel to cd. Now if the amplitude cd is 
equal to the entire height da, then bi will be equal to ba and 
also to bd; and if we take ab as the measure of the time re- 
quired for fall through the distance ab and also of the momen- 
tum acquired at b in consequence of its fall from rest at a, then 
if. we turn into a horizontal direction the momentum acquired 
by fall through ab [impetum ab] the space traversed in the same 
interval of time will be represented by dc which is twice bi. But 
a body which falls from rest at b along the line bd will during 
the same time-interval fall through the height of the parabola 

[285] 

bd. Hence a body falling from rest at a, turned into a horizontal 
direction with the speed ab will traverse a space equal to dc. 
Now if one superposes upon this motion a fall along bd, travers- 
ing the height bd while the parabola be is described, then the 
momentum of the body at the terminal point c is the resultant 
of a uniform horizontal momentum, whose value is represented 
by ab, and of another momentum acquired by fall from b to the 
terminal point d or c; these two momenta are equal. If, there- 
fore, we take ab to be the measure of one of these momenta, 
say, the uniform horizontal one, then bi, which is equal to bd, 
will represent the momentum acquired at d or c; and ia will 
represent the resultant of these two momenta, that is, the total 
momentum with which the projectile, travelling along the pa- 
rabola, strikes at c. 

With 




FOURTH DAY 263 

With this in mind let us take any point on the parabola, say 
e, and determine the momentum with which the projectile 
passes that point. Draw the horizontal ef and take bg a mean 
proportional between bd and bf. Now since ab, or bd, is as- 
sumed to be the measure of the 
time and of the momentum [mo- 
mentum velocitatis] acquired by fall- 
ing from rest at b through the dis- 
tance bdy it follows that bg will 
measure the time and also the 
momentum [impetus] acquired at / 
by fall from b. If therefore we lay 
off bo, equal to bg, the diagonal line 
joining a and o will represent the- 
momentum at the point e; because -' 
the length ah has been assumed to 
represent the momentum at b Fig- 

which, after diversion into a horizontal direction, remains con- 
stant; and because bo measures the momentum at / or e, ac- 
quired by fall, from rest at b, through the height bf. But the 
square of ao equals the sum of the squares of ab and bo. Hence 
the theorem sought. 

SAGR. The manner in which you compound these different 
momenta to obtain their resultant strikes me as so novel that 
my mind is left in no small confusion. I do not refer to the 
composition of two uniform motions, even when unequal, and 
when one takes place along a horizontal, the other along a 
vertical direction; because in this case I am thoroughly con- 
vinced that the resultant is a motion whose square is equal to the 
sum of the squares of the two components. The confusion 
arises when one undertakes to compound a uniform horizontal 
motion with a vertical one which is naturally accelerated. I 
trust, therefore, we may pursue this discussion more at length. 

[286] 

SIMP. And I need this even more than you since I am not yet 
as clear in my mind as I ought to be concerning those funda- 
mental propositions upon which the others rest. Even in the 

case 



264 THE TWO NEW_ SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

case of the two uniform motions, one horizontal, the other 
perpendicular, I wish to understand better the manner in which 
you obtain the resultant from the components. Now, Salviati, 
you understand what we need and what we desire. 

SALV. Your request is altogether reasonable and I will see 
whether my long consideration of these matters will enable me 
to make them clear to you. But you must excuse me if in the 
explanation I repeat many things already said by the Author. 

Concerning motions and their velocities or momenta [movi- 
menti e lor velocita o impeti\ whether uniform or naturally ac- 
celerated, one cannot speak definitely until he has established 
a measure for such velocities and also for time. As for time we 
have the already widely adopted hours, first minutes and second 
minutes. So for velocities, just as for intervals of time, there is 
need of a common standard which shall be understood and 
accepted by everyone, and which shall be the same for all. As 
has already been stated, the Author considers the velocity of a 
freely falling body adapted to this purpose, since this velocity 
increases according to the same law in all parts of the world; 
thus for instance the speed acquired by a leaden ball of a pound 
weight starting from rest and falling vertically through the 
height of, say, a spear's length is the same in all places; it is 
therefore excellently adapted for representing the momentum 
[impeto] acquired in the case of natural fall. 

It still remains for us to discover a method of measuring 
momentum in the case of uniform motion in such a way that all 
who discuss the subject will form the same conception of its 
size and velocity [grandezza e velocita]. This will prevent one 
person from imagining it larger, another smaller, than it really 
is; so that in the composition of a given uniform motion with 
one which is accelerated different men may not obtain different 
values for the resultant. In order to determine and represent 
such a momentum and particular speed [impeto e velocita partico- 
lare] our Author has found no better method than to use the 
momentum acquired by a body in naturally accelerated motion. 

[287]. 

The speed of a body which has in this manner acquired any 

momentum 



FOURTH DAY 265 

momentum whatever will, when converted into uniform motion, 
retain precisely such a speed as, during a time-interval equal to 
that of the fall, will carry the body through a distance equal to 
twice that of the fall. But since this matter is one which is 
fundamental in our discussion it is well that we make it per- 
fedlly clear by means of some particular example. 

Let us consider the speed and momentum acquired by a body 
falling through the height, say, of a spear [picca] as a standard 
which we may use in the measurement of other speeds and 
momenta as occasion demands; assume for instance that the 
time of such a fall is four seconds [minuti secondi d'ora]; now in 
order to measure the speed acquired from a fall through any 
other height, whether greater or less, one must not conclude 
that these speeds bear to one another the same ratio as the 
'heights of fall; for instance, it is not true that a fall through four 
times a given height confers a speed four times as great as that 
acquired by descent through the given height; because the 
speed of a naturally accelerated motion does not vary in pro- 
portion to the time. As has been shown above, the ratio of the 
spaces is equal to the square of the ratio of the times. 

If, then, as is often done for the sake of brevity, we take 
the same limited straight line as the measure of the speed, and 
of the time, and also of the space traversed during that 
time, it follows that the duration of fall and the speed 
acquired by the same body in passing over any other , 
distance, is not represented by this second distance, but " 
by a mean proportional between the two distances. 
This I can better illustrate by an example. In the ver- .J.J 
^ical line ac, lay off the portion ab to represent the dis- 
nce traversed by a body falling freely with acceler- 
ted motion: the time of fall may be represented by any 
imited straight line, but for the sake of brevity, we shall 
represent it by the same length ab; this length may also 

employed as a measure of the momentum and speed " 
.cquired during the motion; in short, let ab be a measure of 
he various physical quantities which enter this discussion. 
Having agreed arbitrarily upon ab as a measure of these 

three 



266 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

three different quantities, namely, space, time, and momentum, 
our next task is to find the time required for fall through a 

[288] 

given vertical distance ac, also the momentum acquired at the 
terminal point c, both of which are to be expressed in terms of 
the time and momentum represented by ab. These two required 
quantities are obtained by laying off ad, a mean proportional 
between ab and ac; in other words, the time of fall from a to c is 
represented by ad on the same scale on which we agreed that 
the time of fall from a tab should be represented by ab. In like 
manner we may say that the momentum [impeto o grado di 
velocita] acquired at c is related to that acquired at b, in the same 
manner that the line ad is related to ab, since the velocity varies 
directly as the time, a conclusion, which although employed 
as a postulate in Proposition III, is here amplified by the 
Author. 

This point being clear and well-established we pass to the 
consideration of the momentum [impeto] in the case of two 
compound motions, one of which is compounded of a uniform 
horizontal and a uniform vertical motion, while the other is 
compounded of a uniform horizontal and a naturally accelerated 
vertical motion. If both components are uniform, and one at 
right angles to the other, we have already seen that the square of 
the resultant is obtained by adding the squares of the compo- 
nents [p. 257] as will be clear from the following illustration. 

Let us imagine a body to move along the vertical ab with a 
uniform momentum [impeto] of 3, and on reaching b to move 
a toward c with a momentum [velocita ed 
impeto] of 4, so that during the same time- 
interval it will traverse 3 cubits along the 
vertical and 4 along the horizontal. But a 
t particle which moves with the resultant ve- 



Fig. 114 locity [velocita] will, in the same time, trav- 

erse the diagonal ac, whose length is not 7 cubits the sum of 
ab (3) and be (4) but 5, which is in potenza equal to the sum 
of 3 and 4, that is, the squares of 3 and 4 when added make 25, 
which is the square of ac, and is equal to the sum of the squares 

of 



FOURTH DAY 267 

of ab and be. Hence ac is represented by the side or we may 
say the root of a square whose area is 25, namely 5. 

As a fixed and certain rule for obtaining the momentum which 

[289] 

results from two uniform momenta, one vertical, the other 
horizontal, we have therefore the following: take the square of 
each, add these together, and extra (ft the square root of the sum, 
which will be the momentum resulting from the two. Thus, in 
the above example, the body which in virtue of its vertical 
motion would strike the horizontal plane with a momentum 
[forza] of 3, would owing to its horizontal motion alone strike at 
if with a momentum of 4; but if the body strikes with a momen- 
tum which is the resultant of these two, its blow will be that of a 
body moving with a momentum [velocita e forza] of 5 ; and such a 
blow will be the same at all points of the diagonal ac, since its 
components are always the same and never increase or diminish. 

Let us now pass to the consideration of a uniform horizontal 
motion compounded with the vertical motion of a freely falling 
body starting from rest. It is at once clear that the diagonal 
which represents the motion compounded of these two is not a 
straight line, but, as has been demonstrated, a semi-parabola, 
in which the momentum [impeto] is always increasing because 
the speed [velocita] of the vertical component is always increas- 
ing. Wherefore, to determine the momentum [impeto] at any 
given point in the parabolic diagonal, it is necessary first to 
x upon the uniform horizontal momentum [impeto] and then, 
[treating the body as one falling freely, to find the vertical 
momentum at the given point; this latter can be determined 
t>nly by taking into account the duration of fall, a consideration 
which does not enter into the composition of two uniform mo- 
ions where the velocities and momenta are always the same; 
nit here where one of the component motions has an initial 
value of zero and increases its speed [velocita] in direcft proportion 
to the time, it follows that the time must determine the speed 
velocita] at the assigned point. It only remains to obtain the 
momentum resulting from these two components (as in the case 
of uniform motions) by placing the square of the resultant equal 

to 



268 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

to the sum of the squares of the two components. But her 
again it is better to illustrate by means of an example. 

On the vertical ac lay off any portion ab which we shall em 
ploy as a measure of the space traversed by a body falling freely 
along the perpendicular, likewise as a measure of the time and 
also of the speed [grado di velocita] or, we may say, of the mo- 
menta [impeti\. It is at once clear that if the momentum of a 

[290] 

body at b, after having fallen from rest at a, be diverted along 
the horizontal direction bd, with uniform motion, its speed will 
be such that, during the time-interval ab, it will traverse a 
distance which is represented by the line bd and which is twice as 

great as ab. Now choose a 
4 point c, such that be shall be 
equal to ab, and through c 
draw the line ce equal and 
parallel to bd; through the 
points b and e draw the pa- 
rabola bei. And since, during 
the time-interval ab, the hori- 
zontal distance bd or ce, double 
the length ab, is traversed with 
c the momentum ab, and since 
during an equal time-interval 
/ the vertical distance be is trav- 
ersed, the body acquiring at c 
a momentum represented by 
the same horizontal, bd, it fol- 







t 



IX 5 



lows that during the time ab the body will pass from b to e along 
the parabola be, and will reach e with a momentum compounded 
of two momenta each equal to ab. And since one of these is 
horizontal and the other vertical, the square of the resultant mo- 
mentum is equal to the sum of the squares of these two compo- 
nents, i. e., equal to twice either one of them. 

Therefore, if we lay off the distance bf, equal to ba, and draw 
the diagonal af, it follows that the momentum [impeto e per- 
cossa] at e will exceed that of a body at b after having fallen from 



FOURTH DAY 269 

a, or what is the same thing, will exceed the horizontal momen- 
tum [percossa deirimpeto] along bd, in the ratio of of to ab. 

Suppose now we choose for the height of fall a distance bo 
which is not equal to but greater than ab, and suppose that bg 
represents a mean proportional between ba and bo; then, still re- 
taining ba as a measure of the distance fallen through, from rest 
at a, to b 9 also as a measure of the time and of the momentum 
which the falling body acquires at b, it follows that bg will be 
the measure of the time and also of the momentum which the 
body acquires in falling from b to o. Likewise just as the momen- 
tum ab during the time ab carried the body a distance along the 
horizontal equal to twice ab, so now, during the time-interval 
bg, the body will be carried in a horizontal direction through a 
distance which is greater in the ratio of bg to ba. Lay off Ib 
equal to bg and draw the diagonal al, from which we have a 
quantity compounded of two velocities [impeti\ one horizontal, 
the other vertical ; these determine the parabola. The horizontal 
and uniform velocity is that acquired at b in falling from a; the 
other is that acquired at o, or, we may say, at i, by a body falling 
through the distance bo, during a time measured by the line bg, 

[291] 

which line bg also represents the momentum of the body. And 
in like manner we may, by taking a mean proportional between 
the two heights, determine the momentum [impeto] at the 
extreme end of the parabola where the height is less than the 
sublimity ab; this mean proportional is to be drawn along the 
horizontal in place of bf, and also another diagonal in place of 
af, which diagonal will represent the momentum at the extreme 
end of the parabola. 

To what has hitherto been said concerning the momenta, 
blows or shocks of projectiles, we must add another very im- 
portant consideration; to determine the force and energy of the 
shock [forza ed energia della percossa] it is not sufficient to con- 
sider only the speed of the projectiles, but we must also take into 
account the nature and condition of the target which, in no 
small degree, determines the efficiency of the blow. First of all 
it is well known that the target suffers violence from the speed 

[velocita] 



270 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

[velocita] of the projedlile in proportion as it partly or entirely 
stops the motion; because if the blow falls upon an object which 
yields to the impulse [velocita del percuziente] without resistance 
such a blow will be of no effect; likewise when one attacks his 
enemy with a spear and overtakes him at an instant when he is 
fleeing with equal speed there will be no blow but merely a 
harmless touch. But if the shock falls upon an object which 
yields only in part then the blow will not have its full effect, 
but the damage will be in proportion to the excess of the speed 
of the projectile over that of the receding body; thus, for exam- 
ple, if the shot reaches the target with a speed of 10 while the 
latter recedes with a speed of 4, the momentum and shock 
[impeto e percossa] will be represented by 6. Finally the blow 
will be a maximum, in so far as the projedlile is concerned, when 
the target does not recede at all but if possible completely re- 
sists and stops the motion of the projedlile. I have said in so 
far as the projectile is concerned because if the target should 
approach the projectile the shock of collision [colpo e Vincontro\ 
would be greater in proportion as the sum of the two speeds is 
greater than that of the projedlile alone. 

Moreover it is to be observed that the amount of yielding in 
the target depends not only upon the quality of the material, 
as regards hardness, whether it be of iron, lead, wool, etc., but 

[292] 

also upon its position. If the position is such that the shot 
strikes it at right angles, the momentum imparted by the blow 
[impeto del colpo] will be a maximum; but if the motion be 
oblique, that is to say slanting, the blow will be weaker; and 
more and more so in proportion to the obliquity; for, no matter 
how hard the material of the target thus situated, the entire 
momentum [impeto e moto] of the shot will not be spent and 
stopped; the projectile will slide by and will, to some extent, 
continue its motion along the surface of the opposing body. 

All that has been said above concerning the amount of momen- 
tum in the projedlile at the extremity of the parabola must be 
understood to refer to a blow received on a line at right angles to 
this parabola or along the tangent to the parabola at the given 

point 



FOURTH DAY 271 

point; for, even though the motion has two components, one 
horizontal, the other vertical, neither will the momentum along 
the horizontal nor that upon a plane perpendicular to the 
horizontal be a maximum, since each of these will be received 
obliquely. 

SAGR. Your having mentioned these blows and shocks recalls 
to my mind a problem, or rather a question, in mechanics of 
which no author has given a solution or said anything which 
diminishes my astonishment or even partly relieves my mind. 

My difficulty and surprise consist in not being able to see 
whence and upon what principle is derived the energy and im- 
mense force [energia eforza immensa] which makes its appearance 
in a blow; for instance we see the simple blow of a hammer, 
weighing not more than 8 or 10 Ibs., overcoming resistances 
which, without a blow, would not yield to the weight of a body 
producing impetus by pressure alone, even though that body 
weighed many hundreds of pounds. I would like to discover a 
method of measuring the force [fprza] of such a percussion. I can 
hardly think it infinite, but incline rather to the view that it has 
its limit and can be counterbalanced and measured by other 
forces, such as weights, or by levers or screws or other mechanical 
instruments which are used to multiply forces in a manner which 
I satisfactorily understand. 

SALV. You are not alone in your surprise at this effect or in 
obscurity as to the cause of this remarkable property. I studied 
this matter myself for a while in vain; but my confusion merely 
increased until finally meeting our Academician I received from 

[293] 

him great consolation. First he told me that he also had for a 
long time been groping in the dark; but later he said that, after 
having spent some thousands of hours in speculating and con- 
templating thereon, he had arrived at some -notions which are 
far removed from our earlier ideas and which are remarkable 
for their novelty. And since now I know that you would gladly 
hear what these novel ideas are I shall not wait for you to ask 
but promise that, as soon as our discussion of projectiles is 
completed, I will explain all these fantasies, or if you please, 

vagaries 



272 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

vagaries, as far as I can recall them from the words of our 
Academician. In the meantime we proceed with the proposi- 
tions of the author. 

PROPOSITION V, PROBLEM 

Having given a parabola, find the point, in its axis extended 
upwards, from which a particle must fall in order to describe 
this same parabola. 

Let ab be the given parabola, hb its amplitude, and he its axis 
extended. The problem is to find the point e from which a body 
must fall in order that, after the momentum which it acquires at 
a has been diverted into a horizontal direction, it will describe 
the parabola ab. Draw the horizontal ag, parallel to bh, and 

_e having laid off af equal to ah, 
draw the straight line bf which 
will be a tangent to the parab- 
ola at b, and will intersect the 
horizontal ag at g: choose e such 
that ag will be a mean propor- 
tional between af and ae. Now 
I say that e is the point above 
sought. That is, if a body falls 
r from rest at this point e y and if 
the momentum acquired at the 
II6 point a be diverted into a hori- 

zontal direction, and compounded with the momentum ac- 
quired at h in falling from rest at a, then the body will describe 
the parabola ab. For if we understand ea to be the measure of 
the time of fall from e to a, and also of the momentum acquired 
at a, then ag (which is a mean proportional between ea and af) 
will represent the time and momentum of fall from / to a or, 
what is the same thing, from a to h; and since a body falling from 
e, during the time ea, will, owing to the momentum acquired at 
a, traverse at uniform speed a horizontal distance which is 
twice ea, it follows that, the body will if impelled by the same 
momentum, during the time-interval ag traverse a distance 
equal to twice ag which is the half of bh. This is true because, 

in 




FOURTH DAY 273 

in the case of uniform motion, the spaces traversed vary di- 
rectly as the times. And likewise if the motion be vertical and 
start from rest, the body will describe the distance ah in the 

[294] 

time ag. Hence the amplitude bh and the altitude ah are trav- 
ersed by a body in the same time. Therefore the parabola ab 
will be described by a body falling from the sublimity of e. 

Q. E. F. 

COROLLARY 

Hence it follows that half the base, or amplitude, of the semi- 
parabola (which is one-quarter of the entire amplitude) is a mean 
proportional between its altitude and the sublimity from which 
a falling body will describe this same parabola. 

PROPOSITION VI, PROBLEM 

Given the sublimity and the altitude of a parabola, to find 

its amplitude. 

Let the line ac, in which lie the given altitude cb and sub- 
limity ab y be perpendicular to 
the horizontal line cd. The prob- 
lem is to find the amplitude, 
along the horizontal cd y of the 
semi-parabola which is described 
with the sublimity ba and alti- 
tude be. Lay off cd equal to 
twice the mean proportional be- 
tween cb and ba. Then cd will 
be the amplitude sought, as is 
evident from the preceding prop- J t 



osition. Fig. 117 

THEOREM. PROPOSITION VII 

If projectiles describe semi-parabolas of the same ampli- 
tude, the momentum required to describe that one whose 
amplitude is double its altitude is less than that required 
for any other. 

Let 



274 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

Let bd be a semi-parabola whose amplitude cd is double its 
altitude cb; on its axis extended upwards lay off ba equal to its 
altitude be. Draw the line ad which will be a tangent to the 
parabola at d and will cut the horizontal line be at the point 
^, making be equal to be and also to ba. It is evident that this 
parabola will be described by a projectile whose uniform horizon- 
tal momentum is that which it would acquire at b in falling from 
rest at a and whose naturally accelerated vertical momentum is 
that of the body falling to c, from rest at b. From this it follows 







Fig. 118 

that the momentum at the terminal point d, compounded of 
these two, is represented by the diagonal ae, whose square is 
equal to the sum of the squares of the two components. Now 
let gd be any other parabola whatever having the same ampli- 
tude cd, but whose altitude eg is either greater or less than the 
altitude be. Let hd be the tangent cutting the horizontal 

[295] 

through g at k. Select a point / such that hg:gk =gk:gl. Then 
from a preceding proposition [V], it follows that gl will be the 

height 



FOURTH DAY 275 

height from which a body must fall in order to describe the 
parabola gd. 

Let gm be a mean proportional between ab and gl; then gm 
will [Prop. IV] represent the time and momentum acquired at 
g by a fall from /; for ab has been assumed as a measure of both 
time and momentum. Again let gn be a mean proportional 
between be and eg; it will then represent the time and momen- 
tum which the body acquires at c in falling from g. If now we 
join m and n, this line mn will represent the momentum at d of 
the projectile traversing the parabola dg; which momentum is, 
I say, greater than that of the projectile travelling along the 
parabola bd whose measure was given by ae. For since gn has 
been taken as a mean proportional between be and gc; and since 
be is equal to be and also to kg (each of them being the half of 
dc) it follows that cg:gn =gn:gk, and as eg or (kg) is to gk so is 
ng 2 to gk 2 : but by contraction hg:gk=gk:gl. Hence ng 2 : 
gk 2 =gk:gl. But gk:gl=gk 2 : gm 2 , since gm is a mean propor- 
tional between kg and gl. Therefore the three ^quares ng, kg, 
mg form a continued proportion, gn 2 : gk 2 = gk 2 : gm. 2 And the 
sum of the two extremes which is equal to the square of mn is 
greater than twice the square of gk; but the square of ae is 
double the square of gk. Hence the square of mn is greater than 
the square of ae and the length mn is greater than the length ae. 

Q. E. D. 

[296] 

COROLLARY 

Conversely it is evident that less momentum will be required 
to send a projectile from the terminal point d along the parabola 
bd than along any other parabola having an elevation greater or 
less than that of the parabola bd, for which the tangent at d 
makes an angle of 45 with the horizontal. From which it 
follows that if projectiles are fired from the terminal point d, all 
having the same speed, but each having a different elevation, the 
maximum range, i. e., amplitude of the semi-parabola or of the 
entire parabola, will be obtained when the elevation is 45: the 

other 






276 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

other shots, fired at angles greater or less will have a shorter 
range. 

SAGR. The force of rigid demonstrations such as occur only 
in mathematics fills me with wonder and delight. From ac- 
counts given by gunners, I was already aware of the fact that 
in the use of cannon and mortars, the maximum range, that is 
the one in which the shot goes farthest, is obtained when the 
elevation is 45 or, as they say, at the sixth point of the quad- 
rant; but to understand why this happens far outweighs the 
mere information obtained by the testimony of others or even 
by repeated experiment. 

SALV. What you say is very true. The knowledge of a single 
fact acquired through a discovery of its causes prepares the 
mind to understand and ascertain other facts without need 
of recourse to experiment, precisely as in the present case, 
where by argumentation alone the Author proves with certainty 
that the maximum range occurs when the elevation is 45. He 
thus demonstrates what has perhaps never been observed in 
experience, namely, that of other shots those which exceed or 
fall short of 45 by equal amounts have equal ranges; so that 
if the balls have been fired one at an elevation of 7 points, the 
other at 5, they will strike the level at the same distance: the 
same is true if the shots are fired at 8 and at 4 points, at 9 and at 
3, etc. Now let us hear the demonstration of this. 

[297] 

THEOREM. PROPOSITION VIII 

The amplitudes of two parabolas described by projectiles 
fired with the same speed, but at angles of elevation which 
exceed and fall short of 45 by equal amounts, are equal 
to each other. 

In the triangle mcb let the horizontal side be and the vertical 
cm, which form a right angle at c, be equal to each other; then 
the angle mbc will be a semi-right angle; let the line cm be pro- 
longed to d, such a point that the two angles at b, namely mbe 
and mbd, one above and the other below the diagonal mb, shall 
be equal. It is now to be proved that in the case of two parabolas 

described 




FOURTH DAY 277 

described by two projectiles fired from b with the same speed, 
one at the angle of ebc, the other at the angle of dbc, their am- 
plitudes will be equal. Now since the external angle bmc is 
equal to the sum of the internal angles mdb and dbm we may also 
equate to them the angle mbc; but if we re- 
place the angle dbm by mbe, then this same 
angle mbc is equal to the two mbe and bdc: 
and if we subtract from each side of this 
equation the angle mbe, we have the remain- 
der bdc equal to the remainder ebc. Hence 
the two triangles deb and bee are similar. 
Bisect the straight lines dc and ec in the 
points h and /: and draw the lines hi and fg 
parallel to the horizontal cb, and choose / 
such that dh:hi = ih:hl. Then the triangle ihl 
will be similar to ihd, and also to the triangle 
egf; and since ih and gf are equal, each being *% * *9 
half of be, it follows that hi is equal to fe and also to fc; and if 
we add to each of these the common part fh, it will be seen that 
ch is equal to//. 

Let us now imagine a parabola described through the points 
h and b whose altitude is he and sublimity hi. Its amplitude will 
be cb which is double the length hi since hi is a mean proportional 
between dh (or ch) and hi. The line db is tangent to the parabola 
at b, since ch is equal to hd. If again we imagine a parabola 
described through the points / and b, with a sublimity // and 
altitude fc, of which the mean proportional is fg, or one-half of 
cb, then, as before, will cb be the amplitude and the line eb a 
tangent at b; for ef andfc are equal. 

[298] 

But the two angles dbc and ebc 9 the angles of elevation, differ 
by equal amounts from a 45 angle. Hence follows the proposi- 
tion. 

THEOREM. PROPOSITION IX 

The amplitudes of two parabolas are equal when their alti- 
tudes and sublimities are inversely proportional. 

Let 




Fig. 120 



278 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

Let the altitude gf of the parabola fk bear to the altitude cb 
of the parabola bd the same ratio which the sublimity ba bears to 
the sublimity />; then I say the amplitude kg is equal to the 
amplitude dc. For since the first of these quantities, gf, bears to 

<Tthe second cb the same 
ratio which the third, 
ba, bears to the fourth 
fe, it follows that the 
area of the rectangle 
-gf.fe is equal to that of 
b the rectangle cb.ba; 
therefore squares 
which are equal to 
these rectangles are 
equal to each other. 
But [by Proposition VI] the square of half of gh is equal to the 
rectangle gf.fe; and the square of half of cd is equal to the rec- 
tangle cb.ba. Therefore these squares and their sides and the 
doubles of their sides are equal. But these last are the ampli- 
tudes gh and cd. Hence follows the proposition. 

LEMMA FOR THE FOLLOWING PROPOSITION 

If a straight line be cut at any point whatever and mean pro- 
portionals between this line and each of its parts be taken, 
the sum of the squares of these mean proportionals is equal 
to the square of the entire line. 
Let the line ab be cut at c. Then I say that the square of the 

mean proportional between ab and ac plus 

the square of the mean proportional between 

ab and cb is equal to the square of the whole 

line ab. This is evident as soon as we de- 

scribe a semicircle upon the entire line ab, al 

erect a perpendicular cd at c, and draw da 

and db. For da is a mean proportional between ab and ac while 

[299] 

db is a mean proportional between ab and be: and since the 
angle adb, inscribed in a semicircle, is a right angle the sum of 

the 




I21 



FOURTH DAY 279 

the squares of the lines da and db is equal to the square of the 
entire line ab. Hence follows the proposition. 

THEOREM. PROPOSITION X 

The momentum [impetus sen momentum] acquired by a 
particle at the terminal point of any semi-parabola is equal 
to that which it would acquire in falling through a vertical 
distance equal to the sum of the sublimity and die altitude 
of the semi-parabola.* 

Let ab be a semi-parabola having a sublimity da and an altitude 
ac, the sum of which is the perpendicular dc. Now , 

I say the momentum of the particle at b is the same 
as that which it would acquire in falling freely from 
d to c. Let us take the length of dc itself as a 
measure of time and momentum, and lay off cf 
equal to the mean proportional between cd and 
da; also lay off ce a mean proportional between 
cd and ca. Now cf is the measure of the time and 
of the momentum acquired by fall, from rest at 
d, through the distance da; while ce is the time 
and momentum of fall, from rest at 0, through^ 
the distance ca; also the diagonal ef will repre-$ 




sent a momentum which is the resultant of these Fig. I22 
two, and is therefore the momentum at the terminal point of 
the parabola, b. 

And since dc has been cut at some point a and since cf and 
ce are mean proportionals between the whole of cd and its parts, 
da and ac, it follows, from the preceding lemma, that the sum 
of the squares of these mean proportionals is equal to the square 
of the whole: but the square of ef is also equal to the sum of 
these same squares; whence it follows that the line ef is equal to 
dc. 

Accordingly the momentum acquired at c by a particle in 
falling from d is the same as that acquired at b by a particle 
traversing the parabola ab. Q. E. D. 

* In modern mechanics this well-known theorem assumes the following 
form: The speed of a projectile at any point is that produced by a fall from 
the directrix. [Trans.] 



280 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 



COROLLARY 

Hence it follows that, in the case of all parabolas where the 
sum of the sublimity and altitude is a constant, the momentum 
at the terminal point is a constant. 

PROBLEM. PROPOSITION XI 

Given the amplitude and the speed [impetus] at the ter- 
minal point of a semi-parabola, to find its altitude. 
Let the given speed be represented by the vertical line ab, and 
the amplitude by the horizontal line be; it is required to find 
the sublimity of the semi-parabola whose terminal speed is ab 
and amplitude be. From what precedes [Cor. Prop. V] it is 
clear that half the amplitude be is a mean proportional between 

[300] 

the altitude and sublimity of the parabola of which the terminal 
speed is equal, in accordance with the preceding proposition, to 

the speed acquired by a body in falling 
from rest at a through the distance ab. 
<7 Therefore the line ba must be cut at a 
point such that the rectangle formed by 
its two parts will be equal to the square 
of half be, namely bd. Necessarily, there- 
e fore, bd must not exceed the half of ba; 
for of all the rectangles formed by parts 
of a straight line the one of greatest area 
is obtained when the line is divided into 
two equal parts. Let e be the middle 
I point of the line ab; and now if bd be 
/ equal to be the problem is solved; for be 
will be the altitude and ea the sublimity 
Fl g- I2 3 of the parabola. (Incidentally we may 

observe a consequence already demonstrated, namely: of all 
parabolas described with any given terminal speed that for 
which the elevation is 45 will have the maximum amplitude.) 
But suppose that bd is less than half of ba which is to be 

divided 




FOURTH DAY 281 

divided in such a way that the rectangle upon its parts may be 
equal to the square of bd. Upon ea as diameter describe a semi- 
circle efa, in which draw the chord of, equal to bd: join fe and 
lay off the distance eg equal to fe. Then the rectangle bg.ga 
plus the square of eg will be equal to the square of ea, and hence 
also to the sum of the squares of af andfe. If now we subtract 
the equal squares of fe and ge there remains the rectangle bg.ga 
equal to the square of af, that is, of bd, a line which is a mean 
proportional between bg and ga; from which it is evident that 
the semi-parabola whose amplitude is be and whose terminal 
speed [impetus] is represented by ba has an altitude bg and a 
sublimity ga. 

If however we lay off bi equal to ga, then bi will be the alti- 
tude of the semi-parabola ic, and ia will be its sublimity. From 
the preceding demonstration we are able to solve the following 
problem. 

PROBLEM. PROPOSITION XII 

To compute and tabulate the amplitudes of all semi- 
parabolas which are described by projectiles fired with the 
same initial speed [impetus], 

From the foregoing it follows that, whenever the sum of 
the altitude and sublimity is a constant vertical height for 
any set of parabolas, these parabolas are described by pro- 
jectiles having the same initial speed; all vertical heights thus 

[301] 

obtained are therefore included between two parallel horizontal 
lines. Let cb represent a horizontal line and ab a vertical line 
of equal length; draw the diagonal ac; the angle acb will be one 
of 45 ; let d be the middle point of the vertical line ab. Then the 
semi-parabola dc is the one which is determined by the sub- 
limity ad and the altitude db, while its terminal speed at c is 
that which would be acquired at b by a particle falling from rest 
at a. If now ag be drawn parallel to be, the sum of the altitude 
and sublimity for any other semi-parabola having the same 
terminal speed will, in the manner explained, be equal to the 
distance between the parallel lines ag and be. Moreover, since 

it 



282 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

it has already been shown that the amplitudes of two semi- 
parabolas are the same when their angles of elevation differ from 
45 by like amounts, it follows that the same computation which 
is employed for the larger elevation will serve also for the smaller. 

Let us also assume 10000 as the 
greatest amplitude for a parabola 
whose angle of elevation is 45; this 
then will be the length of the line 
ba and the amplitude of the semi- 
a , parabola be. This number, 10000, 
is selected because in these calcula- 
tions we employ a table of tangents 
/in which this is the value of the 
tangent of 45. And now, coming 
J down to business, draw the straight 
line ce making an acute angle ecb 
greater than acb: the problem now 
is to draw the semi-parabola to 
which the line ec is a tangent and 
for which the sum of the sublimity 
Fig. 124 and the altitude is the distance ba. 

Take the length of the tangent* be from the table of tan- 
gents, using the angle bee as an argument: let /be the middle 
point of be; next find a third proportional to bf and bi (the 
half of be), which is of necessity greater than ja.\ Call this 
fo. We have now discovered that, for the parabola inscribed 

[302] 

in the triangle ecb having the tangent ce and the amplitude 
cb, the altitude is bf and the sublimity fo. But the total length 
of bo exceeds the distance between the parallels ag and cb, 
while our problem was to keep it equal to this distance: for 
both the parabola sought and the parabola dc are described 
* The reader will observe that the word "tangent" is here used in a 
sense somewhat different from that of the preceding sentence. The 
"tangent ec" is a line which touches the parabola at c; but the "tan- 
gent eb" is the side of the right-angled triangle which lies opposite the 
angle ecb, a line whose length is proportional to the numerical value of 
the tangent of this angle. [Trans.} 

f This fact is demonstrated in the third paragraph below. [Trans.] 




FOURTH DAY 283 

by projectiles fired from c with the same speed. Now since an 
infinite number of greater and smaller parabolas, similar to 
each other, may be described within the angle bee we must find 
another parabola which like cd has for the sum of its altitude and 
sublimity the height ba, equal to be. 

Therefore lay off cr so that, ob:ba =bc:cr; then cr will be the 
amplitude of a semi-parabola for which bee is the angle of eleva- 
tion and for which the sum of the altitude and sublimity is the 
distance between the parallels ga and cb, as desired. The process 
is therefore as follows: One draws the tangent of the given 
angle bee; takes half of this tangent, and adds to it the quantity, 
fo, which is a third proportional to the half of this tangent and 
the half of be; the desired amplitude cr is then found from the 
following proportion ob:ba=be:er. For example let the angle 
ecb be one of 50; its tangent is 11918, half of which, namely bf, 
is 5959; half of be is 5000; the third proportional of these halves 
is 4195, which added to bf gives the value 10154 for bo. Further, 
as ob is to ah, that is, as 10154 ' 1S to loooo, so is be, or loooo (each 
being the tangent of 45) to er, which is the amplitude sought 
and which has the value 9848, the maximum amplitude being 
be, or loooo. The amplitudes of the entire parabolas are double 
these, namely, 19696 and 20000. This is also the amplitude of a 
parabola whose angle of elevation is 40, since it deviates by an 
equal amount from one of 45. 

[303] 

SAGR. In order to thoroughly understand this demonstration 
I need to be shown how the third proportional of bf and bi is, as 
the Author indicates, necessarily greater than fa. 

SALV. This result can, I think, be obtained as follows. The 
square of the mean proportional between two lines is equal to the 
rectangle formed by these two lines. Therefore the square of 
bi (or of bd which is equal to hi) must be equal to the rectangle 
formed by fb and the desired third proportional. This third 
proportional is necessarily greater than fa because the rectangle 
formed by bf and fa is less than the square of bd by an amount 
equal to the square of df, as shown in Euclid, II. I. Besides it is 
to be observed that the point f, which is the middle point of the 

tangent 



284 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

tangent eb, falls in general above a and only once at a; in which 
cases it is self-evident that the third proportional to the half 
of the tangent and to the sublimity bi lies wholly above a. But 
the Author has taken a case where it is not evident that the 
third proportional is always greater than fa, so that when laid 
off above the point/ it extends beyond the parallel ag. 

Now let us proceed. It will be worth while, by the use of this 
table, to compute another giving the altitudes of these semi- 
parabolas described by projectiles having the same initial speed. 
The construction is as follows : 



Amplitudes of semi-parabolas 
described with the same in- 
itial speed. 



Angle of 
Elevation 



47 
48 

49 

50 



52 

S3 

54 

5 

5 

ss 

59 



61 
62 

% 
64 

61 



6? 
68 
69 



Angle of 


Elevation 


10000 




9994 


44 


9976 


43 


9945 


42 


9902 


4i 


9848 


40 


9782 


39 


9704 


38 


9612 


37 


95" 


36 


9396 


35 


9272 


34 


9136 


33 


8989 


32 


8829 


3i 


8659 


30 


8481 


29 


8290 


28 


8090 


27 


7880 


26 


7660 


25 


7431 


24 


7191 


23 


6944 


22 


6692 


21 



[304]. 

Altitudes of semi-parabolas de- 
scribed with the same initial 
speed. 



Angle of 


Angle of 


Elevation Elevation 


i 


3 


46 


5173 


2 


13 


47 


5346 


3 


28 


48 


5523 


4 


50 


49 


5698 


I 


76 
1 08 


50 


5868 
6038 


7 


150 


52 


6207 


8 


194 


53 


6379 


9 


245 


54 


6546 


10 


302 


55 


6710 


ii 


365 


56 


6873 


12 


432 


57 


7033 


13 


506 


58 


7190 


H 


585 


59 


7348 




670 


60 


7502 


16 


760 


61 


7649 


17 


855 


62 


7796 


18 


955 


63 


7939 


19 


1060 


64 


8078 


20 


1170 


65 


8214 


21 


1285 


66 


8346 


22 


1402 


67 


8474 


23 


1527 


68 


8597 


24 


1685 


69 


8715 


25 


1786 


70 


8830 



FOURTH DAY 


28 S 


Amplitudes of semi-parabolas Altitudes of semi-parabolas de- 
described with the same in- scribed with the same initial 


itial speed. 


speed. 








Angle of 
Elevation 




Angle of 
Elevation 


Angle of 
Elevation 




Angle of 
Elevation 




70 


6428 


20 


26 


1922 


7i 


8940 


71 


6i57 


19 


27 


2061 


72 


9045 


72 


5878 


18 


28 


2204 


73 


9144 


73 


5592 


17 


29 


2351 


74 


9240 


74 


5300 


16 


30 


2499 


75 


9330 


75 


5000 


15 


31 


2653 


76 


9415 


76 


4694 


4 


32 


2810 


77 


9493 


77 


4383 


13 


33 


2967 


78 


9567 


78 


4067 


12 


34 


3128 


79 


9636 


79 


3746 


II 


35 


3289 


80 


9698 


80 


3420 


IO 


36 


3456 


81 


9755 


81 


3090 


9 


37 


3621 


82 


9806 


82 


2756 


8 


38 


3793 


83 


9851 


83 


2419 


7 


39 


3962 


84 


9890 


84 


2079 


6 


40 


4132 


85 


9924 


8 I 


1736 


5 


4i 


4302 


86 


9951 


86 


I39i 


4 


42 


4477 


87 


9972 


87 


1044 


3 


43 


4654 


88 


9987 


88 


698 


2 


44 


4827 


89 


9998 


89 


349 


I 


45 


5000 


90 


10000 



PROBLEM. 



[305] 
PROPOSITION XIII 



From the amplitudes of semi-parabolas given in the pre- 
ceding table to find the altitudes of each of the parabolas 
described with the same initial speed. 
Let be denote the given amplitude; and let ob, the sum of the 
altitude and sublimity, be the measure of the initial speed which 
is understood to remain constant. Next we must find and 
determine the altitude, which we shall accomplish by so dividing 
ob that the rectangle contained by its parts shall be equal to the 
square of half the amplitude, be. Let / denote this point of 
division and d and i be the middle points of ob and be respec- 
tively. The square of ib is equal to the rectangle bf.fo; but the 
square of do is equal to the sum of the rectangle bf.fo and the 

square 



286 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

square of fd. If, therefore, from the square of do we subtract 
the square of bi which is equal to the rectangle bf.fo, there will 
remain the square of fd. The altitude in question, &/, is now 
obtained by adding to this length, fd, the line bd. The process 

is then as follows : From the square of half of bo 
which is known, subtract the square of bi which 

is also known; take the square root of the re- 
mainder and add to it the known length db; then 
you have the required altitude, bf. 
Example. To find the altitude of a semi-parabola 
described with an angle of elevation of 55. From 
the preceding table the amplitude is seen to be 

1 9396, of which the half is 4698, and the square 
22071204. When this is subtracted from the 

Fig- I2 S square of the half of bo, which is always 
25,000,000, the remainder is 2928796, of which the square root 

[306] 

is approximately 1710. Adding this to the half of bo, namely 
5000, we have 6710 for the altitude of bf. 

It will be worth while to add a third table giving the altitudes 
and sublimities for parabolas in which the amplitude is a con- 
stant. 

SAGR. I shall be very glad to see this; for from it I shall 
learn the difference of speed and force [degl* impeti e delle forze] 
required to fire projectiles over the same range with what we 
call mortar shots. This difference will, I believe, vary greatly 
with the elevation so that if, for example, one wished to employ 
an elevation of 3 or 4, or 87 or 88 and yet give the ball the 
same range which it had with an elevation of 45 (where we have 
shown the initial speed to be a minimum) the excess of force 
required will, I think, be very great. 

SALV. You are quite right, sir; and you will find that in order 
to perform this operation completely, at all angles of elevation, 
you will have to make great strides toward an infinite speed. 
We pass now to the consideration of the table. 



FOURTH DAY 287 

[307] 

Table giving the altitudes and sublimities of parabolas of 

constant amplitude, namely 10000, computed for 

each degree of elevation. 



Elevation 


Altitude 


Sublimity 


1 


87 


286533 


2 


175 


142450 


3 


262 


95802 


4 


349 


7I53I 


5 


437 


57H2 


6 
7 


525 
614 


47573 
40716 


8 


702 


35587 


9 


792 


31565 


10 


881 


28367 


ii 


972 


25720 


12 


1063 


23518 


13 


1154 


21701 


H 


1246 


20056 


'5 


1339 


18663 


16 


H34 


17405 


17 


1529 


16355 


18 


1624 


15389 


19 


1722 


14522 


20 


1820 


13736 


21 


1919 


13024 


22 


2O2O 


12376 


23 


2123 


11778 


24 


2226 


11230 


25 


2332 


10722 


26 


2439 


10253 


27 


2547 


9814 


28 


2658 


9404 


29 


2772 


9020 


30 


2887 


8659 


31 


3008 


8336 


32 


3124 


8001 


33 


3247 


7699 


34 


3373 


7413 


35 


3501 


7141 


36 


3633 


6882 


37 


3768 


6635 


38 


3906 


6395 



Angle of 






Elevation 


Altitude 


Sublimity 


46 


5177 


4828 


47 


5363 


4662 


48 


5553 


4502 


49 


5752 


4345 


50 


5959 


4196 




6174 


4048 


52 


6399 


3906 


53 


6635 


3765 


54 


6882 


3632 


55 


7141 


3500 


56 


7f3 


3372 


57 


7699 


3247 


58 


8002 


3123 


59 


8332 


3004 


60 


8600 


2887 


61 


9020 


2771 


62 


9403 


2658 


63 


9813 


2547 


64 


10251 


2438 


65 


10722 


2331 


66 


11230 


2226 


67 


H779 


2122 


68 


12375 


2020 


69 


13025 


1919 


70 


13237 


1819 


71 


14521 


1721 


72 


15388 


1624 


73 


16354 


1528 


74 


17437 


H33 


75 


18660 


1339 


76 


20054 


1246 


77 


21657 


1154 


78 


23523 


1062 


79 


25723 


972 


80 


28356 


881 


81 


31569 


792 


82 


35577 


702 


83 


40222 


613 



288 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

Angle of Angle of 

Elevation Altitude Sublimity Elevation Altitude Sublimity 

39 4049 6174 84 47572 525 

40 4196 5959 85 57150 437 

41 4346 5752 86 71503 349 

42 4502 5553 87 95405 262 

43 4662 5362 88 143181 174 

44 4828 5177 89 286499 87 

45 5000 5000 90 infinita 

[308] 

PROPOSITION XIV 

To find for each degree of elevation the altitudes and sub- 
limities of parabolas of constant amplitude. 
The problem is easily solved. For if we assume a constant 
amplitude of loooo, then half the tangent at any angle of 
elevation will be the altitude. Thus, to illustrate, a parabola 
having an angle of elevation of 30 and an amplitude of 10000, 
will have an altitude of 2887, which is approximately one-half 
the tangent. And now the altitude having been found, the 
sublimity is derived as follows. Since it has been proved that 
half the amplitude of a semi-parabola is the mean proportional 
between the altitude and sublimity, and since the altitude has 
already been found, and since the semi-amplitude is a constant, 
namely 5000, it follows that if we divide the square of the semi- 
amplitude by the altitude we shall obtain the sublimity sought. 
Thus in our example the altitude was found to be 2887: the 
square of 5000 is 25,000,000, which divided by 2887 gives the 
approximate value of the sublimity, namely 8659. 

SALV. Here we see, first of all, how very true is the state- 
ment made above, that, for different angles of elevation, the 
greater the deviation from the mean, whether above or below, 
the greater the initial speed [impeto e violenza] required to 
carry the projedlile over the same range. For since the speed is 
the resultant of two motions, namely, one horizontal and 
uniform, the other vertical and naturally accelerated; and 
since the sum of the altitude and sublimity represents this 
speed, it is seen from the preceding table that this sum is a 

minimum 



FOURTH DAY 289 

minimum for an elevation of 45 where the altitude and sub- 
limity are equal, namely, each 5000; and their sum 10000. 
But if we choose a greater elevation, say 50, we shall find the alti- 
tude 5959, and the sublimity 4196, giving a sum of 10155 > m hke 
manner we shall find that this is precisely the value of the speed 
at 40 elevation, both angles deviating equally from the mean. 
Secondly it is to be noted that, while equal speeds are re- 
quired for each of two elevations that are equidistant from the 
mean, there is this curious alternation, namely, that the altitude 
and sublimity at the greater elevation correspond inversely to 
the sublimity and altitude at the lower elevation. Thus in the 

.[309] 

preceding example an elevation of 50 gives an altitude of 5959 
and a sublimity of 4196; while an elevation of 40 corresponds 
to an altitude of 4196 and a sublimity of 5959- And this holds 
true in general; but it is to be remembered that, in order to 
escape tedious calculations, no account has been taken of 
fractions which are of little moment in comparison with such 
large numbers. 

SAGR. I note also in regard to the two components of the 
initial speed [impeto] that the higher the shot the less is the 
horizontal and the greater the vertical component; on the other 
hand, at lower elevations where the shot reaches only a small 
height the horizontal component of the initial speed must be 
great. In the case of a projectile fired at an elevation of 90, 
I quite understand that all the force [forza] in the world would 
not be sufficient to make it deviate a single finger's breadth from 
the perpendicular and that it would necessarily fall back into 
its initial position; but in the case of zero elevation, when the 
shot is fired horizontally, I am not so certain that some force, 
less than infinite, would not carry the projectile some distance; 
thus not even a cannon can fire a shot in a perfectly horizontal 
direction, or as we say, point blank, that is, with no elevation at 
all. Here I admit there is some room for doubt. The fact I do 
not deny outright, because of another phenomenon apparently 
no less remarkable, but yet one for which I have conclusive 
evidence. This phenomenon is the impossibility of stretching 

a 



290 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

a rope in such a way that it shall be at once straight and parallel 
to the horizon; the fact is that the cord always sags and bends 
and that no force is sufficient to stretch it perfectly straight. 
SALV. In this case of the rope then, Sagredo, you cease to 
wonder at the phenomenon because you have its demonstration 
but if we consider it with more care we may possibly discover 
some correspondence between the case of the gun and that of the 
string. The curvature of the path of the shot fired horizontally 
appears to result from two forces, one (that of the weapon) drives 
it horizontally and the other (its own weight) draws it vertically 
downward. So in stretching the rope you have the force which 
pulls it horizontally and its own weight which acts downwards. 
The circumstances in these two cases are, therefore, very similar. 
If then you attribute to the weight of the rope a power and 



energy \possanza ed energia] sufficient to oppose and overcome 
any stretching force, no matter how great, why deny this 
power to the bullet? 

Besides I must tell you something which will both surprise 
and please you, namely, that a cord stretched more or less 
tightly assumes a curve which closely approximates the parabola. 
This similarity is clearly seen if you draw a parabolic curve on a 
vertical plane and then invert it so that the apex will lie at the 
bottom and the base remain horizontal; for, on hanging a 
chain below the base, one end attached to each extremity of the 
base, you will observe that, on slackening the chain more or less, 
it bends and fits itself to the parabola; and the coincidence is 
more exact in proportion as the parabola is drawn with less 
curvature or, so to speak, more stretched; so that using parab- 
olas described with elevations less than 45 the chain fits its 
parabola almost perfectly. 

SAGR. Then with a fine chain one would be able to quickly 
draw many parabolic lines upon a plane surface. 

SALV. Certainly and with no small advantage as I shall show 
you later. 

SIMP. But before going further, I am anxious to be convinced 
at least of that proposition of which you say that there is a 

rigid 



FOURTH DAY 291 

rigid demonstration; I refer to the statement that it is impossible 
by any force whatever to stretch a cord so that it will lie per- 
fecftly straight and horizontal. 

SAGR. I will see if I can recall the demonstration; but in order 
to understand it, Simplicio, it will be necessary for you to take 
for granted concerning machines what is evident not alone from 
experiment but also from theoretical considerations, namely, 
that the velocity of a moving body \velocita del movente], even 
when its force [forza] is small, can overcome a very great re- 
sistance exerted by a slowly moving body, whenever the velocity 
of the moving body bears to that of the resisting body a greater 
ratio than the resistance [resistenza] of the resisting body to 
the force \forza] of the moving body. 

SIMP. This I know very well for it has been demonstrated by 
Aristotle in his Questions in Mechanics; it is also clearly seen 
in the lever and the steelyard where a counterpoise weighing 
not more than 4 pounds will lift a weight of 400 provided that 
the distance of the counterpoise from the axis about which 
the steelyard rotates be more than one hundred times as great 
as the distance between this axis and the point of support for 



the large weight. This is true because the counterpoise in its 
descent traverses a space more than one hundred times as great 
as that moved over by the large weight in the same time; in 
other words the small counterpoise moves with a velocity which 
is more than one hundred times as great as that of the large 
weight. 

SAGR. You are quite right; you do not hesitate to admit that 
however small the force [forza] of the moving body it will over- 
come any resistance, however great, provided it gains more 
in velocity than it loses in force and weight [vigore e gravita]. 
Now let us return to the case of the cord. In the accompanying 
figure ab represents a line passing through two fixed points a and 
b; at the extremities of this line hang, as you see, two large 
weights c and d, which stretch it with great force and keep it 
truly straight, seeing that it is merely a line without weight. 
Now I wish to remark that if from the middle point of this line, 

which 



292 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

which we may call , you suspend any small weight, say h, the 
line ab will yield toward the point/ and on account of its elonga- 
tion will compel the two heavy weights c and d to rise. This I 
shall demonstrate as follows : with the points a and b as centers 
describe the two quadrants, eig and elm; now since the two semi- 
diameters ai and bl are equal to ae and eb, the remainders fi and 
// are the excesses of the lines af and jfJ over ae and eb; they there- 







Fig. 126 

fore determine the rise of the weights c and d, assuming of course 
that the weight h has taken the position /. But the weight h 

[312] 

will take the position /, whenever the line ef which represents 
the descent of h bears to the line fi that is, to the rise of the 
weights c and d a ratio which is greater than the ratio of the 
weight of the two large bodies to that of the body h. Even when 
the weights of c and d are very great and that of h very small this 
will happen; for the excess of the weights c and d over the weight 
of h can never be so great but that the excess of the tangent ef 
over the segment fi may be proportionally greater. This may 

be 



FOURTH DAY 293 

be proved as follows: Draw a circle of diameter gai; draw the 
line bo such that the ratio of its length to another length c, 
c>d, is the same as the ratio of the weights c and d to the weight 
h. Since od, the ratio of bo to d is greater than that of bo to c. 
Take be a third proportional to ob and d; prolong the diameter 
gi to a point /such that gi:if=oe:eb; and from the point /draw 
the tangent fn; then since we already have oe:eb =gi:if, we 
shall obtain, by compounding ratios, ob:eb =gf:if. But d is a 
mean proportional between ob and be; while nf is a mean pro- 
portional between gf and fi. Hence n/ bears to fi the same 
ratio as that of cb to d, which is greater than that of the weights 
c and d to the weight h. Since then the descent, or velocity, 
of the weight h bears to the rise, or velocity, of the weights c 
and d a greater ratio than the weight of the bodies c and d bears 
to the weight of h, it is clear that the weight h will descend 
and the line db will cease to be straight and horizontal. 

And now this which happens in the case of a weightless cord 
db when any small weight h is attached at the point e, happens 
also when the cord is made of ponderable matter but without 
any attached weight; because in this case the material of which 
the cord is composed functions as a suspended weight. 

SIMP. I am fully satisfied. So now Salviati can explain, as 
he promised, the advantage of such a chain and, afterwards, 
present the speculations of our Academician on the subject of 
impulsive forces \forza delta percossa]. 

SALV. Let the preceding discussions suffice for to-day; the 
hour is already late and the time remaining will not permit us to 
clear up the subjects proposed; we may therefore postpone our 
meeting until another and more opportune occasion. 

SAGR. I concur in your opinion, because after various con- 
versations with intimate friends of our Academician I have con- 
cluded that this question of impulsive forces is very obscure, and 
I think that, up to the present, none of those who have treated 

[313] 

this subject have been able to clear up its dark corners which 
lie almost beyond the reach of human imagination; among the 
various views which I have heard expressed one, strangely fan- 
tastic 



294 THE TWO NEW SCIENCES OF GALILEO 

tastic, remains in my memory, namely, that impulsive forces 
indeterminate, if not infinite. Let us, therefore, await the coi 
venience of Salviati. Meanwhile tell me what is this whi< 
follows the discussion of projectiles. 

SALV. These are some theorems pertaining to the centers of 
gravity of solids, discovered by our Academician in his youth, 
and undertaken by him because he considered the treatment of 
Federigo Comandino to be somewhat incomplete. The proposi- 
tions which you have before you would, he thought, meet the 
deficiencies of Comandino's book. The investigation was 
undertaken at the instance of the Illustrious Marquis Guid' 
Ubaldo Dal Monte, a very distinguished mathematician of his 
day, as is evidenced by his various publications. To this gentle- 
man our Academician gave a copy of this work, hoping to ex- 
tend the investigation to other solids not treated by Comandino. 
But a little later there chanced to fall into his hands the book of 
the great geometrician, Luca Valerio, where he found the sub- 
ject treated so completely that he left off his own investigations, 
although the methods which he employed were quite different 
from those of Valerio. 

SAGR. Please be good enough to leave this volume with me 
until our next meeting so that I may be able to read and study 
these propositions in the order in which they are written. 

SALV. It is a pleasure to comply with your request and I only 
hope that the propositions will be of deep interest to you. 

END OF FOURTH DAY. 



APPENDIX 



Containing some theorems, and their proofs, dealing with 
centers of gravity of solid bodies, written by the same Author at 
an earlier date.* 

* Following the example of the National Edition, this Appendix which 
covers 18 pages of the Leyden Edition of 1638 is here omitted as being 
of minor interest. [Trans.] 



[FINIS] 




INDEX 



Accelerandosi = displace, 252 
Accelerated motion, 160 

reduced to 



uniform motion, 173 

Acceleration, definition of uni- 
form, 169 

Acceleration of gravity measured, 
178 

Accelerazione, used in the sense 
of speed, 167 

Achilles and the Tortoise, prob- 
lem of, 164 

[Acoustics, 95 

{Adhesion of plates, 1 1, 12 

Aggiunti, x 

r, resistance of, to projectiles, 
252, 256 

Altitude of parabola, determina- 
tion of, 285 

Amplitude of parabola defined, 
260, 273 

tables of, 284 



theorem 



Apollonius, 242, 245, 246 

thec 

Aproino, Paolo, 
Arcetri, xi, xviii 



T 

of, 



38,44 



Archimedes, v, 41, no, 144, 147, 

242, 251 

Archimedes' principle, 81 
Ariosto, quotation from, 131 
Aristotle, 12, 13, 20, 26, 49, 64, 76, 

77, 80, 95, no, 125, 135, 291 
Aristotle's idea of falling bodies, 61 
Arrighetti, x 

Atmospheric pressure, 17 
Augmented Fourth, 104 
Axioms of uniform motion, 154 



Beam carrying a constant load 

which moves from one end to 

the other, 140 
Beam carrying a constant load 

in a fixed position, 140 et sq. 
Beams, similar, relative strength 

of, 124 

, strength of, 115 
, variation of strength with 

diameter, 119 

, variation of strength with 

length, 123 

Bending strength, 119 
Bernoulli, James, 149 

, John, 183 
Bones, proportion of, 131 

, of birds, 150, 239 

Brachistochrone, 225, 239 

Canne = fathom 

Capillarity, effect seen in shorten- 
ing of rope, 20 

as seen in drops on 

cabbage leaves, 70 

Catenary, 1^9, 290 

Cause, speed considered as a, 255 

Causes, search after, futile, 166 

Cavalieri, 41 

Chords of circles, times of descent 
along, 1 88 et sq. 

Cicero, xix 

Cohesion of solids, n et sq., 18 

Comandino, Federigo, 294 

Compass, Galileo's military, 149 

Composition of motions, 244, 257, 
267 

Continuity, mathematical, 24 et sq. 



298 



INDEX 



Continuous quantities, 31, 34-36 
Contraction, theory of, 51 
Cylinders, relative strength of 
similar, 124 

Definition of uniformly accelerated 

motion, 161 

Definition of uniform motion, 1 54 
Definitions, mathematical, 28 
Density, see Specific Gravity 
Diapason, 99 
Diapente, 99 
Diminished Fifth, 104 
Diodati, Elia, ix, xii 

Energia, 269, 271, 290 

Elzevir, Louis, xi 

Elzevirs, The, xviii 

Errors in parabolic trajectories, 

251 et sq. 

Euclid, 242, 243, 246, 248, 283 
Expansion, theory of, 51 

Falling bodies, Aristotle's notion 

of, 61, 64-68 

, laws of, 265 

, sphere as locus of, 

192, 193 
Feather and coin result predicted, 

72 

Fifth, a musical interval, ipo 
Fire escape, devised by kinsman 

of Galileo, 10 
Force, synonyms for, 114, 267, 269, 

271, 286, 291, 293 
Forza, in the sense of mechanical 

advantage, 124 
, in the sense of momentum, 

267, 269, 271, 286 
Frequenza = frequency of pen- 
dulum, 97 



Geometry compared with Logic, 

137 
Gilding, thickness of, 53 et sq. 



Gravity, centers of, 294, 295 
, experimental determina- 
tion of, 178 
Guevara (di) Giovani, 20, 126 

Hammer blow, problem of, 271 
Heath, T. L., v, 145 
Huygens, v 

Impenetrability of matter, 49, 51, 
61 

Impulsive forces, 293 

Inclined plane, principle of, 184 
et sq. 

, used to "dilute" 

gravity, 178 

Inclined planes of equal height, 
speed acquired on, 169, 184 

Indivisibility, 30, 36 

Infinity, 26, 30, 31, 37, 39 

Isochronism of the simple pen- 
dulum, 97 

of pendulums of dif- 
ferent materials, 85 

Isoperimetric problems, 58 

Jealousy of investigators, 83 

Law of lever, 112 

Law of motion, Newton's first, 244 

Newton's second, 



250 

Law of simple pendulum, 96 
Laws of air resistance, 253 
Laws of falling bodies, 174 et sq., 

265 

Lever, law of, 112 
Levity of air, 77, 78 
Lift pump, theory of, 16 
Light, speed of, 42 
Limiting speed of bodies in vacuo, 

72 

Lincei, Academy of the, xx 
Loaded beams, 140 
Logic and geometry compared, 137 



INDEX 



299 



Marsili, x 

Mathematical definitions, 28 

Mathematics, role of in physics, 

276 

Maximum range of a projectile, 275 
Media, effect of, on speed of falling 

bodies, 76 
Medici, Antonio de', x 

, Prince Mattia de', xi 



Mersenne, M, v. 

Micanzio, xi 

Minimum momentum theorem, 

273 

Mirrors, spherical, 41 

Mole = volume, 80, 82 

Moment, used in sense of impor- 
tance, 65 

Momenta = force, 183 

Momenta in the sense of magni- 
tude, 124 

Momentum, 258, 259, 263, 266; 
269, 270 

, measure of, 264 

Monochord, 99 

i Motion, axioms of uniform, 154 

, natural, 153 

of falling bodies, 160 

of projectiles, 244 

supernatural, 255 

uniform, laws of, 154 

Monte, G. del, ix, 294 

Motte, v 

Music, 95 

Naturally accelerated motion, 160 
"Natural" Motion, 153 
Newton, v 
Newton's First Law of Motion, 

215, 216, 244 
Second Law of Motion, 

250, 257, 263 
Noailles, Count of, xii, xvii 

Octave, ratio involved in, 99 
Orbits of planets, 261 



Padua, ix, x, xii, 182 

Parabola, description of, 148, 246, 

258 

, quadrature of, 147 

, to find the sublimity of 

a given, 272 

Parallelogram of velocities, 257 
Pendulum motion, law of air 

resistance to, 254 
Pendulums of lead and cork, 84 
Pendulums, time of descent, 95 
Pendulum with string striking 

against nail, 170 

Periodo = period of pendulum, 97 
Peripatetics, 48, 61 
Peso = specific gravity, 69, 72 
Pieroni, G., xi 
Planetary orbits, 261 
Plato, 90, 137, 261 
Point blank firing, 289 
Potenza, meaning of "in potenza," 



257, 266 

8 ? 
Problem of Achilles and the 



Principle of virtual work, 18; 
roblem of / 
Tortoise, 164 



of stretched rope, 290 
Projectile, speed of, 279 
Projectiles, motion of, 244 
Pythagorean problem in music, 95, 
103 

Quadrature of parabola, 147, 251 
Quickest descent, 225, 239 

Range, maximum, 275 

Range, minimum momentum re- 
quired for a given, 273 

Range tables, 256, 284 

Resistance of air proportional to 
speed, 74 

of air to projectiles, 

252 

Resonance of a bell, 98 

of pendulum, 97 

of strings, 99 



300 INDEX 

Resultant, 257, 258, 267 
Ripples, produced by sounding 

a goblet, 99 

Rope-making, theory of, 8 et sq. 
Ropes, shortening due to moisture, 

20 

, stretched, problem of, 290 



Sack, proper design of, 56 

Sacrobosco (John Holywood) 57 

Salusbury, Thomas, v 

Sarpi, Fra Paolo, ix, x 

Second minute, as a unit of time, 
264, 265 

Siena, x 

Space, described in uniformly ac- 
celerated motion, 173 et sq. 

Spear as unit of length, 265 

Specific gravity, balls adjusted to 
equal that of water, 69 

Specific gravity of air, 78 et sq. 

of aquatic 

animals, 132 

Speed of projectile, 279 

, standard of, 260, 265 

, terminal, 91 

, uniform, definition of, 154 

Statics, fundamental principle of, 
no 

Steelyard, 291 

Strength of materials, 109 



Strings, laws of vibrating, 100 
"Sublimity" defined, 260 

- of any parabola, to 
find, 272 
Subsidence of small particles, 87 

Tangent, used in two senses, 282 
Terminal speed, 91, 256, 260 
Theorem of Apollonius, 38, 44 
Tritono, 104 
Tubes, bending strength of, 150 

Ubaldi, ix 

Uniform acceleration, definition 

of, 169 
Uniform motion, laws of, 154 

Valerio, Luca, 30, 148, 294 
Velocities, parallelogram of, 257 
Velocity, standard of, 260 
, uniform, definition of, 



154 



-, virtual, 291 



Venice, xi 

Figore = force, 291 

Vinta, Belisario, x 

Virtual work, principle of, 291 

Viviani, Vincenzio, ix, 180 

Weighing in vacuo, 81-83 
Weston, Thomas, vi 










BINDING SECT. SEP 171971 



QC Galilei, Galileo 

123 Dialogues concerning two 

G1133 new sciences 

1914 



Physical & 
Applied Sci. 



PLEASE DO NOT REMOVE 
CARDS OR SLIPS FROM THIS POCKET 

_^^ ^ ^ ^ ^ ^^ 

UNIVERSITY OF TORONTO LIBRARY 



